ied Dorothy Marie Johnson. They had two sons, Moss Kendrix, Jr. and Alan Kendrix. 
At the same year, Kendrix founded a public relations firm named The Moss Kendrix Organization. The company motto, "What the Public Thinks Counts!" was also his mantra, which he embossed on the organization's letterhead. It was established in Washington, DC. Kendrix focused on accounts pursuing African-American consumers such as Carnation, National Dental Association, National Education Association, the Republic of Liberia and Ford Motor Company to name a few. 
One of his career highlights was the acquisition of Coca-Cola as a client. He focused on marketing to African Americans, and worked with Coca-Cola until the 1970s. 
Kendrix died of a heart ailment on January 4, 1989 at his home in Washington. He was married to Muriel Kendrix of Lexington, Massachusetts. 
The 2016 Minneapolis shooting took place on June 29, 2016 in Minneapolis, Minnesota when a man named Anthony Sawina shot at five Somali-Americans, wounding two of them. Witnesses later recounted that Sawina shouted anti-Muslim expletives and claimed he was "going to kill [them] all." The attack was condemned by civil rights groups as part of a larger rise of Islamophobia in the United States leading up the 2016 presidential election. 
Anthony Sawina had two previous convictions for carrying a handgun without a permit. Sawina was charged with multiple counts of second-degree assault with a dangerous weapon. His bail was set at $75,000 and faced up to seven years in prison. The police confirmed on June 30 that they were investigating the incident as a hate crime. The FBI also reviewed the case as a hate crime and for potential federal civil rights charges. 
Sawina was tried on nine counts of felony, including attempted murder in the first degree. On May 11, 2017, Sawina was convicted of all charges, including attempted first-degree murder. Sawina received a 39-year sentence, which prompted him to angrily rebuke the judge. Sawina appealed his sentence in 2018 as excessive. 
Minnesota Congressman Keith Ellison called for the U.S. Department of Justice to investigate the crime. 
Jaylani Hussein, executive director of the Council on American-Islamic Relations in Minnesota (CAIR-MN), stated the attack was evidence of growing tension and fear for Muslims across America. Hassan Jama of the Islamic Association of North America called on "all Americans to stand with us, all Minnesotans to stand with us" and condemn the shooting as a hate crime. 
Muhammad Nadeem Qureshi is a Pakistani politician who has been a member of the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab since August 2018. 
He was elected to the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab as a candidate of Pakistan Tehreek-e-Insaf from Constituency PP-216 (Multan-VI) in 2018 Pakistani general election. Parliamentary Secretary Punjab and Member Kashmir Committee.  
This article about a Member of the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to volleyball in Russia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Trelles was born in Guadalajara. As a child, he was very athletic, engaging in many different sports.  In his teenage years, Trelles's family relocated to San Miguel Chapultepec where he regularly played football in the streets. 
Trelles turned 100 in July 2016. He died of a heart attack on 24 March 2020 at the age of 103, in Mexico City. 
Campbell was born in Carleton, Ottawa, Ontario in 1891 according to official records, though he sometimes falsely claimed to have been born in Medicine Hat, Alberta, and gave a birth year of 1888.   He studied in Belfast, fought in Europe in the First World War, and after his first marriage and divorce in Canada returned to settle in England in 1930.   
Campbell toured widely in Britain, and made some recordings for the Columbia label.  From 1948, he wrote and presented serial radio stories on similar western themes. 
Campbell died in 1952, aged 60, from a heart attack while on tour in Ipswich.  At the time, he was described as "one of Britain's most popular stage and radio stars." 
Addison Transit Center is a bus-only station located along Quorum Drive and Addison Road in Addison, Texas (USA). The station opened in 1999. This transit center will become a rail station on the Silver Line when that line is completed in 2023. 
The bus routes within the transit center serves Addison Circle Park as well as The Galleria of Dallas and Valley View Center. 
This biographical article related to North Korean boxing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a North Korean Olympic medalist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mark Andrew Druce (born 3 March 1974) is an English former professional footballer who played as a forward for various teams in the Football League. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a forward born in the 1970s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John Filippi (born 27 February 1995) is a French auto racing driver who competes in the World Touring Car Championship for Campos Racing. 
Filippi started his karting career in 2007 in the Cadet class. He made his first international appearance in 2009. In 2009 Filippi competed in the European KF3 championship where he finished 40th in a Vortex powered Tony Kart. He also competed in the French Grand Prix Open Karting. The following two years the driver from Corsica competed in the KF2 class. He ended the 2011 season with two top-ten classifications in the French and Grand Prix Open championships. 
After six years of karting John Filippi made is autoracing debut in 2007 at Circuit Paul Armagnac. The Corsican was entered by Equipe Palmyr in the amateur Single-seater V de V Challenge driving a Tatuus FR2000. Driving against other old Formula Renault and Formula Master cars he finished twelfth in his first race. He raced six races in his inaugural racing season and finished 25th in the standings. 
Filippi became the youngest ever points scorer in a WTCC race at the Race of Morocco in Marrakech. This was followed by consistent pace in the TC2 class all season before clinching a class win at the Race of Japan 
Again Filippi scored points to finish in Marrakech and at the Nordschleife. At the Race of China Filippi set a new career-best qualifying position with P7, before suffering from an accident in Race 1 which forced him to retire. In Thailand, it was much the same story with a strong qualifying but a Race 1 incident with Tiago Monteiro forced him to retire once again. 
At the Race of Qatar qualified 10th and therefore lined up on pole position for Race 2. Filippi is currently the youngest driver ever to have started from pole position in a WTCC race at 20 years and 331 days old. 
On February 9, 2016, Filippi's main sponsor Oscaro announced that Filippi would be continuing with Campos Racing in the TC1 Chevrolet for the 2016 World Touring Car Championship season. It was also announced that 4-time world champion Yvan Muller would be accompanying Filippi as a driver coach for the season. 
Ancient manuscripts in Koine Greek containing this chapter are mainly of the Septuagint version, including Codex Vaticanus (B;       G     {\displaystyle {\mathfrak {G}}}  B; 4th century), Codex Sinaiticus (S; BHK:       G     {\displaystyle {\mathfrak {G}}}  S; 4th century), Codex Alexandrinus (A;       G     {\displaystyle {\mathfrak {G}}}  A; 5th century) and Codex Marchalianus (Q;       G     {\displaystyle {\mathfrak {G}}}  Q; 6th century). 
The division of chapters and verses in the English Bibles (following Greek translations) differ from the traditional Hebrew text, as follows: 
So I will restore to you the years that the swarming locust has eaten,  The crawling locust,  The consuming locust,  And the chewing locust, My great army which I sent among you. 
Exact identity of these locusts is unknown, whether they represents "four varieties of insect" or "four various stages in the insect development" or "vernacular differences". 
The section extends to chapter 3, dealing with the Day of the Lord which brings the deliverance and the ultimate vindication of God's people in Judah. 
And it shall come to pass afterward  That I will pour out My Spirit on all flesh; Your sons and your daughters shall prophesy,  Your old men shall dream dreams,  Your young men shall see visions. 
The sun shall be turned into darkness, And the moon into blood, Before the coming of the great and awesome day of the Lord. 
And it shall come to pass That whoever calls on the name of the Lord Shall be saved. For in Mount Zion and in Jerusalem there shall be deliverance, As the Lord has said, Among the remnant whom the Lord calls. 
The October 1679 English general election again returned a majority of members in favour of Exclusion. Consequently, this parliament  was known as the Exclusion Bill Parliament. It did not assemble until 21 October 1680, and was dissolved three months later on 18 January 1681. 
Ivan Woods (born 31 December 1976 in Toronto, Ontario, Canada) is a Maltese footballer who currently plays for Maltese Premier League club Sliema Wanderers, where he plays as a striker. 
This article about a specific military ship or boat of Sweden is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Babul Ki Galiyaan is a 1972 Hindi film directed by S. D. Narang. The film stars Sanjay Khan,  Hema Malini and Shatrughan Sinha. The film's music is by Ravi. 
In poker, an overlay is the gap between a poker tournament's guaranteed prize pool and the actual prize pool generated by entrants. 
Overlays are far more common in online poker than in live poker simply due to the volume of tournaments online and the fierce competition for players online. 
The Protestant Church (Evangelische Kirche or. Ev. Kirche) in Borgholzhausen, North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany, is the church of the Lutheran parish there, which belongs to the Halle district of the Evangelische Kirche von Westfalen. The building dates back to the 14th century. It features a unique carved stone altarpiece from 1501. 
A church in Borgholzhausen was first mentioned in a 1169 document as a church (Eigenkirche) of the Counts of Ravensberg. The present church, replacing earlier structures, was built beginning in 1340. It was expanded by a Gothic choir in 1496. A carved stone altarpiece was added in 1501. 
The church became Lutheran during the Reformation, with the reformer Johannes Sandhagen. He was born in 1492, and introduced the Reformation in Borgholzhausen in 1535, followed by more pastors from his family. Catholic services were permitted at the church until 1624. 
The interior of the church was restored in 1955/56. In 1975/76, additions from the 19th century were removed, archeological excavations were performed, and ornamental decoration of the ceiling refreshed.  The exterior, especially the plaster, was restored In 2010/11. 
A monument in front of the church was erected in memory of soldiers who fell in the wars between 1864 and 1871. 
The church is a hall church in late-Gothic style with one aisle. The main feature is a carved stone altarpiece dated to 1501, aimed at the majority of the congregation that could not read. It is a unique work of art in Westphalia. It depicts the Passion of Jesus in 13 scenes. 
Nick Phipps (sometimes shown as Nicholas Phipps, born 8 April 1952) is a British bobsledder who competed from 1980 to 1992. He finished third in the Bobsleigh World Cup combined men's event in 1985-86. 
Competing in two Winter Olympics, Phipps earned his best finish of 13th both in the two-man and four-man events at Albertville in 1992. 
This biographical article relating to British bobsleigh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rough Music: Blair, Bombs, Baghdad, London, Terror is a 2005 book by British-Pakistani writer, journalist, political activist and historian Tariq Ali. 
The book is a reaction to the 7 July 2005 London bombings, which Ali describes as "murderous mayhem that Blair's war has sown in Iraq". The book criticises perceived attacks on civil liberties. He invokes "great dissenters" of the past and calls for "political resistance, within Parliament and without".[non-primary source needed] 
The book was reviewed in the peer-reviewed academic journal Current Issues in Criminal Justice and Arena magazine. 
This article about a book on politics of the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bulolo Airport (IATA: BUL, ICAO: AYBU) is an airfield serving Bulolo, in the Morobe Province of Papua New Guinea. 
This article about a Papua New Guinean building or structure related topic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Louis the Gorilla (born May 12, 1999) is a western lowland gorilla who is known for walking upright in order to avoid muddying his hands. A clip of Louis that was posted to the Philadelphia Zoo's Facebook page became popular and he gained international fame. 
Louis was born at the St. Louis Zoo on May 12, 1999 to his mother, Nne and father, Jabari. Louis arrived at the Philadelphia Zoo on July 13, 2004 along with his mother and father. In 2014, Louis moved into a bachelor troop with another gorilla, Kuchimba.[citation needed] 
At the Philadelphia Zoo, Louis is known for his large size as he stands at six-feet tall and weighs 450 pounds. While Louis is very large, he is probably the shyest of all gorillas at the zoo according to his curator. However, he will charge at the glass on occasion. 
Louis and another male, Kuchimba were transferred to the Zoo de Granby from the Philadelphia Zoo in February, 2020. 
In March 2018, a video of Louis walking throughout his enclosure on two legs gained nearly 500,000 views in under a month on Facebook. 
Butler was the brand manager of the Alternity role-playing game for Wizards of the Coast. He was part of the Alternity team with Bill Slavicsek, Rich Baker, Kim Mohan, David Eckelberry, and rk post. In 2000, Butler wrote an open letter announcing the cancellation of the Alternity and SAGA lines and explaining the reasons. 
His design work for D&D includes The Sword of the Dales (1995), The Secret of Spiderhaunt (1995), The Return of Randal Morn (1995), AD&D Dungeon Master Screen & Master Index (1995), Netheril: Empire of Magic (1996), and Cormanthyr: Empire of the Elves (1998). 
Techwood Music, Inc. was established in 1988 by then Turner Broadcasting Chairman and CEO Ted Turner to manage the vast music catalogue publishing and licensing rights created by motion pictures and television series produced by Adult Swim, Cartoon Network, CNN, TBS, TNT, TruTV, Turner Sports, Turner Studios and the now defunct WTBS-TV Channel 17 in Atlanta. 
While Techwood Music owns the publishing and licensing rights to the music in its they do not own copyrights which are most likely owned by another Turner entity, the composer, a company controlled by the composer or a third party corporation. 
The Techwood Music name is derived from owner Turner Broadcasting System's headquarters known as The Mansion on Techwood Drive NW in Atlanta, Georgia. 
Pountney was born in Oxford and was a chorister at St John's College, Cambridge (1956-61). He was then educated near Oxford at Radley College (1961-66).  And then returned to St John's College, Cambridge to read his degree. 
He has worked as a librettist for Sir Peter Maxwell Davies on The Doctor of Myddfai, Mr Emmet Takes a Walk and Kommilitonen!, and has translated opera librettos into English from Russian, Czech, German, and Italian. 
He wrote the libretto for and directed Elena Langer's opera Figaro Gets a Divorce, which was premiered at the Welsh National Opera in February 2016. To great critical acclaim he directed Zandonai's exquisitely rare Francesca da Rimini at La Scala Opera House, Milan in 2018.  Later that year at Strasbourg he directed Kurt Weill and Arnold Schoenberg in Das Mahagonny Songspiel, Pierrot Lamaire and Die 7 Todsunden. 
He was appointed Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) in 1994 and was knighted in the 2019 Birthday Honours for services to opera. 
Coal City High School is a four-year high school in north-central Illinois. At last count, the school had 650 students, and is a member of the IHSA and the Illinois Central Eight Conference. Coal City High School recently underwent renovation and was equipped with new science labs and a new auditorium and gymnasium. 
Nayabahadurpur is a census town in the Suti I CD block in the Jangipur subdivision of the Murshidabad district in the state of West Bengal, India. 
Note: The two maps present some of the notable locations in the subdivision. All places marked in the maps are linked in the larger full screen maps. 
According to the 2011 Census of India, Nayabahadurpur had a total population of 9,239, of which 4,787 (52%) were males and 4,452 (48%) were females. Population in the age range 0-6 years was 1,663. The total number of literate persons in Nayabahadurpur was 4,513 (59.57% of the population over 6 years). 
This article about a location in the Murshidabad district of West Bengal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Esther Zaied was born in Safed to a Syrian Jewish family. She began performing as a child, singing Hebrew and international folk songs. In 1958, Esther met Abi Ofarim, a guitarist and dancer, whom she later married. She was a student in his dance studio in Haifa. Esther served four months in the Israeli Army before she was discharged due to her marriage to Abi. 
In 1963 and 1964, Esther and Abi had success on the charts in Europe. In the fall of 1964, Esther embarked on a tour of the United States with the Smothers Brothers. Speaking about a performance at Oregon State University in Corvallis, Oregon. Jim Albright, campus correspondent, stated: Everyone expected the Smother Brothers to be great, but Ester [sic] turned out to be fabulous...people were amazed with her singing and her looks." 
By 1965, Esther was well known throughout Europe. She headlined in the major concert halls and theaters. She starred in German films and had her own television specials on BBC and Eurovision. 
 In 1966, Abi and Ofarim had their first hit with "Noch einen Tanz", an English version of which, "One More Dance", was a hit in the UK two years later, peaking at No. 13. Their greatest success in Germany was in 1967 with "Morning of My Life", which was written by the Bee Gees. In 1968 "Cinderella Rockefella" hit the top of the charts in a number of countries including the UK. They performed live concerts in New York City and London, and they toured Europe before separating in 1969.
Esther began recording as a solo artist in the early 1960s. She often sang in different languages. In 1967, she recorded, Esther im Kinderland, in which she sang 20 children's songs from eight countries in six different languages. After her divorce from Abi, she continued performing and released several albums. 
On 25 February 1970, she co-starred in her own BBC television special The Young Generation Meet Esther Ofarim broadcast on BBC1. 
In 1982, she released the album Complicated Ladies on Mercury Records with Eberhard Schoener, Wolf Wondratschek, and Ulf Miehe. 
At the age of 18, Esther married Abi Ofarim on December 11, 1958. They separated in 1969, and their divorce was finalized in Germany in November 1970. 
Esther later married assistant television director Philipp von Sell, who is 18 years her junior. They had a son, David von Sell, born in New York in 1983. Esther and Philipp divorced when David was nine. David is a musician, he attended Berklee College of Music in Boston. 
Athletic Park is a former baseball ground located in Washington, D.C. The ground was home to the Washington Nationals aka "Statesmen", of the American Association in 1884. 
The ballfield was located at S Street NW (south); 9th Street NW (east); T Street NW (north); and 10th Street NW (west); about a quarter mile southwest of the eventual site of Griffith Stadium. The club folded before the 1884 season ended. 
The ballpark was first mentioned by that name in local newspapers in 1883, and continued to appear as a site for a variety of public events as late as 1888. By 1889 the block was being cut into lots for new housing. The site is now occupied by residences and education-related buildings. 
This article about a baseball venue in Washington, D.C. is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
1-Hydroxy-7-azabenzotriazole (HOAt) is a triazole used as a peptide coupling reagent. It suppresses the racemization. 
HOAt has a melting point between 213 and 216 degrees Celsius. As a liquid, it is transparent and without any color. 
Castle was born on 14 September 1698 near Canterbury in Kent, where he received the most of his early education. He was admitted to Corpus Christi College, Cambridge, in 1716, graduating B.A. in 1719, and being made a Fellow in 1722. 
Castle was appointed Public Orator for the University of Cambridge in 1727; he gave up the office in 1729, on being appointed to the vicarages of Elm and Emneth. He was then moved to Barley, Hertfordshire. In 1744 he was made rector of St Paul's School, London, in 1745 master of Corpus Christi College, and in 1746 vice-chancellor. In 1747 he was promoted to the Prebendary of Aylesbury at Lincoln Cathedral, and in 1749 to the deanery of Hereford. 
Castle died at Bath on 6 June 1750. He was buried at Barley, Hertfordshire, where there was a Latin inscription to his memory. 
Drummond/North Elmsley is a township in eastern Ontario, Canada in Lanark County. It is situated on the north shore of the Rideau River between the town of Perth and the town of Smiths Falls. It is a predominantly rural municipality.  The township offices are located in the hamlet of Port Elmsley. 
The township comprises the communities of Armstrong Corners, Balderson, Beveridge Locks, Cook's Shore, Craig Shore, Drummond Centre, Ebbs Shore, Elmgrove, Ferguson Falls, Glenview, Innisville, McCreary's Shore, McCulloughs Landing, McNaughton Shore, Port Elmsley, Prestonvale, Richardson, Rideau Ferry, Robertson's Shore and Wayside. 
The north-south Ontario Highway 7  passes through the township from Perth towards Carleton Place.  The east-west County Road 43 goes between Perth and Smiths Falls. 
The Rideau Trail passes through the township twice, between Smiths Falls and Perth and to the south of Perth. 
The Caledonian Railway 179 Class and 184 Class were 4-6-0 mixed-traffic locomotives designed by John F. McIntosh and built in two batches in 1913-14 and 1914-15 respectively, at the Caledonian Railway's own St. Rollox Works.  The differences between the two batches were minor, and they are often considered to be a single class.   
They were the last new locomotives designed by McIntosh before his retirement.  The type was essentially a superheated version of the earlier 908 Class and were built primarily for use on express goods trains, although they also worked on passenger traffic and were painted in the Caledonian's blue passenger livery.  The locomotives were the most successful of McIntosh's various 4-6-0 designs. 
The locomotives passed into the ownership of the London, Midland and Scottish Railway upon its formation in 1923.  Although the older 908 Class were treated as passenger locomotives by the LMS, the 179s were classified as a freight type and were repainted into unlined black freight livery.  They continued in use until they were displaced by new LMS standard locomotives such as the Black Five 4-6-0s. 
Although they outlasted most of the other McIntosh 4-6-0s they were withdrawn and scrapped between 1934 and 1946. 
This article relating to steam locomotives operated in Scotland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
General Brady is a command pilot with more than 3,000 hours in T-37, T-38, T-1, KC-135, C-21, and C-5. 
General Brady's retirement ceremony was held December 13, 2010 at Ramstein AFB, Germany, and he ended active duty as of February 1, 2011. Since retirement, he has served on the board of trustees for Mid-Atlantic Christian University. 
Runaway Nightmare is a 1982 American dark comedy thriller film written, edited, directed by, and starring Mike Cartel. It also stars Al Valetta, Seeska Vandenberg, Georgia Durante, and Jody Lee Olhava, and follows two desert worm ranchers who find themselves caught between a female death cult and the mafia over precious stolen plutonium. The film developed a cult following and had a national theatrical re-release in 2014. 
Two Death Valley worm wranglers, Ralph (Mike Cartel) and Jason (Al Valetta) secretly watch strangers bury a coffin in an empty ravine. When the gravediggers leave, Ralph and Jason uncover the shallow grave to find a beautiful woman marked with the name "Fate" (Seeska Vandenberg) unconscious in the box. 
After saving Fate's life, the worm ranchers get abducted by several female cultists who were searching for their recently vanished sister-member, Fate. At the cult commune, Ralph and Jason finish a series of lunatical ordeals that earn them membership in the clan. Amiable Jason quickly finds romance from the group while hostile Ralph is treated with contempt. 
The cult boss, Hesperia (Cindy Donlan) tells the men that Fate had been negotiating with a gunrunning cartel to help her sell something priceless (referred to as platinum) on the world market for a fee, but was instead betrayed.  The cartel group then buried Fate as a warning. Fate says the mysterious contraband is under guard at the cartel desert warehouse, that she knows intimately. Hesperia leads a break-in to steal back the platinum, using Ralph and Jason as expendable decoys. 
The heist is successful but the outraged cartel follow the cult and attack the commune in a ferocious gun battle. Hesperia loads her girls and Jason in a helicopter from the commune roof to the worm ranch. Ralph is left behind, captured and brought back to the warehouse for a tortuous interrogation. At the moment before death, an explosion from a time bomb set earlier by Ralph saves him, while eliminating his tormentors. 
Fate meets Ralph after answering his phone call for help. She drives to the commune, gets Ralph to tell where he hid the mysterious platinum box, then casually shoots him.  Unknown to Fate, Ralph still wears an armored vest (under his shirt) from the earlier gunfight but plays dead as Fate drives away. 
Ralph learns that Hesperia has abandoned her cult, flying away as mystically as she had arrived. With sly malice, Ralph puts the confused women to work on his worm ranch. While delighted with the arrangement, Ralph and Jason see what seems to be another human burial down their hill. This time, the coffin's payload is far worse, but may be just what vampiric Ralph has needed all along. 
The unfinished second draft of Runaway Nightmare was rushed into production by Mike Cartel after having taken over direction of his ailing film project Bitter Heritage in late 1978. 
With a 48-hour turnaround and pre-production, Runaway Nightmare began filming with the same Bitter Heritage crew and location set. For casting, Cartel asked actors Al Valetta and Georgia Durante from Bitter Heritage to join the production while Cartel's wife, Mari filled most of the actress roles with model/actress acquaintances from her days as a Jack LaLanne health spa manager and aerobics teacher. 
After a horrific three-week schedule, Cartel was unsatisfied with the coverage (while editing himself) and started shooting on weekends with a skeleton crew, cheap Friday-Monday rentals, scratch track sound, staged from his own home studio with movable sets and unpaid or deferment-paid actors while going without insurance or permits. Everything except lab and raw stock bills were bargained or bartered as filming labored for another two years, although there were weeks when nothing was filmed. 
Cartel also saved money by doing his own dangerous stunts that included taking a shotgun blast to his chest while wearing a cheap bullet-resistant vest; crashing through a glass window door; falling down a concrete cellar staircase; having a "stunt" bottle smashed across his face, then doing a barroom fight scene with a very large bar patron he met the morning of the improvised sequence. 
Runaway Nightmare features three individual songs that play during the film, including two written for the movie, "Hard to Find" and "Sunnin'", and "If You Won't Say You Love Me", written by Cartel's mother and released by Imperial Records in 1955. 
Cartel spent another year in post-production until the project arrived in 1982 as an 8460-foot answer print. Contracted with one distributor, Cartel later discovered Runaway Nightmare online as a home video, marketed by a completely different distributor (with unauthorized nude inserts spliced into several scenes) where it was released as one of the first straight-to-video VHS cassettes. 
After several years without fanfare, the "underground" film Runaway Nightmare slowly developed a loyal cult following. 
A film restoration and distribution company, Vinegar Syndrome, approached Cartel in 2013 regarding his possible interest in a modern "director's cut" (without the bizarre nudity) release of Runaway Nightmare in several forms of media. 
In early June 2014, Runaway Nightmare arrived on DVD, Ultra HD Blu-ray, and even a retro-VHS version from Tyler Babtist's Videonomicon. An audio commentary came with the new release where Cartel could finally explain his singular production backstory, scene by scene with film historian/filmmaker Howard S. Berger, moderator (film preservationist/distributor) Joe Rubin and polymath Mari Cartel. 
The next month, Runaway Nightmare premiered in its first 35 mm showing as a theatrical release, followed by a national cinema tour. 
Joe Yanick of Diabolique Magazine called the film "an enigma; a sexploitation without the nudity; a rare hybrid quasi-exploitative-horror-comedy-western-noir that has been salvaged from the past [...] let yourself go and have some fun." 
This article on a moth of the family Pterophoridae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
K A Narayan, also known as Narayan, was an Indian screenwriter who is known for many acclaimed films such as Johny Mera Naam (1970), Victoria No. 203 (1972) , Jewel Thief (1967), Geet Gaya Patharon Ne (1964), Ek Musafir Ek Hasina (1962) and many more.[citation needed] 
Lord King served as Councillor on Sandwell Metropolitan Borough Council from 1979 to 2007; he was a deputy mayor from 1982 to 1983. He was created a life peer on 22 July 1999 as Baron King of West Bromwich, of West Bromwich in the County of West Midlands. From 1999 to 2003 he was a member of the Hybrid Instruments Committee. After 2006 he was Treasurer of the All-party parliamentary group on India. 
Lord King was a member of National Advisory Group for Gun Control of National Police Service and President of the Black Country Housing and Community Services Group. He was also the Patron of the Universal Peace Federation which is an affiliate of the Unification Church. 
Lord King died of a suspected heart attack on 9 January 2013, at Euston station in London.  He was 75. 
MasterChef Australia is an Australian competitive cooking game show based on the original British MasterChef. It is produced by Shine Australia and screens on Network 10. Restaurateur and chef Gary Mehigan, chef George Calombaris and food critic Matt Preston served as the show's main judges until 2019, when they were replaced by Series 4 winner and chef Andy Allen, food critic Melissa Leong, and restaurateur and chef Jock Zonfrillo. 
MasterChef Australia has a different format from that of the original British MasterChef and MasterChef Goes Large formats. Initial rounds consist of a large number of hopeful contestants from across Australia individually "auditioning" by presenting a food dish before the three judges in order to gain one of 50 semi-final places. Entrants must be over 18 years old and their main source of income cannot come from preparing and cooking fresh food in a professional environment. 
MasterChef Australia airs five nights a week from Sunday to Thursday. Each night features a different episode format, however some episodes modify the format slightly. The typical episode formats are as follows: 
Monday episodes feature the Pressure Test. The bottom three from the previous night's challenge are given a recipe for a particular dish they are to emulate in an allocated time. Once completed they are taken in to the judges to be tasted, before all three contestants are seated in front of the judges for critiquing. The judges then eliminate the contestant out of the three that performed least adequately in the test. 
Due to the COVID-19 pandemic in Australia, the format for Series 12 was changed again, to a three-day format from mid-June, in which the winners of the Mystery Box on Monday participated in the Immunity Challenge on Tuesday. The winner of the challenge was immune from Sunday's All-In Elimination. Pressure Tests and Team Challenges were discarded and only one contestant was eliminated each week. 
The first series of MasterChef Australia was broadcast between 27 April 2009 and 19 July 2009. Applications for contestants closed on 8 January 2009, with subsequent auditions held in Perth, Brisbane, Melbourne, Adelaide and Sydney. Over 7000 people auditioned for the show. 
The Top 50 portion of the series was filmed at the Australian Technology Park in Sydney. From the Top 20 onwards, filming was moved to a studio on Doody Street in Alexandria, Sydney. The series one finale was filmed on 2 July 2009, two and a half weeks before its actual television broadcast. 
The second series of MasterChef Australia premiered on 19 April 2010, with the initial call for contestants held in mid-2009. 
Other changes to Season 2 include not showing the initial auditions, with the series beginning instead with the Top 50 which were filmed at a Redfern Train Works building in Sydney, and having a Top 24 instead of a Top 20. Also, unlike Season 1, the last 45 minutes of the finale were broadcast live. 
On 4 July 2010, Network Ten confirmed the return of MasterChef with new judge Matt Moran joining the original judges for series 3. 
MasterChef Australia premiered Sunday 6 May on Network Ten. Regular judges, chefs George Calombaris and Gary Mehigan and food critic Matt Preston, returned for Season 4. 
Network Ten confirmed in August 2012 that they have commissioned a fifth series for 2013. The program was filmed at the Melbourne Showgrounds in Ascot Vale, Victoria. Emma Dean won, with Lynton Tapp as the runner-up. 
Network Ten confirmed in August 2013 that they had recommissioned the show for another series, which aired in 2014. The program was once again filmed in Ascot Vale, Victoria at the Melbourne Showgrounds. In addition to the return of all three judges, Kylie Kwong was a guest mentor who appeared during the immunity challenges. Heston Blumenthal and Marco Pierre White joined the show for a full week of challenges. 
The eighth season premiered on 1 May 2016. It was won by Elena Duggan with Matt Sinclair as runner-up. 
The eleventh season premiered on 29 April 2019. This season, former contestants Poh Ling Yeow, Billie McKay, and Matt Sinclair replace Shannon Bennett as in-house mentors. This is the final season to feature Gary Mehigan, George Calombaris and Matt Preston as the show's judges. 
In October 2019, it was announced that Jock Zonfrillo, Melissa Leong and season four winner Andy Allen would replace Mehigan, Calombaris and Preston as series judges. It was also announced that they would be joined by previous contestants who had returned to have another chance to win the title of "Masterchef" and the A$250,000 grand cash prize. 
It was won by Justin Narayan scoring 125 points with Pete Campbell as runner-up with 124 points and Kishwar Chowdhury in third place with 114 points.  Only one ending was filmed where in some previous years two endings were filmed.  This led to speculation that the winner had been leaked and influenced betting. 
Celebrity MasterChef Australia, a spin-off featuring celebrities as contestants began production in early September 2009, and aired for ten weeks starting from 30 September 2009. The celebrity version, which features a heats and semi-finals format similar to MasterChef Goes Large, is based around weekly episodes. 
Presenter Sarah Wilson did not return to present the show. Ten states that she was dropped because "the appropriate role for Sarah was not achievable without dramatically changing the format", but Gary Mehigan, George Calombaris and Matt Preston returned as judges, Calombaris and Mehigan took Wilson's presenting role. It was won by Olympic swimmer Eamon Sullivan, who took home $50,000 for charity Swim Survive Stay Alive. 
In February 2010, executive producer Mark Fennessy stated that he doubted the spin-off would return for a second series. 
On 25 May 2021, it was announced that a second edition of Celebrity MasterChef Australia had been commissioned, 12 years after the first edition had aired, it is set to air in late 2021. Andy Allen, Melissa Leong and Jock Zonfrillo will undertake the role of judges in the new season. 
Production of a junior version of the show was initially suggested in October 2009. The first series of the show, featuring 8- to 12-year-old contestants, was filmed after the second series of MasterChef Australia. Junior MasterChef Australia is produced by Shine Australia. 
On 27 April 2020, it was announced that a third season of Junior MasterChef Australia had been commissioned for late 2020, nine years after the second series aired. Casting was open to children aged between 9 and 14 years. 
Ten began broadcast of a special all-stars version of the show on 26 July 2012 that aired during the 2012 Summer Olympics. It featured a number of returning contestants from the first three series, including series 1 and 3 winners Julie Goodwin and Kate Bracks, who revisited past challenges in order to raise money for charity. 
It was won by series 2 runner-up Callum Hann, who ultimately raised $20,000 for Cancer Council Australia. 
A spin-off based the original BBC MasterChef: The Professionals series began airing on 20 January 2013. It featured 18 professional chefs competing against each other as opposed to amateur cooks. Matt Preston and chef Marco Pierre White hosted the spin-off. 
MasterChef Australia won the award for Most Popular Reality Program at the 2010 Logie Awards. In addition, Matt Preston won the Graham Kennedy Award for Most Outstanding New Talent for his work on the program. 
Judge Matt Preston has denied that eliminations were rigged or the result of a popularity contest, and asserted that Julie had won the title because she was the better cook on the night. Goodwin herself has also asserted that her victory was not the result of rigging, insisting that the professional integrity of the three judges would be damaged if it were. 
The Official MasterChef Cookbook Volume 1 was published by Random House Australia in December 2009. It contains recipes from the series 1 Top 20 contestants and top Australian and international chefs: Martin Boetz, Donovan Cooke, Pete Evans, Manu Feildel, Guy Grossi, Alex Herbert, Matt Moran and Andrew Honeysett, Ben O'Donoghue, Adrian Richardson, Frank Shek, Emmanuel Stroobant and Adriano Zumbo. There are also behind-the-scenes stories and culinary tips and tricks. 
MasterChef Magazine, a monthly spin-off publication adopting the series' brand, went on sale in May 2010. Following a high-profile launch, the magazine exceeded its initial sales target within a short period of time, selling 90,000 copies in three days. The magazine was published by News Magazines, a subsidiary of News Limited. After losing a third of its readers in one year, the magazine was closed in October 2012 
The Arizona Historical Society (AHS) is a non-profit organization whose mission is to connect people through the power of Arizona's history. It does this through four regional divisions. Each division has a representative museum. The statewide divisions are as follows: Southern Arizona Division in Tucson, the Central Arizona Division in Tempe, the Northern Arizona Division in Flagstaff, and the Rio Colorado Division in Yuma. It was founded in 1884. 
The group was founded  as the Society of Arizona Pioneers on January 31, 1884 by physician John C. Handy, his father-in-law William Fisher Scott, and 58 other Tucson pioneers. 
With a new railroad being built and change on its way to Tucson, Arizona, pioneers worried that their stories of battles with the desert heat and the Apaches would be lost forever. The society was founded to preserve these stories and provide charitable service work to the local community as a mutual aid society. Original Historical Society members were often prominent members of the community, and their tasks with the society included attending funerals and raising money to help out widows. 
Over time, the Society evolved to provide storage for official state papers and collect the histories of many Arizona citizens. The society has faced several periods of financial difficulty, and difficulty storing their collections safely. Collections expanded beyond the capacity of facilities several times, until a large, block-long basement was created to store records and documents at the current Main Museum. 
As of 2015[update], the Society maintained several museums in the state with the financial support of over 3000 members and dozens of volunteers. 
The Arizona Historical Society currently houses a large collection of published and unpublished historical documents in its library and archives division. The collections are divided among 4 locations in Arizona, with each location specializing in certain aspects of history. The society lists its collection specialties as follows: 
"Tucson Collections Strengths: Territorial era, Southern Arizona and borderlands, business, genealogy, ranching, politics, mining, military, law, non-profit and grass roots organizations, ephemera, photographs, and maps. 
Tempe Collections Strengths: 20th Century, Maricopa County and Central Arizona, oral histories, architectural drawings, TV news reels, aviation, banking, healthcare, business, non-profit organizations, arts and culture, photographs and photographic studios. 
Yuma Collections Strengths: Territorial era to 1940s, Western Arizona, oral histories, agriculture, genealogy, military, local organizations, education, church history, early transportation (railroad, steamboats, plank road), aviation, business, Lower Colorado River, irrigation, Yuma Prison, and photographs. 
Flagstaff Collections Strengths:  Territorial era to 1950s, Northern Arizona and Colorado Plateau, business, politics, law, lumber industry, railroads, genealogy, local organizations, Indian Pow Wow records, education, healthcare, maps, oral histories  and photographs." 
AHS libraries are staffed by knowledgeable librarians who can aid in professional research or answer general research questions at the research help desk. 
The Historical Society publishes the quarterly Journal of Arizona History (originally named Arizoniana). The journal is distributed to members and contains articles about Arizona history. Photo essays and reviews are included along with standard articles. The Historical Society additionally publishes books, a list of which can be found on their website. 
Unionism in Wales favours the continuation of some form of political union between Wales and the other countries of the United Kingdom (England, Scotland and Northern Ireland), and hence is opposed to Welsh independence. 
Wales was assimilated into England by way of a series of changes and events that occurred between the Norman invasion of Wales starting in 1067, and the Laws in Wales Acts of 1535 and 1542, which effectively annexed the whole of Wales within the Kingdom of England.   
The history of the Unions is reflected in various stages of the Union Jack, which forms the flag of the United Kingdom. As a historically fragmented territory and later a possession of England, Wales never signed an act of union with any of the other countries of the United Kingdom, and is not distinguished from England within the national flag. Its position in the Union came about as a result of its relationship with the English Crown.  
The establishment of the National Assembly for Wales in 1998 confirmed Wales' position as a distinct nation, and as a recognised constituent country of the United Kingdom, as confirmed by the Office of the Prime Minister of the UK. 
Political support for the Union is widespread, with two of the three major political parties in Wales advocating remaining within the UK (the exceptions are Plaid Cymru, Propel and the Wales Green Party). Support for the Union is found in political parties on both the right and left of Welsh politics: 
The genus name Ctenucha was coined by William Kirby from the Greek meaning "having a comb", a reference to the showy antennae of some species. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball pitcher born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Adam Greenfield is an American writer and urbanist, based in London. He was born in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania in 1968. 
After leaving the Army, Greenfield took up work in the then-nascent field of information architecture for the World Wide Web, holding a succession of positions culminating in employment at the Tokyo office of Razorfish, where he was head of information architecture. 
In the 2006 and 2007 academic years, with Kevin Slavin of New York design practice area/code, he co-taught a class at New York University's Interactive Telecommunications Program called Urban Computing. In the following academic year this class was renamed Urban Experience in the Network Age and Greenfield taught it alone. 
Valle Caudina (Caudine Valley) is a densely settled Italian valley with about 69,000 inhabitants. It is located in Campania, between the Province of Benevento and the Province of Avellino. 
The comunes with "*" are located in the outskirts of the Valle Caudina (without them the population of the valley is of 52,000 circa). 
The main west entrance is the Stretta di Arpaia, where the Battle of the Caudine Forks may have happened, between the mountains Tairano and Castello; another is the Moiano's gorge. Instead, the east entrance is the passo of Sferracavallo in the comune of Montesarchio. 
Originally, in the valley there was a lake fed by the waters coming from the Taburnus and the Partenio. Ceramic remnants at San Martino Valle Caudina suggest early settlements dating back to the Bronze Age (1800-1000 BC). Around the 8th century BC, the city of Caudium was born. It was the capital of the Caudini tribe, remembered above all for the humiliating defeat of the Caudine Forks that the Samnites inflicted on the Romans in 321 BC during the Samnite Wars. 
Bill Atkinson (born March 17, 1951) is an American computer engineer and photographer.  Atkinson worked at Apple Computer from 1978 to 1990. 
He received his undergraduate degree from the University of California, San Diego, where Apple Macintosh developer Jef Raskin was one of his professors. Atkinson continued his studies as a graduate student in neurochemistry at the University of Washington. Raskin invited Atkinson to visit him at Apple Computer; Steve Jobs persuaded him to join the company immediately as employee No. 51, and Atkinson never finished his PhD. 
Around 1990, General Magic's founding, with Bill Atkinson as one of the three cofounders, met the following press in Byte magazine: 
The obstacles to General Magic's success may appear daunting, but General Magic is not your typical start-up company. Its partners include some of the biggest players in the worlds of computing, communications, and consumer electronics, and it's loaded with top-notch engineers who have been given a clean slate to reinvent traditional approaches to ubiquitous worldwide communications.
In 2007, Atkinson began working as an outside developer with Numenta, a startup working on computer intelligence. On his work there Atkinson said, "what Numenta is doing is more fundamentally important to society than the personal computer and the rise of the Internet." 
Atkinson now works as a nature photographer. Actor Nelson Franklin portrayed him in the 2013 film Jobs. 
The 1993 Major Indoor Lacrosse League season is the 7th season of the league that began on January 9, 1993, and concluded with the championship game on April 10. 1993 saw the only undefeated season in the history of the MILL/NLL; the Buffalo Bandits won all eight of their regular season games, then defeated Boston in the Divisional finals and Philadelphia in the Championship game to finish with a perfect 10-0 record. 
1993 saw no team changes from the 1992 season. The next season to see no team changes from the previous season did not occur until 2013. 
Sustainable Development Goal 10 (Goal 10 or SDG 10) is about reduced inequality and is one of the 17 Sustainable Development Goals established by the United Nations in 2015. The full title is: "Reduce inequality within and among countries". 
Inequality exist in various forms, such as economic, sex, disability, race, social inequality, and different forms of discrimination. 
Issues associated with health, pollution, and environmental justices are often inseparable with inequality. Sometimes these issues also associated with indigenous and aboriginal communities, ethnic minorities and communities of low socio-economic status (SES). Studies of environmental justice shows these communities are irregularly likely to live in environments with higher risk of exposure to pollution and toxic contamination, which possess long-term health and environmental threats. 
Globalization is also accompanied with migration, displacement and dispossession, and this often increased vulnerability of marginalized communities and groups, which negatively shaped their prospects for globalization and emancipation and widened inequality at the meantime. Efforts are still needed to improve the policy measures for orderly, safe, regular and responsible migration and mobility. 
There are also association between inequality and mental and physical health in various forms, such as status anxiety/competition, social capital, social embeddedness and cohesion. 
Measuring inequality in its individual forms is a crucial component in order to reduce inequality within and among countries. The Gini coefficient is the most frequently used measurement of socioeconomic inequality as it can significantly show the income and wealth distribution within and among countries. 
Measuring social inequality often involve more complex factors and techniques, such as measuring the social group in the quality of education received and their accessibility to higher education, their social status, marital status, and other factors that associated with inequality such as urban or rural location. 
The full title of Target 10.1 is: "By 2030, progressively achieve and sustain income growth of the bottom 40 per cent of the population at a rate higher than the national average". 
Target 10.1 has one indicator: Indicator 10.1.1 is the "Growth rates of household expenditure or income per capita among the bottom 40 per cent of the population and the total population". 
Relative poverty and inequality is the share of people living below 50 per cent of the median income level. Data from 110 high- and low-income countries showed that the median country had 14 per cent of the population with income levels below that threshold. But both rich and poor countries have high and low levels of inequality. Income inequality is not strongly correlated with either poverty or affluence, suggesting that policies promoting equality and inclusivity have universal relevance. 
The full title of Target 10.2 is to: "By 2030, empower and promote the social, economic and political inclusion of all, irrespective of age, sex, disability, race, ethnicity, origin, religion or economic or other status". 
Target 10.2 has one indicator. Indicator 10.2.1 is the "Proportion of people living below 50 per cent of median income, by sex, age and persons with disabilities". 
The full title of Target 10.3 is to: "Ensure equal opportunity and reduce inequalities of outcome, including by eliminating discriminatory laws, policies and practices and promoting appropriate legislation, policies and action in this regard". 
Target 10.3 has one indicator. Indicator 10.3.1 is the "Proportion of population reporting having personally felt discriminated against or harassed in the previous 12 months on the basis of a ground of discrimination prohibited under international human rights law". 
Women are more likely to be victims of discrimination than men. Among those with disabilities, 3 in 10 personally experienced discrimination, with higher levels still among women with disabilities. The main grounds of discrimination mentioned by these women was not the disability itself, but religion, ethnicity and sex, pointing to the urgent need for measures to tackle multiple and intersecting forms of discrimination. 
The full title of Target 10.4 is to: "Adopt policies, especially fiscal, wage and social protection policies, and progressively achieve greater equality". 
Target 10.4 has one indicator. Indicator 10.4.1 is the "Labour share of GDP, comprising wages and social protection transfers". 
The global labour income share has shown a downward trend since 2004, when it stood at 54 per cent, implying that workers are receiving a smaller proportion of the output they helped produce. In 2017, the labour income of workers in Northern Africa and Western Asia accounted for a little over a third of the region's output (36 per cent). At the other end of the spectrum, the labour income share was close to 58 per cent in Europe and Northern America. 
The full title of Target 10.5 is to: "Improve the regulation and monitoring of global financial markets and institutions and strengthen the implementation of such regulations". 
The full title of Target 10.6 is to: "Ensure enhanced representation and voice for developing countries in decision-making in global international economic and financial institutions in order to deliver more effective, credible, accountable and legitimate institutions". 
Target 10.6 has one indicator. Indicator 10.6.1 is the "Proportion of members and voting rights of developing countries in international organizations". 
These indicators measure the share of members and voting rights in international institutions which are held by developing countries. 
The full title of Target 10.7 is to: "Facilitate orderly, safe, regular and responsible migration and mobility of people, including through the implementation of planned and well-managed migration policies". 
In 2019, 54 per cent of countries have a comprehensive set of policy measures to facilitate orderly, safe, regular and responsible migration and mobility of people, based on 111 countries with available data. Migrant rights and their socioeconomic well-being have the lowest proportion of Governments reporting a wide range of policy measures, at 55 per cent and 59 per cent, respectively. 
The full title of Target 10.a is to: "Implement the principle of special and differential treatment for developing countries, in particular least developed countries, in accordance with World Trade Organization agreements". 
 Target 10.a has one indicator. Indicator 10.a.1 is the "Proportion of tariff lines applied to imports from least developed countries and developing countries with zero-tariff".
The full title of Target 10.b is to: "Encourage official development assistance and financial flows, including foreign direct investment, to States where the need is greatest, in particular least developed countries, African countries, small island developing States and landlocked developing countries, in accordance with their national plans and programs". 
Target 10.b has one indicator. Indicator 10.b.1 is the "Total resource flows for development, by recipient and donor countries and type of flow". 
The full title of Target 10.c is to: "By 2030, reduce to less than 3 per cent the transaction costs of migrant remittances and eliminate remittance corridors with costs higher than 5 per cent". 
Target 10.c has one indicator. Indicator 10.c.1 is the "Remittance costs as a proportion of the amount remitted". 
An annual report is prepared by the Secretary-General of the United Nations evaluating the progress towards the Sustainable Development Goals. 
SDG 10 is linked to many of the other SDGs, such as peaceful and inclusive societies (SDG 16), gender equality (SDG 5), poverty (SDG 1), zero hunger (SDG 2), good health and wellbeing (SDG 3), clean water and sanitation (SDG 6), sustainable cities and communities (SDG 11).[citation needed] 
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football defender born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The factory was built in 1910 by Sibirsky Mukomol Partnership. Soon, the production of the factory was awarded at the exhibitions in Paris, Rome and the Baltic Exhibition of the Society of Agriculture. 
This article about a Russian building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Most people are  Romani and belong to the Bulgarian Orthodox Church. The village Dolni Tsibar is one of the few places with a constant population increase over the years, mainly due to its high birth rate. Dolni Tsibar has a median age of 30 years old: children under 15 years old constitute around 25% of the population, while elderly (65+) constitute less than 7%. 
On 4 March 2013 Morgan issued his solo album, Orange Syringe, with Nischang providing backing vocals. 
The anime is produced by J.C.Staff and directed by Hideki Tachibana. The second season adapts volumes six to eight of the light novel. 
The opening theme for the second season is "HELLO to DREAM" by Iguchi, and the ending theme is "Sasayakana Shukusai" by Sora tob sakana. 
This article about sports in Central African Republic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
FMI Air Charter was established on 9 September 2012 operating charter flights from Yangon Airport to Nay Pyi Taw. The airline was renamed in 2015 and launched services as FMI Air in May 2015. FMI Air operated daily flights (17 x week ) between the commercial hub, Yangon International Airport and Naypyidaw International Airport. In addition to scheduled flights FMI Air offered Charter flight services to over 20 airports within Myanmar. 
 The history of Manchester City Football Club, a professional football club based in Manchester, England, dates back to the club's formation in 1880 by members of St. Mark's Church of England in West Gorton. 
Manchester City have won 28 top flight honours throughout their history: 7 league titles, 6 FA Cups, 8 League Cups, 6 FA Charity/Community Shields, and 1 European Cup Winners' Cup. 
Members of St. Mark's Church of England, West Gorton, Manchester, founded the football club that would become known as Manchester City, for largely humanitarian purposes. Two church wardens sought to curb local gang violence and alcoholism by instituting new activities for local men, whilst high unemployment plagued East Manchester, specifically Gorton. All men were welcome to join, regardless of religion. 
A church cricket club had been formed in 1875, but no equivalent for the winter months existed. To rectify this, and as part of Rector Arthur Connell's general push to intervene in social ills, church wardens William Beastow and Thomas Goodbehere, who held senior positions at the Union Iron Works, started a church football team called St Mark's (West Gorton) (sometimes written as West Gorton (St Mark's) in the winter of 1880. 
In 2020, Manchester City were fined 10 million euros by the Court of Arbitration for Sport, for failing to produce significant amounts of evidence to UEFA's Club Financial Control Body, which had been investigating whether the club had breached the UEFA Financial Fair Play Regulations. CAS found that some allegations were "time-barred" from being investigated, as they were above the five-years-old limit for such UEFA investigations, while the other allegations were unproven. 
General elections were held in the Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina on 7 October 2018 as part of the Bosnian general elections. Voters elected the 98 members of the House of Representatives of the Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina and the assemblies of the cantons of the Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina. 
This is a list of all virus species, including satellites and viroids. Excluded are other ranks, and other non-cellular life such as prions. Also excluded are common names and obsolete names for viruses. 
Ambulatory care or outpatient care is medical care provided on an outpatient basis, including diagnosis, observation, consultation, treatment, intervention, and rehabilitation services. This care can include advanced medical technology and procedures even when provided outside of hospitals. 
Ambulatory care sensitive conditions (ACSC) are health conditions where appropriate ambulatory care prevents or reduces the need for hospital admission (or inpatient care), such as diabetes or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. 
Ambulatory care services represent the most significant contributor to increasing hospital expenditures and to the performance of the health care system in most countries, including most developing countries. 
Health care organizations use different ways to define the nature of care provided as "ambulatory" versus inpatient or other types of care. 
Ambulatory care services typically consist of a multidisciplinary team of health professionals that may include (but is not limited to) physicians, nurse practitioners, nurses, pharmacists, occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech therapists, and other allied health professionals. 
Given the growth of ambulatory medicine, it has become an significant component of education for medical trainees across various specialties. Over the past decades, internal medicine residency programs across North America have made efforts to incorporate more ambulatory training to the medical education curriculum. The ambulatory medical training is focused on patient management through multidisciplinary teamwork while creating longitudinal continuity in patient care. 
Ambulatory care sensitive conditions (ACSC) are illnesses or health conditions where appropriate ambulatory care prevents or reduces the need for hospital admission. Appropriate care for an ACSC can include one or more planned revisits to settings of ambulatory care for follow-up, such as when a patient is continuously monitored or otherwise advised to return when (or if) symptoms appear or reappear.[citation needed] 
There have been concerns regarding the safety of ambulatory medicine. Some of the common potential sources of harm include errors to medications and diagnostics as well as breakdowns in communications and coordination of care. One major complication of ambulatory care that predisposes to patients to harm is the risk for missing appointments. Missed appointments are common, costly, and can lead to significant delays in both diagnosis and treatment. 
Born in Shelby County, Texas, Stephens attended the common schools in Mansfield, Texas. He graduated from Mansfield College, and from the law department of Cumberland University, Lebanon, Tennessee, in 1872. After gaining admission to the bar in 1873, he practiced in Montague, Montague County, and Vernon, Wilbarger County, Texas. He served as a member of the Texas State Senate from 1886 to 1888, and then resumed the practice of law in Vernon, Texas. 
He moved to Monrovia, California, in 1917, and died there November 18, 1924. He was interred in East View Cemetery, Vernon, Texas. Stephens County, Oklahoma, was named for him. 
In 1990 she became secretary of state in Rhineland-Palatinate, but lost this position when her party, the CDU, lost the election in 1991. Afterwards she worked for a German-Swiss consultancy company. In 2005, she was awarded the "Goldene Sportpyramide" (Golden Sport Pyramid) from the Deutsche Sporthilfe (German Sports Aid), and in 2006 she was inducted into the Germany's Sports Hall of Fame. She is a member of the German National Olympic Committee. 
Aciurina idahoensis is a species of tephritid or fruit flies in the genus Aciurina of the family Tephritidae. 
This article related to members of the insect sub-family Tephritinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The station has twin tracks, with two side platforms and a central island platform. The side platforms are used for boarding, whilst the central platform is used for alighting, a configuration that is known as the Barcelona solution. In the case of La Bonanova, the centre platform is long enough to accommodate a four car train, but the side platforms are shorter, meaning that it is only possible to board three of the train's cars from them. 
The station platforms are accessed by a single ticket hall at the western end of the station, which has street accesses to both sides the Via Augusta. A second hall at the east end of the station exists, but is now used only as an emergency exit. 
The line on which La Bonanova is located opened in 1863, but the first station on the site did not open until 1887. The current station was opened in 1952, when the line through the station was put underground. 
Directed by Ric Menello and Adam Dubin, there are numerous cameos in this video, including an unknown-at-the-time Tabitha Soren, Robert John "Mutt" Lange, Def Jam label mate LL Cool J, Flea of the Red Hot Chili Peppers, members of the punk rock band Murphy's Law, as well as the Beastie Boys' producer, Rick Rubin, who was shown wearing an AC/DC and Slayer shirt, the latter of whom were also signed to Def Jam at the time. 
In 2011, Adam Yauch directed and wrote a surreal comedic short film entitled Fight for Your Right Revisited to commemorate the 25th anniversary of the original video's release. The short film serves as a video for the single "Make Some Noise" from Hot Sauce Committee Part Two. Most of the non-sequitur dialogue between characters were a result of improvisation by the cast. 
Although "Fight for Your Right" is not performed, its outro can be heard at the beginning of the short. 
Singer/songwriter Cara Quici sampled the song and added new lyrics for her 2013 song "Fight" personally approved by Rick Rubin and licensed by Sony ATV and Universal Music Group. The "Fight" video by Cara Quici features a cameo by Dennis Rodman. 
In 1998, the song was covered by German hip hop act N.Y.C.C. as "Fight for Your Right (To Party)". It reached the top 20 in nine countries across Europe and in Australia and New Zealand. In the United Kingdom, where it peaked at number 14, it was the first song by a German hip hop group to reach the top 25. 
On August 2, 2009, Coldplay performed an acoustic piano-based version of this song during their concert on the final night of the All Points West concert series as a tribute to the Beastie Boys, who were unable to perform on opening night following Adam Yauch's announcement that he had cancer. The band performed this version again on May 4, 2012, at their concert at the Hollywood Bowl as a tribute to Yauch, who had died earlier that day. 
After winning the 2020 AFC Championship Game, Kansas City Chiefs Tight End Travis Kelce chanted "You gotta fight for your right to party!" in his postgame interview. After the Chiefs' victory in Super Bowl LIV, Kelce again used the chant from the song at the victory parade in Kansas City. The song's main chorus has since become a cultural reference among Chiefs fans, and in the 2020 season became the song played at Chiefs home games to celebrate after each touchdown scored by the team. 
The Blue Bird is a 1910 silent film, based on the 1908 play by Maurice Maeterlinck and starring Pauline Gilmer as Mytyl and Olive Walter as Tytyl.  It was filmed in England. 
This article related to a British film of the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Waitaria Bay is a locality in the Marlborough region of New Zealand. It lies on the northern side of Kenepuru Sound in the Marlborough Sounds. 
The town is one of the most isolated in the South Island to have a school. The nearest shop is about 50 minutes drive, the nearest small town, Havelock, is two hours drive, and the nearest main centre, Blenheim, is two and a half hours drive. 
Waitaria Bay School is a coeducational full primary (years 1-8) school with a decile rating of 10 and a roll of 20. The school opened in 1897. 
The town was named Palestro when it was founded in 1860, it was named in honour of the Franco-Piedmontese victory over Austria at Palestro in 1859 during the Second Italian War of Independence. It was renamed Lakhdaria after Algerian independence in honour of Mokrani Rabah Lakhdar, known as Si Lakhdar, a senior FLN leader during the Algerian War. 
The population is now around 59 009 people. Farming, construction and transportation are the main sources of employment of the local population. Some residents also commute to Algiers for work. The city is very busy, people like to do shopping and meeting in coffee shops and mosques. 
Agriculture prevails in the area, especially vegetables and olive trees on family farms, many located at the bottom of the mountains that surround the area. 
A telecommunication site is located in East of Lakhdaria that includes huge TV transmitters and receivers that is used by the Algerian television. 
The End of Men: And the Rise of Women is a book by journalist and magazine editor Hanna Rosin, based on her cover story of the same name that appeared in The Atlantic in 2010. It was published by Riverhead Books in 2012. In the book, Rosin argues that patriarchy is coming to an end. She writes about the dominance of women in US schools and workplaces. 
Carol Tavris writes in the Wall Street Journal that "[Rosin] avoids the journalistic habit of doing 'spotlight interviews' with individuals selected to support the writer's hypothesis, a practice she knows is misleading. Instead, her argument is based on substance and scholarship". 
Annalee Newitz of NPR describes the book as "a frustrating blend of genuine insight and breezy, unconvincing anecdotalism" but also that "the book manages to register a cultural shift in the process of happening, which is an exceedingly difficult task". 
Writing in The New York Times, Jennifer Homans suggests that The End of Men minimizes important issues still facing women, and that Rosin perpetuates stereotypes about what it means to be a woman such as having a greater ability than men to "sit still and focus". 
The Law Review at the Boston University School of Law published a symposium on the book titled, "Evaluating Claims about the 'End of Men'." It included an article titled, "The End of Men Is Not True," by sociologist Philip N. Cohen. 
Al Duncan is a youth advocate, educator and publisher. Recognized as an authority on the millennial generation, Duncan has spoken to more than one million youth around the world. Duncan has received the President's Volunteer Service Award, and the National PTA Lifetime Achievement Award for his outstanding service in the fields of youth development and youth empowerment. 
Beginning his adult life as a musician, Duncan left that career in order to become a chef. He began his career as a speaker in his late 20s, and today speaks about earning money, youth empowerment, and more. 
Duncan currently serves on the American InterContinental University School of Business Advisory Board, the Fulton County, Georgia Workforce Investment Board of Directors and the Fulton County Youth Council. He is also on the board of directors for the Anti-Prejudice Consortium in Atlanta, Georgia. 
Several organizations have honored Duncan with awards and memberships. One is Sigma Alpha Pi, which is also called the National Society of Leadership and Success. Duncan is also an honorary member of Delta Epsilon Iota. 
Duncan has written several publications. He is a columnist and blogger for the Black Collegian magazine. 
His Rise to Fame is a 1927 American silent drama film directed by Bernard McEveety and starring George Walsh, Peggy Shaw and Bradley Barker. A drifter meets a dancer in a cabaret and reforms his life, becoming a championship-winning boxer. 
This article about a silent drama film from the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A five-member Constituency Delineation Commission was formed under the chairmanship of former Supreme Court Justice Kamal Narayan Das to redraw the constituency boundaries to 165, a reduction from the 240 used in the 2013 elections. It submitted its report to the government on 30 August 2017. The boundaries set by this commission will remain unchanged for the next 20 years as per Article 286 (12). 
The 275 members of the legislature were elected by two methods; 165 were elected from single-member constituencies by first-past-the-post voting and 110 seats were elected by closed list proportional representation from a single nationwide constituency. Each voter received separate ballot papers for the two methods. A party or electoral alliance had to pass the election threshold of 3% of the overall valid vote to be allocated a seat under the proportional method. 
A total of 88 parties were granted ballot access under the proportional system. However, only 49 parties submitted list of proportional candidates. 
After two Madhesh based parties, Federal Socialist Forum, Nepal and Rastriya Janata Party Nepal left the alliance due to differences on seat sharing, they formed an alliance n their own and fielded in elections. 
Still, these alliances resulted loss to Nepali Congress which obtained highest number of votes in FPTP with gaining nearly 36% votes cast. In spite of this, the result went against Nepali Congress and it could not win any more than 23 seats making it third largest party per FPTP results. Therefore, many sitting ministers had to lose their seats. 
Surprisingly, Bam Dev Gautam and Narayan Kaji Shrestha lost the election even the Communist alliance obtained nearly majority. 
The governing Nepali Congress preferred the upper house to be elected by Single Transferable Voting System while the left parties preferred majority vote. Lack of consensus meant the Legislature Parliament disbanded on 14 October, as required by the constitution, without approving National Assembly Election Bill which included provisions to elect members of the upper house. 
According to Article 84 (8) of the Constitution of Nepal, at least one third of the total number of members elected to the Federal Parliament from each party must be women. Citing this provision, the Election Commission withheld announcing final results as the number of women each party needs to submit from their respective party lists could not be determined until the number of women in the upper house from each party was confirmed. 
This geographical article about a location in Erzincan District, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Liziane Bayer da Costa (born 24 January 1981) is a Brazilian politician and pastor. She has spent her political career representing her home state of Rio Grande do Sul, having served as state representative since 2019. 
Bayer was elected to the Legislative Assembly of Rio Grande do Sul in 2015. In the 2018 Brazilian general election Bayer was elected to the federal chamber of deputies from her state. 
In April 2014, Hackpad was acquired by Dropbox. In April 2015, it was announced that Hackpad would be released as open source and source code was published on GitHub in August 2015, under the Apache license 2.0. On April 25, 2017, Hackpad announced that it is to shut down on July 19, 2017, permanently migrating to Dropbox Paper. 
The Mungo Park Medal is awarded by the Royal Scottish Geographical Society in recognition of outstanding contributions to geographical knowledge through exploration and/or research, and/or work of a practical nature of benefit to humanity in potentially hazardous physical and/or social environments. It was founded in honour of the Scottish explorer Mungo Park. 
Henri Garcin (born Anton Albers; 11 April 1929) is a Belgian film actor. He has appeared in more than 100 films since 1956. 
Antara Chowdhury is an Indian singer and composer. She is a daughter of Late renowned Composer and Poet Salil Chowdhury and famous singer Late Sabita Chowdhury. She started singing at the age of 7. Her first playback was in the Hindi film 'Minoo' along with greats like Manna Dey and Asha Bhonsle. Songs like Teri Galiomein Hum Aye a duet with Manna Dey and solo O Kali Re Kali Re became very popular. 
She is trained in both Indian and Western Classical music and has assisted her father in many Hindi TV serials, including Charitraheen, Kurukshetra, and Daraar. 
Antara has sung numerous children's songs in Bengali to her credit namely 'Bulbul Pakhi Moyena Tiye','O Shona Bang,'O Ayere Chhute Aye','Ek Je Chhilo Machhi' and may others all composed and written by her Legendary father which created a history in the field of Children's songs in Bengal in the late 70's. 
Antara has released 2 Hindi albums namely 'Madhur Srmiti' from Times music (solo) and 'Man Ke Manjeere' from Virgin music (duet with Shubha Mudgal). Her last solo Bengali album 'Generations' released in 2007 from Times music was highly appreciated. This album consisted of songs of her father Late Salil Chowdhury and her brother Sanjoy Chowdhury's new compositions. 
She has also sung a duet with Sonu Nigam in the Hindi film 'Khoya Khoya Chand' called 'Ye Nigahen' composed by Shantanu Moitra which has become very popular. A few years back her duet with famous singer of Bengal, Srikanto Acharya called 'Muthor Rumaal' for the Bengali film Antoheen has been widely appreciated. 
Antara has sung a solo in the Golden Peacock Award-winning film 'Moner Manush' directed by Gautam Ghose. Her song 'Shopto Tala Bhed Korile' has been written by the legendary Lalon Fakir and composed by Gautam Ghosh himself. 
Antara aims to preserve her father's Legacy through the Salil Chowdhury Foundation of Music Trust and has published a book called Salil Rachana Shangraha along with her mother Late Sabita Chowdhury and music collector Sri Ranabir Neogi from Dey's publishing in 2013. This is a total compilation of Salil Chowdhury's Bengali songs. 
Recently Antara has sung a beautiful song in the award-winning film 'Shankhachil' directed by Gautam Ghosh based on Jibonananda Das's famous poem Shankhachil. The song is 'Abar Ashibo Phire'. 
She has also recorded a children's song for the upcoming Bengali animation film called 'Budhhu Bhutum' directed by Nitish Roy and music composed by Surojit Chatterjee which is yet to release. 
Antara has performed extensively in many parts of the world like USA, UK, Canada, Australia, Bangladesh and all over India. 
At present Antara has opened her own music school called 'Surodhwoni' in Kolkata which aims at teaching her father's music to the next generation. 
Herman Jay "Hank" Cohen (born February 10, 1932) is an American diplomat who served as United States Assistant Secretary of State for African Affairs from 1989 to 1993. 
After leaving government, Cohen served as a senior advisor to the Global Coalition for Africa before becoming a professorial lecturer at Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies for twelve years. Currently he is president and CEO of Cohen and Woods International. He also serves on the Board of Directors of Hyperdynamics Oil and Gas and as a consultant for ContourGlobal. 
Lowry has been writing about African American music since 1964 beginning with Blues Unlimited in the UK. He has since written for Blues & Rhythm (UK),  Cadence (US), Jazz Digest/HIP (US), Jazz Times (US), Juke Blues (UK), Living Blues (US), Penguin Eggs (CN), Rhythms (in Melbourne, Australia), Rolling Stone, The International Association of Jazz Record Collectors Journal (US), and Western Folklore (US), among others.  
In 2015, he was made a member of the Order of Manitoba, "for his contributions to the folk music community, and establishing and promoting music festivals and artistic venues in Manitoba and throughout North America." 
Paul Burton Steinberg (born March 21, 1940) is an American attorney and former politician in the state of Florida. 
Steinberg was born in Brooklyn, New York. He came to Florida in 1957. He graduated from the University of Miami (BBA, 1961) and from Stetson School of Law (JD, 1963). He was an editor of the business school newspaper and served on the debate team. He served in the United States Coast Guard from 1963 to 1971. He served on active duty in 1963 and was in the reserves from 1964 to 1971. He reached the rank of Petty officer third class. 
He is the former chairman of the Miami Beach Beautification Committee. He served in the Florida House of Representatives from 1972 to 1978, as a Democrat, representing the 101st district. He served in the Florida Senate from 1978 to 1982 representing the 36th district. 
James Stewart Polshek (born 1930, Akron, Ohio) is an American architect living in New York City.  He is the founder of Polshek Partnership, the firm at which he was Principal Design Partner for more than four decades. He is currently Design Counsel to the legacy firm Ennead Architects, as well as being actively engaged as design lead on multiple projects. 
Polshek enrolled in premed at Case Western Reserve University's Adelbert College 1947.  He began taking a variety of courses, including a course in the history of modern architecture.  After deciding to study architecture he enrolled at Yale University, and graduated in 1955 with a Master of Architecture degree.  He was also a Fulbright/Hayes fellow in Denmark and received a number of grants from the Graham Foundation.[citation needed] 
After he became dean of Columbia University's Graduate School of Architecture, Planning and Preservation in 1972, Western Reserve University granted his Bachelor of Science degree in 1973, forgiving the eight credits he was short. 
Polshek worked for I.M. Pei prior to starting his own firm, James Stewart Polshek Architect, in 1963. He is currently retired and maintains the title of Design Counsel to Ennead Architects. 
He served as the dean of Columbia University's Graduate School of Architecture, Planning and Preservation from 1972 to 1987. 
Polshek is unusual among top-tier architects for taking the position that architecture is more craft than fine art, and that architects have some measure of social responsibility.[citation needed] 
He has received honorary degrees from Pratt Institute (1995), the New School University Parsons School of Design (1995) and the New Jersey Institute of Technology (2002). 
John Paul De Cecco was born on April 18, 1925, in Erie, Pennsylvania. He had four siblings, and he was of Italian descent. His father was a restaurant and property owner. His three maternal uncles were members of the Mafia who "married prostitutes." 
De Cecco graduated from Allegheny College, where he earned a bachelor of science degree in biology in 1946. He subsequently earned a master's degree and a Ph.D. in European history from the University of Pennsylvania, in 1949 and 1953 respectively. He took additional coursework in educational psychology at Michigan State University. He also attended Columbia University in 1968-1970. 
De Cecco became an assistant professor of education and psychology at San Francisco State University in 1960. He eventually became a full professor of psychology. 
De Cecco resided in the Potrero Hill neighborhood of San Francisco, where he died on November 2, 2017, at age 92. He was described as a "pioneer of sexuality studies" who had been "in the forefront of three decades of change in gay-related academia". 
The Men's 400 metre freestyle competition of the 2016 FINA World Swimming Championships (25 m) was held on 6 December 2016. 
The Anglican Church of St Peter at Farmington in the Cotswold District of Gloucestershire, England was built in the 12th century. It is a grade I listed building. 
The church was built, with a nave and chancel, in the 12th century and the north aisle added in the 13th. The tower was built in the late 15th or early 16th century. It underwent Victorian restoration in 1890 and 1891. 
The stone building consists of a nave, north aisle, a chancel with a vestry on the north side and a three-stage west tower. The bells in the tower were restored in 1902 in memory of Robert Drysdale who died in the Boer War. 
The interior of the porch, chancel arch and arches in the three-bay nave are carved with chevron patterns. There is a 16th-century piscina in the chancel. The octagonal font dates from 1784. 
Among the memorials in the church is one to the men of the village who died in World War I. In 2014 a new stained glass window, dedicated to Bishop Michael Mann and known as "Candles of Life", was opened by Princess Anne. 
In the churchyard is the Waller family tomb, the Waller's having been the local dignatories for several generations. 
Kaha Creek is in the traditional territory of the Tlingit Taku River Tlingit First Nation and the Tahltan First Nation, of the Tahltan people. 
Nitro World Games 2016 was an action sports competition by Nitro Circus that took place on July 16, 2016, at the Rice-Eccles Stadium in Salt Lake City, Utah. This was the inaugural edition of the Nitro World Games. 
Patrick Wiencek (born 22 March 1989) is a German handballer for THW Kiel and the German national team. 
Enrique Wilson Libertario Rapesta Fabregat (April 12, 1919 - June 2009) was an Argentine gymnast who competed in the 1948 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Argentine artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Miss Teen USA 2019 was the 37th Miss Teen USA pageant. It was held at the Grand Sierra Resort in Reno, Nevada on April 28, 2019, and was hosted by Miss USA 2014 Nia Sanchez and Tim Tialdo. Hailey Colborn of Kansas crowned her successor Kaliegh Garris of Connecticut at the end of the event. 
The 2019 competition served as the second consecutive time that the pageant has been held concurrently with the Miss USA competition. For the first time, both the preliminary and final competitions were held on the same day. 
51 delegates from the 50 states and the District of Columbia were selected in state pageants held from September 2018 to January 2019. 
Prior to the final competition, the delegates competed the preliminary competition, which involved private interviews with the judges and a presentation show where they competed in athletic wear and evening gown. It was held on April 28 at the Grand Sierra Resort in Reno-Tahoe. For the first time since 2017, the preliminary round was broadcast. 
During the final competition, the Top 15 finalists competed in athletic wear, evening gown and in a customized final question round, and the winner was decided by a panel of judges. 
The pageant was webcast on the pageant's Facebook and YouTube pages, as downloadable live events available on the Asian and American PlayStation Stores for PlayStation 4 consoles and on Xbox Live in 41 regions for the Xbox One line of consoles via the Facebook Video application, with support for 4K Ultra HD, Dolby Vision and HDR10 video[a] and Dolby Atmos spatial audio. 
This biographical article relating to Luxembourgian cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ebbw Vale is a suburb of Ipswich in the City of Ipswich, Queensland, Australia. In the 2016 census, Ebbw Vale had a population of 508 people. 
The suburb is bounded to the north by the Main Line railway and to south-east by the Cunningham Highway. 
Ebbw Vale is named after a coal mine which formerly operated in the area. The coal mine was named after the Welsh town of Ebbw Vale (Welsh: Glynebwy). 
In 1927, Stafford Brothers of Bundamba were selling 38 suburban blocks in the Whitwood Estate, bounded by Brisbane Road to the north-west, Cairns Road to the south and on both sides of the Robert Street. 
Ebbw Vale railway station provides access to regular Queensland Rail City network services to Brisbane, Ipswich and Rosewood via Ipswich. 
There are no schools in Ebbw Vale. The nearest primary schools are in neighbouring Bundamba and with another in nearby Riverview. The nearest secondary school is Bundamba State Secondary College in Bundamba. 
Miles Davis All Star Sextet (PRLP 182) is a 10 inch LP album by Miles Davis, released in 1954 by Prestige Records. The two side-long tracks were recorded at Rudy Van Gelder's Studio, Hackensack, New Jersey, April 29, 1954. 
After the 10" LP format was discontinued, both tracks were included on Side 1 of the 12" album Walkin' (PRLP 7076). 
In a letter to R.B. Fuller dated 1 August 1913, McCormick described the circumstances that inspired him to write "Advance Australia Fair": 
The earliest known sound recording of "Advance Australia Fair" appears in The Landing of the Australian Troops in Egypt (circa 1916), a short commercial recording dramatising the arrival of Australian troops in Egypt en route to Gallipoli. 
Before its adoption as Australia's national anthem, "Advance Australia Fair" had considerable use elsewhere. For example, Australia's national broadcaster, the Australian Broadcasting Commission, used it to announce its news bulletins until 1952. It was also frequently played at the start or end of official functions. Towards the end of World War II it was one of three songs played in certain picture theatres, along with "God Save the King" and the US national anthem. 
Other songs and marches have been influenced by "Advance Australia Fair", such as the Australian vice-regal salute. 
"Advance Australia Fair", with modified lyrics and reduced to two verses (see development of lyrics), was adopted as the Australian national anthem by the Labor government of Bob Hawke, coming into effect on 19 April 1984. At the same time, "God Save the Queen" became known as the royal anthem, and continues to be played alongside the Australian national anthem at public engagements in Australia that are attended by the Queen or members of the Royal Family. 
Even though any personal copyright of Peter Dodds McCormick's original lyrics has expired, as he died in 1916, the Commonwealth of Australia claims copyright on the official lyrics and particular arrangements of music. Non-commercial use of the anthem is permitted without case-by-case permission, but the Commonwealth government requires permission for commercial use. 
The orchestral arrangement of "Advance Australia Fair" that is now regularly played for Australian victories at international sporting medal ceremonies, and at the openings of major domestic sporting, cultural and community events, is by Tommy Tycho, an immigrant from Hungary. It was commissioned by ABC Records in 1984 and then televised by Channel 10 in 1986 in their Australia Day broadcast, featuring Julie Anthony as the soloist. 
The national anthem was changed on 1 January 2021 by proclamation of the Governor-General on the advice of the Federal Executive Council. The change prior to that was on 19 April 1984. 
The lyrics of "Advance Australia Fair", as modified by the National Australia Day Council, were officially adopted in April 1984. The lyrics were updated as of 1 January 2021 in an attempt to recognise the legacy of Indigenous Australians, with the word "one" in the second line replacing the previous "young". The lyrics are now as follows: 
Australians all let us rejoice, For we are one and free; We've golden soil and wealth for toil; Our home is girt by sea; Our land abounds in nature's gifts Of beauty rich and rare; In history's page, let every stage Advance Australia Fair. In joyful strains then let us sing, Advance Australia Fair. 
Beneath our radiant Southern Cross We'll toil with hearts and hands; To make this Commonwealth of ours Renowned of all the lands; For those who've come across the seas We've boundless plains to share; With courage let us all combine To Advance Australia Fair. In joyful strains then let us sing, Advance Australia Fair. 
Australia's sons, let us rejoice, For we are young and free; We've golden soil and wealth for toil, Our home is girt by sea; Our land abounds in nature's gifts Of beauty rich and rare; In history's page, let every stage Advance Australia fair. In joyful strains let us sing, Advance, Australia fair. 
When gallant Cook from Albion sail'd, To trace wide oceans o'er, True British courage bore him on, Til he landed on our shore. Then here he raised Old England's flag, The standard of the brave; "With all her faults we love her still" "Britannia rules the wave." In joyful strains then let us sing, Advance, Australia fair. 
While other nations of the globe Behold us from afar, We'll rise to high renown and shine Like our glorious southern star; From England soil and Fatherland, Scotia and Erin fair, Let all combine with heart and hand To advance Australia fair. In joyful strains then let us sing Advance, Australia fair. 
Should foreign foe e'er sight our coast, Or dare a foot to land, We'll rouse to arms like sires of yore, To guard our native strand; Britannia then shall surely know, Though oceans roll between, Her sons in fair Australia's land Still keep their courage green. In joyful strains then let us sing Advance Australia fair. 
Beneath our radiant Southern Cross, We'll toil with hearts and hands; To make our youthful Commonwealth, Renowned of all the lands; For loyal sons beyond the seas We've boundless plains to share; With courage let us all combine To advance Australia fair. In joyful strains then let us sing Advance Australia fair! 
The lyrics of "Advance Australia Fair", as modified by the National Australia Day Council and officially adopted on 19 April 1984, were as follows: 
Australians all let us rejoice, For we are young and free; We've golden soil and wealth for toil; Our home is girt by sea; Our land abounds in nature's gifts Of beauty rich and rare; In history's page, let every stage Advance Australia Fair. In joyful strains then let us sing, Advance Australia Fair. 
Beneath our radiant Southern Cross We'll toil with hearts and hands; To make this Commonwealth of ours Renowned of all the lands; For those who've come across the seas We've boundless plains to share; With courage let us all combine To Advance Australia Fair. In joyful strains then let us sing, Advance Australia Fair. 
These lyrics were updated on 1 January 2021 to the current version, in which "young" in the second line is replaced with "one" to reflect the pre-colonial presence of Indigenous Australians. 
The fourth line of the anthem, "our home is girt by sea", has been criticised for using the so-called archaic word "girt". Additionally, the lyrics and melody of the Australian national anthem have been criticised in some quarters as being dull and unendearing to the Australian people. National Party senator Sandy Macdonald said in 2001 that "Advance Australia Fair" is so boring that the nation risks singing itself to sleep, with boring music and words impossible to understand. 
Political sentiment is divided. Craig Emerson of the Australian Labor Party has critiqued the anthem, former MP Peter Slipper has said that Australia should consider another anthem, in 2011 former Victorian Premier Jeff Kennett suggested "I Am Australian", while former Australian Labor Party leader Kim Beazley defended it. 
In November 2020, NSW Premier Gladys Berejiklian proposed changing one word in the opening couplet, from "we are young and free" to "we are one and free", to acknowledge Australia's Indigenous history. The proposal was supported by the federal Minister for Indigenous Australians, Ken Wyatt, and in December 2020 Prime Minister Scott Morrison announced that this change would be adopted from 1 January 2021, having received approval from Governor-General David Hurley. 
Lyrics for the anthem have been written twice in the Dharug language, an Australian Aboriginal language spoken around Sydney by the Dharawal people. 
This version was first performed in July 2010, at a Rugby League State of Origin match in Sydney, though there was some opposition: 
We Australian mob are going to have a good dance We good young fellows Good earth and speared a lot of wallabies a lot of water associated with this earth earth having a lot of animals and waratahs go along the path Australians Australian mob go together we say and sing out Australian mob go together. 
In December 2020, the following lyrics were sung in the Dharug language, followed by the anthem in English, before a Rugby Union international between Australia and Argentina: 
Australiagal ya'nga yabun Eora budgeri Yarragal Bamal Yarrabuni Ngurra garrigarrang Nura mari guwing bayabuba Diara-murrahmah-coing Guwugu yago ngabay burrabagur Yirribana Australiagal Garraburra ngayiri yabun Yirribana Australiagal 
In 2011, about fifty different Christian schools from different denominations came under criticism for singing an unofficial version of the song written by the Sri Lankan immigrant Ruth Ponniah in 1988.  The song replaced the official second verse of Advance Australia Fair with lyrics that were Christian in nature.  
Minister for School Education, Early Childhood and Youth Peter Garrett and chief executive of the National Australia Day Council Warren Pearson admonished the schools for modifying the lyrics of the anthem, and the Australian Parents Council and the Federation of Parents and Citizens' Association of NSW called for a ban on the modified song. Stephen O'Doherty, chief executive of Christian Schools Australia, defended the use of the lyrics in response. 
Chatswood Mall (also known as Victoria Avenue Mall) is a pedestrian mall on Victoria Avenue in the Sydney, Australia suburb of Chatswood. It connects the Chatswood Interchange to the Chatswood shopping district and The Concourse. 
In 2010 Willoughby City Council lodged a  $4.1 million upgrade of Chatswood Mall. Vibrant lighting, sculptural elements, tree plantings and fresh new street furniture palettes have been installed in Chatswood Mall. The upgrade was completed in 2011. 
The Melody Markets are held each Thursday and Friday in Chatswood Mall and feature food and craft stalls and live music visited by more than 30,000 people daily. 
Eustace was born in Burgundy and became a monk at Luxeuil. When Columbanus, the founder of Luxeuil, was banished from the Kingdom of Burgundy, on account of his reproving the morals of King Theuderic II, the exiled abbot recommended his community to choose Eustace as his successor. Subsequently, Columbanus settled at Bobbio in Italy. After the death of Theuderic, Clothaire II sent Eustace to Bobbio to ask Columbanus to return, but he declined. 
During his abbacy, the monastery contained about 600 monks and produced both bishops and saints, including Acarius, Amatus, Audomar, and  Romaric.  Eustace was noted for his humility, continual prayer, and fasting.  He was succeeded as abbott by Waldebert. 
A tradition states that he cured Sadalberga of blindness. Upon returning from Bavaria, her father, Gundoin, Duke of Alsace provided hospitality to the abbot on his travels. Duke Gundoin and his wife brought two of their sons for the abbot's blessing but were hesitant to present the blind child. Through the prayers of Eustace the child was cured of her blindness. He is said to have also procured a cure for St. Burgundofara. 
An indirect view of animal vaccinations is seen through smallpox. This is because the vaccine given to humans was animal based. Smallpox was a deadly disease most known for its rash and high death rate of 30% if contracted. 
Edward Jenner tested his theory in 1796, that if a human had already been infected with cowpox that they would be protected from smallpox. It proved to be true and thus started the pathway to the eradication of the disease. 
Through the World Health Organisation's eradication effort, at least 80% of people were vaccinated in every country. Subsequently case finding and then ring vaccination was used, resulting in smallpox becoming the first eradication of a disease through vaccination in 1980. 
The main issues in relation to the vaccination of animals is access and availability. Vaccines are the most cost-effective measure in preventing disease in livestock populations, although the logistics of distributing vaccines to marginalised populations is still a challenge. 
Most smallholder farmers' (SHFs) livestock in marginalised populations (MPs) die as a result of a disease, they do not reach their full potential, or they transmit a disease. The root of this issue could be prevented or controlled by increasing the accessibility to animal vaccines. Livestock are necessary to an estimated 600 to 900 million poor farmers in the developing world. This is because the animals provide food, income, financial reserve and status. 
Some other issues include but are not limited to: economic barriers, political barriers, technical and scientific barriers, regulatory barriers, field use barriers, and social and perception barriers. 
There are possible solutions in terms of the issues in the sector of animal vaccinations. These include innovations in both the scientific and the regulatory fields. It has been suggested that regulations are converged between regions and all animal vaccines can be standardised with the same RNA or DNA backbone. It has been found that there needs to be a better mutual understanding between regulators, academia and industry. 
Some other solutions include: free rabies vaccine programs, subsidies as needed, form partnerships across regions (mainly in terms of vaccine banks), a decrease in government taxes, providing positive incentives for disease recording, and building partnerships between global and local manufacturers. 
The production of vaccines for animals and humans has always been linked, this relationship has been coined 'One Health', as at least 61% of all human pathogens originate from animals. Two main examples of this link are the rabies and smallpox vaccines. In many cases vaccinating animals is important not only to the animals' health but also to human health and prosperity. The term zoonotic disease defines a disease that can be transferred from animals to humans. 
The proactive approach of vaccinating stray dogs, which helps to prevent the disease at its source, has been seen to be the most cost-effective prevention of rabies. In Bangladesh there was a mass dog vaccination campaign between 2010 and 2013, this resulted in a 50% decrease in rabies related deaths. 
The World Health Organisation (WHO) has created the campaign of 'Zero by 30', to reduce the number of humans that die from dog related rabies to zero by 2030. 
Pets has grown at a fast rate over time as owners are concerned for their companion animals' health. In contrast farmed animal vaccines generally only produced when there is a zoonotic disease or it had a significant effect on international trade. Rather than producing for the sole reason of caring for the animal such as with pets, farmed animals are vaccinated for human safety and economic means. 
This clearly links to pharmacovigilance (monitoring the effects of licensed drugs). The largest database being the Veterinary Medicines Directorate (VMD) in the UK. Although, the vast majority reported were in terms of companion animals. 
There is no standard metric for quantifying the global burden of animal diseases, no standard method for determining the cost effectiveness of a certain animal vaccine, and no cost-effectiveness thresholds in general. Thus, it can be difficult to prioritise animal vaccine development. 
As a result of less regulation, some vaccines have been found to contain impurities. An example of this was the rabies vaccine containing a significant amount of Bovine serum albumin (BSA). BSA can cause severe allergic reactions that can lead to death. 
Domestic chickens have been vaccinated against Pasteurella anatis using bacterial outer membrane vesicles purified by hydrostatic filtration dialysis. Several such vaccines have successfully produced immunity. Antenucci et al 2020 demonstrates the most consistent product and effective immune provocation among HFD OMV processes, but overall HFD has yet to prove itself against other vaccine production techniques. Nonetheless it is a very promising line of research as of 2021[update]. 
The Vaccinations Guidelines Group (VGG) of the World Small Animal Veterinary Association (WSAVA) have defined the core, non-core and not recommended vaccinations for dogs and cats. 
Core vaccines protect animals against severe global diseases. Where rabies is endemic the associated vaccine is treated as being in the core category. 
His stature and importance as a liberal leader with much regional power was one of the factors that led to the creation of the State of Guerrero in 1849. He was named its first (interim) governor, and after elections in 1850, he became its first constitutional governor. He served in that position until 1853. 
One of his concerns throughout his career, both military and political, was the return of lands to the Indigenous peoples of Mexico, and combating the oligarchic centralism that divided and caused huge losses to the country in favour of a liberal, republican and federal system. 
I entered the presidency a poor man, and a poor man I leave it, with the satisfaction that I do not bear the censure of the public because I was dedicated from an early age to personal labor, to work the plow to maintain my family, without the need for public offices where others enrich themselves by outrages to those in misery.
Ernie Allen OBE (born 1946) is an attorney who served as the President & CEO of the National Center for Missing & Exploited Children (NCMEC) for 23 years until June 2012, and the International Centre for Missing & Exploited Children (ICMEC) until 2014. 
He is a graduate of the University of Louisville where he became a member of Phi Kappa Tau fraternity.   Allen received his Juris Doctorate from the University of Louisville in 1972 and passed the Kentucky bar exam that same year. 
From 1973 to 1983 he was the director of the Louisville Crime Commission and from 1983 to 1985 he was director of safety for Louisville.  From 1985 to 1989 he was the chief administrative officer for Jefferson County, Kentucky. 
Allen served as President & CEO of both NCMEC and the International Centre for Missing & Exploited Children (ICMEC) for 15 years.  Allen retired from NCMEC in 2012, and in 2014 announced his retirement from ICMEC as well. 
Allen is a member of the Advisory Board for WeProtect which is a global non-profit cooperation with the goal to protect children online and stop the crime of online child sexual abuse and exploitation. 
In June 2021, he was appointed Honorary Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE), for services to the protection of children in the UK. 
To parents, "our basic message is get that [personal computer] out of the bedroom and put it in a public place and set some limits and know what your kids are doing." 
This biographical article about a United States activist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Savage was born in Streamstown, Ballisodare, County Sligo on 12 October 1897. He was the youngest son of Michael Savage who was known locally as a Fenian activist and Bridget Savage; formerly Gildea.  After leaving school he worked as an apprentice grocer in Sligo Town before committing himself to the fight for Irish Independence. 
The plan was for Martin Savage, Tom Kehoe and Dan Breen to push a hay-cart halfway across the road and then, after the out-rider and the first car had passed, they would push it the rest of the way across the road, thereby completely blocking the path of the remaining vehicles. They had been informed that Lord French was to be in the second car and this car they intended to attack with Mills Bombs and rifle fire. 
As they pushed the hay-cart across the road their plan was almost foiled as a member of the Royal Irish Constabulary (RIC) disturbed them, telling them to move on. One of them threw a grenade at him, although it didn't explode it struck the police officer on the head, knocking him unconscious. The police officer was then dragged from the road and the attack went ahead as planned. 
Savage's body was taken by British military and an inquest was held into his death. The inquest was attended by his brother and his employer William Kirk, who described the dead paramilitary as "a steady, sober and industrious young man, gentlemanly in manner and extremely courteous." 
After the inquest, Savage's body was handed over to his relatives. His remains lay overnight at Broadstone Station before departing for Sligo where it was met at Collooney railway station by a large crowd. His coffin, draped in an Irish Tricolour, was carried over two miles at shoulder height to his family's burial ground. It was buried with military honours in his native Ballisodare, County Sligo. 
Breen noted that "the cortege was several miles long, the Parish Priest attended and recited the last prayer, while the Royal Irish Constabulary, armed with guns, surrounded the graveyard. "However, I suppose, this was the best tribute they could have paid to a gallant soldier, even though they did not mean it that way". 
In 1948, the National Graves Association erected a memorial to Savage close to the site of the ambush at Ashtown Roundabout. There is an annual commemoration of his death at the site of the ambush. 
There have also been a number of streets and public places named after him including Martin Savage Place in County Meath, Martin Savage Road and the home of St. Oliver Plunkett's Eoghan Ruadh GAA club, Martin Savage Park in County Dublin and Martin Savage Terrace near the centre of Sligo Town. 
Born in 1822, near Darien, Georgia, McIntosh read law. He was a planter in Florida. He entered private practice in Jacksonville, Florida from 1850 to 1586. 
McIntosh was nominated by President Franklin Pierce on February 27, 1856, to a seat on the United States District Court for the Northern District of Florida vacated by Judge Isaac H. Bronson. He was confirmed by the United States Senate on March 11, 1856, and received his commission the same day. His service terminated on January 3, 1861, due to his resignation. 
Following his resignation from the federal bench, McIntosh served as a Judge of the Confederate District Court for the District of Florida starting in 1861. He died on June 18, 1868, in Pensacola, Florida. 
Truth in 24 II: Every Second Counts is a 2012 documentary film detailing Audi's preparation for the 2011 24 Hours of Le Mans. The film is based on the documentary Truth in 24 which detailed Audi's preparation for the 2008 24 Hours of Le Mans. 
Truth in 24 II: Every Second Counts premiered on-on air on SpeedTV on May 5, 2012. The film was also released for free download on iTunes. 
In 1524 the comital title passed to Gabriel von Salamanca, a favourite of the Habsburg archduke Ferdinand I, who had a lavish new residence, present-day Porcia Castle, built in Spittal from about 1530 onwards. Again damaged by an earthquake and a storm in 1690, Ortenburg Castle decayed. In 1976, the ruins were secured and made accessible to the public. 
Lucas and Sami soon find themselves attracted to other people. Sami starts crushing on Austin, and Lucas becomes interested in Sami's sister, Carrie (Christie Clark). 
Lucas and Sami scheme to break up Austin and Carrie's relationship so they could have them for themselves.  Because he agrees to help Sami, she helps Lucas find out who his real father is. His mother Kate Roberts has told Lucas that his father was a successful military man and graduate of West Point Academy but he knows she is lying. In return, Lucas agrees to take Sami to the spring fling wearing his academy uniform and help her make Austin jealous. 
Soon, it is revealed that Bill Horton is Lucas's father. Feeling very betrayed and let down, he pushes his mother away. In the process, Lucas gains a lot of family in the form of the Hortons. 
Lucas wants custody of his son. However, Sami gets in his way, claiming that Lucas has abused Will, and that she has witnessed it. Sami gets a restraining order against Lucas. 
Lucas begins to date Carrie, and Sami begins to date Austin, and this leads to the eventual marriage of Lucas and Carrie, and the near marriage of Austin and Sami. But a mysterious gloved hand leaves a note that warns Sami not to go through with her wedding to Austin, or it will be revealed that Sami actually blackmailed Lexie into telling Carrie that she could not bear children. 
Sami is attracted to her new neighbor, EJ Wells (James Scott), and after her wedding disaster, they kiss for the first time. But Sami then discovers that not only is EJ the son of the villainous Stefano DiMera (Joseph Mascolo), but that he is also sleeping with Kate. 
On May 21, 2013, Sami and Lucas became grandparents to Arianna, Will's daughter with Gabi Hernandez; and on April 3, 2014, they are proud parents at the wedding of their son Will (now Guy Wilson), to Sonny Kiriakis (Freddie Smith). 
In October 2014, EJ is shot dead, and Lucas comforts Sami. In order to get the children away from Stefano, Sami relocates to California with Alllie, Johnny, and Sydney (and Will and Arianna accompany them for the first few weeks). 
On October 9, 2015, Will's body is found on the floor of his apartment in Salem. He has apparently been murdered (by strangulation), and the first-responders declare that he is dead. Sami returns to Salem for Will's funeral. Sami and Lucas go to the morgue together, and grieve over their son's body; and they give eulogies at his funeral. 
The 1st Lo Nuestro Awards ceremony, presented by Univision honoring the best Latin music of 1988 and 1989 took place on May 31, 1989 at the Knight Center, in Miami, Florida, United States. The ceremony was broadcast in the United States and Latin America by Univision. 
Scott grew up in the wheatbelt town of Walgoolan and after completing her teaching qualification she returned to the country as a teacher. 
After entering parliament Scott acted as the shadow minister for Culture and the Arts (March 2005 - April 2006), shadow minister for Censorship and Children (March 2005 to present) and shadow minister for the Arts (April 2006 to present). 
In February 2008 Scott announced that she would retire from politics at the next state election and would not seek preselection. 
Marc Collat (born 24 May 1950) is a Martinican-French professional football coach and former player who last managed Haiti. 
This biographical article relating to French football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to association football from Martinique is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The character is an obnoxious, deluded and uncouth satire of a romantic singer characterized in a commedia dell'arte style. Wilfredo has acquired a cult status, particularly among music festival audiences and on the alternative cabaret and comedy circuit in London. Roper has toured the character internationally, performing in Spain, Italy, the Czech Republic, Germany, Hungary, Slovakia, South Africa, Australia and Argentina. 
Wilfredo's life story is juxtaposed with real life historical events into which Wilfredo is fictionally placed: an appearance at the Benidorm International Song Contest Festival for example is claimed, as is a friendship and a near collaboration with Serge Gainsbourg. Throughout his performances Wilfredo introduces songs from a fictional back catalogue of bestselling albums, with titles ranging from El Chico En El Toro (the Boy on the Bull) to Solo Para Las Damas (Only for the Ladies). 
The boorish and outlandish Wilfredo is delusional, believing himself to be the apotheosis of masculinity and all that is attractive to women. This arrogance is counterbalanced by a charm which in turn endears him to audiences. The origin of the name lies in Latin America, meaning 'to desire peace'. 
An appearance in the first series of Rufus Hound's What's So Funny? for BBC Radio 7 (now BBC Radio 4 Extra) was enough to initiate further interest in the character from radio audiences, while an appearance at the E4 Udderbelly for Arthur Smith's Pissed Up Chat Show (sold to audiences as the only show where the host is sober but all his guests are drunk) followed successfully in July 2011. 
In June 2011 the first of five editions of Wilfredo... and Other Beautiful Creatures was staged at the Phoenix Artist Club in Soho. Headed by Wilfredo and featuring a variety of musical and comic guests, the show took place each month in the basement club. Guests included the Pajama Men, Isy Suttie, Barry from Watford, Loretta Maine, Lewis Schaffer and Lenny Beige. 
On 25 December 2011, Wilfredo recorded the Christmas Day edition of The Comedy Club for BBC Radio 4 Extra. 
In February 2012 the first performance of The Wonderful World of Wilfredo was presented at London's BAC, programmed for the N20 Comedy Festival. In April Wilfredo guested at the Camden Roundhouse for a short season in performances curated by Scottee for CircusFest 2012. On 6 July Wilfredo performed in Arthur Smith's Benefit for the Royal Yacht at the E4 Udderbelly at the Southbank Centre, an alternative Queen's Diamond Jubilee Concert. 
Wilfredo embarked on a Spring tour of the Asia-Pacific region in 2015, having opened at the Adelaide Fringe on 1 March and giving performances in Manila, Philippines, Singapore and at the Melbourne International Comedy Festival. 
On 6 July, Wilfredo Unchained: Live in California was released worldwide as a download-only concert album, originally recorded in Petaluma, California in April 2014. 
Presently Wilfredo makes regular weekend appearances at the Slipper Room, a vaudeville and variety theatre in the Lower East Side of Manhattan, New York City. According to a piece by the British comedy blogger John Fleming published in December 2015, Wilfredo will appear in a feature film entitled The Mel and Fanny Movie, directed by James Habacker. Shooting is to begin in New York City early 2016. 
 Secunder Kermani is a British journalist who is the BBC correspondent in Pakistan and Afghanistan.  He was previously a reporter on the BBC's flagship current affairs programme Newsnight. 
Secunder Kermani was born in the United Kingdom and is of Pakistani descent. Kermani attended Dulwich College and then graduated with a first class honours degree in History and Spanish from the University of Manchester, and a Masters in TV Journalism from Goldsmiths, University of London.[citation needed] 
Kermani began reporting for the BBC's Newsnight programme in 2014. Many of his reports focused on the growth of the militant group the Islamic State in Iraq and Syria (ISIS), and Western recruits to the organisation. He secured a number of exclusive interviews with members of ISIS including British jihadist Omar Hussain, and Australian suicide bomber Jake Bilardi, as well as with relatives of other ISIS fighters. 
In February 2018 Kermani was appointed the BBC's correspondent in Pakistan and Afghanistan. He has interviewed Nobel Peace Prize winner Malala Yousafzai, former Prime Minister of Pakistan Nawaz Sharif, current Pakistani Prime Minister Imran Khan, the President of Sri Lanka Maithripala Sirisena, and chief negotiator of the Afghan Taliban, Abbas Stanikzai. 
Kermani has also been a reporter on an episode of the BBC's flagship documentary strand Panorama, and been a presenter on the BBC Asian Network radio station. 
In 2021, Kermani was one of the main correspondents from the BBC covering the advance of the Taliban, the Fall of Kabul and the subsequent events. 
Song Shanshan (born 25 March 1987) is a former professional tennis player. She won six ITF titles, all in doubles, including two $25k tournaments. 
Song made her WTA Tour main-draw debut in the doubles at the 2006 Guangzhou International Open, where she and Chen Yanchong made the quarterfinals, with a win over future world number one doubles player Elena Vesnina and her partner Anna Chakvetadze. 
The 1986 FIFA World Cup qualification UEFA Group 7 was a UEFA qualifying group for the 1986 FIFA World Cup. The group comprised Iceland, Scotland, Spain and Wales. 
The Tzuf Dvash Synagogue is a Sephardic synagogue which was founded in 1860 under Ottoman Empire rule in the Jewish Quarter of the Old City of Jerusalem. Today it is located at 15 Plugat ha-Kotel Street. 
During the 19th century, a greater number of Jews arrived in Jerusalem from the North African countries. Through Ben Shimon's influence, the group broke off from the greater Sephardic community of Jerusalem and established the Westerners' Synagogue (as opposed to the Eastern Mizrahi Jews) in 1860. The building also contained the community's Talmud Torah and an old age home. 
The community's property register, which was written after Ben Shimon's death in 1879, listed a yard with two synagogues, with the Ben Tzuf synagogue described as the "large and special one." The register adds that people would rise each midnight to study at the synagogue. The upper floor contained the Talmud Torah, which consisted of three rooms. The lower floor housed the meeting room of the community council, as well as two small rooms in which lived the widows who cleaned the yard. 
After the 1948 war, the building was under Jordanian rule, along with the entire Old City of Jerusalem. Though the building was looted, it remained standing. After the Six-Day War, the building was refurbished and in 1980 it was restored as a house of prayer. 
The domed rooms were rededicated in 1988 by the French community. The building also serves as a yeshiva. 
Matt Austin (born Matthew Sadowski;[citation needed] 20 April 1978) is a Canadian actor, best known for his role as Bridge Carson, the Green Ranger (later Blue Ranger) from the children's television series Power Rangers S.P.D.. He returned in 2007 as the Red Ranger in the Power Rangers Operation Overdrive "Once a Ranger" 15th anniversary team-up two-part episode. In addition to acting, he is also a writer, musician, and filmmaker. 
Austin communicates frequently with the Power Rangers fanbase, and was a guest at Power Morphicon in June 2007, where he interviewed guests and shot footage of the interviews with his own camera. Recently, he revealed plans to make a documentary on the Power Rangers fandom called MOR-FAN-ONIMAL. However, according to his Twitter account, production has ceased due to the funding not being put together. 
Austin's "Power Rangers" character, Bridge, displays a particular fondness for buttered toast by wiggling the fingers on his right hand and uttering the word "buttery" as he does so. This reference stems from Austin's own fondness for Indian butter chicken. His character also wears gloves on his hands due to his inability to control his powers, though in reality, the gloves are used to conceal the tattoo that Matt has on his hands 
Canada's Alliance Releasing has picked up worldwide rights to Don't You Forget About Me, a 75-minute documentary centered on late filmmaker John Hughes starring and directed by Austin. It chronicles Austin's recent road trip to the suburbs of Illinois, where he attempted to track down Hughes, who at that point had not written or directed a movie in more than a decade. The project features interviews with Ally Sheedy, Judd Nelson, Mia Sara, Kelly Le Brock and Andrew McCarthy. 
The College of National Security (also referred to as the National College of Cyber Security) was a proposed cyber security school for 16-19 year-olds, scheduled to open in September 2020 at Bletchley Park. 
The initiative to create the school emerged from Qufaro, a not-for-profit organisation created by representatives of Raytheon, BT Security, the Institute of Information Security Professionals, and National Museum of Computing. 
The college was to be located in Block G of Bletchley Park which was being renovated in 2017 with funding by the Bletchley Park Science and Innovation Centre. (Bletchley Park Trust has no involvement in the cyber security college.) 
This United Kingdom university, college or other education institution article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Barahna is a genus of Australian intertidal spiders that was first described by V. T. Davies in 2003. The name is derived from baran-barahn, the Bundjalung word for "spider". Originally placed with the Stiphidiidae, it was moved to the intertidal spiders after the results of a 2017 genetic study. 
Among the many admirers of the opera was Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, who wrote to Charlotte von Stein in a letter dated 28 August 1784: 
On 28 August 1784, Goethe was in Braunschweig. A production of the opera there in 1782 has been recorded. 
 In New York City, from the early 1950s through the mid-1960s (and beyond), many galleries began as an outgrowth of an artistic community that had sprung up in a particular area of downtown Manhattan. The streets between 8th Street and 14th Street between Fifth and Third Avenues attracted many serious painters and sculptors where studio and living space could be found at a relatively inexpensive cost. Author Morgan Falconer describes it this way for the Royal Academy of Art Blog:
Finding the audience for vanguard contemporary art to be small and the venues in which to show few, artists began to band together to launch and maintain galleries as a solution to the lack of other showing opportunities. Thus began a neighborhood in which several (some now legendary) co-operative galleries were formed, and a few non co-operative galleries as well. 
"Approximately 250 artists were dues-paying members of these co-operative galleries between 1952 and 1962. More than 500 artists and possibly close to 1000 artists exhibited on Tenth Street during those years." Several older and more established artists such as Willem de Kooning, Franz Kline and Milton Resnick maintained studios nearby, and often served a supporting role for the many younger artists who gravitated to this scene. 
During the most active years of the 10th Street cooperatives, sculptors William King, David Slivka, James Rosati, George Spaventa, Sidney Geist, Israel Levitan, Gabriel Kohn, and Raymond Rocklin, became known as representatives of the 10th Street style of sculpture, even though there was remarkable diversity in their work. 
Other galleries associated with the area and the time were the Fleischman Gallery, the Nonagon Gallery, the Reuben Gallery, the Terrain Gallery and the gallery at the Judson Church, which were not co-operatives. 
The sculpture "Sonar Tide," in front of the Peoria Civic Center is by Ronald Bladen. He was a member of the Brata Gallery. 
The "Lao Tzu" sculpture, displayed in Denver, was created by Mark di Suvero. He was a member of the March Gallery. 
Alice Neel painted "Blanche Angel Pregnant, 1937," which is now displayed at the Whitney Museum. She was a member of the Camino Gallery. 
The art installation "Narcissus Garden" by Yayoi Kusama is displayed in Brumadinho/Brazil. She was a member of the Brata Gallery. 
Sculptor Richard Stankiewicz created "Miracle in the Scrap Heap," which his now displayed at the Ilana Goor Museum in Jaffa, Israel. He was a member of the Hansa Gallery. 
The Sculpture "Negro y blanco horizontalNegro y blanco horizontal" was created between 1993-99 by George Sugarman. It is displayed in Palma de Mallorca, Spain. He was a member of the Brata Gallery. 
The Camino closed in November 1963. At that time, six members (Alice Forman, Philip Held, Aaron Levy, Gertrude Shibley, Alida Walsh, Florence Weinstein) joined the Phoenix Gallery, which had moved uptown to 939 Madison Avenue. 
The film takes place in 1942, when Soviet climbers saved the inhabitants of the Caucasus foothills by sacrificing themselves. 
Elections in Alabama are authorized under the Alabama State Constitution,  which establishes elections for the state level officers, cabinet, and legislature, and the election of county-level officers, including members of school boards. 
The office of the Alabama Secretary of State has an Elections Division that oversees the execution of elections under state law? 
Since 1986, Republicans have won six of the seven gubernatorial elections and become increasingly competitive in Alabama politics at many levels. They currently control two seats of Alabama's U.S. Senate delegation and six out of seven of the state's U.S. Representative delegation. And all 9 seats on the Supreme Court of Alabama are held by Republicans. 
Two Republican lieutenant governors have been elected since Reconstruction, Steve Windom and Kay Ivey, the current governor. Windom served as lieutenant governor under Democratic Gov. Don Siegelman.  Before 2011, the last time that Alabama had a governor and lieutenant governor of the same party was the period between 1983 and 1987 when George Wallace was serving his fourth term as governor and Bill Baxley was serving as lieutenant governor; both were Democrats. 
As of the early 21st century, local elections in most rural counties, many of which are black dominated, are generally decided in the Democratic primary, and local elections in metropolitan and suburban counties, which are generally white majority, are decided in the Republican primary, although there are exceptions. 
In addition, Alabama, considered a "ruby-red" state (frequently supporting the GOP), elected Doug Jones, the Democratic candidate, as opposed to Roy Moore for the US Senator seat on 12 December 2017. 
In 1964, the state swung over dramatically to support Republican Barry Goldwater, who carried the state with an unheard-of 69 percent of the vote, carrying all but five counties. He was the first Republican to carry the state since 1872. Like much of the Deep South, Alabama's voters turned violently on President Lyndon Johnson in the wake of the Civil Rights Act of 1964. 
In the 1968 presidential election, Alabama supported native son and American Independent Party candidate George Wallace over both Richard Nixon and Hubert Humphrey. Wallace was the official Democratic candidate in Alabama, while Humphrey was the National Democratic nominee. In 1976, Democratic candidate Jimmy Carter from Georgia carried the state, the region, and the nation, but Democratic control of the region slipped after that. 
In 2004, George W. Bush won Alabama's nine electoral votes by a margin of 25 percentage points with 62.5% of the vote, mostly white voters. The 11 counties that voted Democratic were Black Belt counties, where African Americans are the majority racial group. 
The state's two U.S. senators are Republican Richard C. Shelby and Democrat Doug Jones. Richard Shelby was first elected in 1986 as a Democrat and switched parties after a Republican wave the 1994 midterm elections. Doug Jones was elected in a special election in 2017 to replace U.S. Attorney General Jeff Sessions, defeating former Alabama Supreme Court Chief Justice Roy Moore.  
In the U.S. House of Representatives, the state is represented by seven members, six Republicans (Bradley Byrne, Mike D. Rogers, Robert Aderholt, Morris J. Brooks, Martha Roby, and Gary Palmer) and one Democrat (Terri Sewell). 
The following table displays, by color, the parties of elected officials in the U.S. state of Alabama from 1817 to the current year. As such, it may indicate the political party strength at any given time. The officers listed include: 
For years in which a presidential election was held, the table indicates which party's nominees received the state's electoral votes. 
Talkbiznow was a business networking site  Founded in 2008 and launched in August 2008, the site is a web-based business community and collaboration tool that provides business services for small businesses and professionals. Talkbiznow has been featured in the San Francisco Chronicle, Design Week, Sky News, The Financial Times, The Guardian, Times Online, Forbes, Fox Business Network, and The Daily Telegraph. 
Forming part of the Sproxton civil parish, Stonesby broadly consists of a small number of limestone habitats concentrated around the local parish church, set amongst a broad area of arable land. 
From a very early time, Stonesby formed an ancient parish within the Framland hundred of the historic county boundaries of Leicestershire, though was abolished as a parish in 1936. Between 1894 and 1935, it lay within the Melton Mowbray Rural District, and from 1935 to 1974, within the Melton and Belvoir Rural District. 
The 14th-century parish church is dedicated to Saint Peter. It was renovated in 1875 by R.W. Johnson and is a Grade II* listed building  
Heliura banoca is a moth of the subfamily Arctiinae. It was described by Harrison Gray Dyar Jr. in 1914. It is found in Panama and Costa Rica. 
John Mary Honi Uzuegbunam (born 9 March 1993) is a professional footballer who plays for Avispa Fukuoka in the J1 League as a forward. Born in Nigeria, he represents Cameroon internationally. 
Despite being born in Nigeria, John Mary was naturalized and played for Cameroon U20 in 2011.[citation needed] 
Oregon City Hall is the main municipal building for the Ogle County, Illinois city of Oregon. It stands on Oregon's Third Street, in the middle of the Oregon Commercial Historic District. The building is considered a contributing structure to the overall historical integrity of the historic district. Erected in 1920, the building, along with the rest of the historic district joined the National Register of Historic Places in August 2006. 
The 2nd arrondissement of Parakou is an arrondissement in the Borgou Department of Benin. It is an administrative division under the jurisdiction of the commune of Parakou. According to the population census conducted by the Institut National de la Statistique Benin on February 15, 2002, the arrondissement had a total population of 45,765. 
She was Michigan's first licensed female architect, one of the founders of the Alpha Gamma Delta sorority, active in Greek life, and a founding member of the Detroit Business Women's Club, the first professional women's club in the nation. 
Butterfield was born in Algonac, Michigan, in St. Clair County. She attended Detroit Public Schools. Butterfield and her father shared a great love of art. In her teenage years she and her father went on sketch trips to the western United States and Europe. 
Butterfield was among the three co-founders, along with publisher Emma Spoor, and manufacturer's agent Grace Wright, of the Detroit Business Women's Club in 1912. It was the first professional women's club in the nation and Butterfield served as founding president. 
In a series of mergers, the Club became part of what is now known as BPW/Michigan. This chapter is a part of Business and Professional Women (BPW), the oldest and largest organization for working women in the world. The national BPW organization is made up of federations from each of the 50 states, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. 
Butterfield designed the coats of arms for the following fraternities: Alpha Kappa Psi, Sigma Delta Rho, Sigma Tau Gamma, Theta Upsilon Omega, and Theta Kappa Nu (later merged with Lambda Chi Alpha). With George Banta, she created the coat-of-arms (adopted in 1910) of Phi Mu Alpha Sinfonia fraternity, the national fraternity for men in music. 
She designed the chapter houses of Alpha Gamma Delta at Syracuse and Michigan State universities. When the fraternity established a summer camp (the "Alpha Gamma Delta Summer Camp Lodges") for underprivileged children in Jackson, Michigan in 1920, Butterfield was the architect of the camp. She also served as camp manager until 1924. She served as editor of the Alpha Gamma Delta Quarterly, the fraternity publication, for 7 years. 
Butterfield had a strong influence on her sorority and Greek life, as noted in the 2004 Alpha Gamma Delta Centennial Keynote Address: 
Butterfield and her father shared a love for, and studied the art of, heraldry. Following creating many heraldry designs for fraternal organizations, she also wrote College Fraternity Heraldry, published in 1931. 
To further education in architecture, she published a children's book, Young People's History of Architecture (1933). She also contributed its illustrations, which she had drawn from her many travels. 
Butterfield was an accomplished illustrator, working in pen and ink and watercolor, illustrating mainly nature, Michigan, and architectural scenes. She exhibited at the J. L. Hudson Gallery and at the Toledo Artists Club. Her artwork was used in her publications. 
Butterfield retired to Neebish Island, where she served as postmaster during World War II. She died on March 22, 1958 and was inducted into the Michigan Women's Hall of Fame for her work in the field of architecture in 1990. 
Close Cover Before Striking is an EP by Luna. It contains two videos ("Lovedust" and "1995" from Romantica), as well as Rolling Stones and Kraftwerk covers. The digital re-release in 2011 added Led Zeppelin and Alice Cooper covers. 
A native of Indianapolis, Indiana, Newsome made his Negro leagues debut in 1923 with the Indianapolis ABCs. He went on to play for the Washington Potomacs, Detroit Stars, and Dayton Marcos, and finished his career in 1929 with the Memphis Red Sox. Newsome died in Dayton, Ohio in 1933 at age 33. 
The Portrait of Bindo Altoviti is a painting finished around 1515 by the Italian High Renaissance painter Raphael. It is housed in the National Gallery of Art of Washington, D.C., United States. 
Bindo Altoviti was a rich banker born in Rome in 1491 of Florentine origin. He was a cultured man who liked the arts.  
The graceful, almost effeminate position of the subject along with the heavy contrast between light and shadow are atypical of Raphael's work, particularly of his portraits of men, demonstrating the artist's experimentation with different styles and forms in his later Roman period.  The influence of the works of Leonardo, which Raphael studied astutely during this period of his career, is strikingly evident in this particular piece. 
The painting was a property of Altoviti's descendants until 1808, when it was sold to Ludwig I of Bavaria. It remained at the Alte Pinakothek until 1936, when, after many debates about its attribution, the painting was lured out of Nazi Germany by "canny English dealers". Acquired by Samuel Henry Kress, the portrait subsequently became property of the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C.. 
A bronze bust of Altoviti by Benvenuto Cellini is exhibited in Boston at the Isabella Stewart Gardner Museum. 
This biographical article relating to an American football running back born in the 1900s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The term of office typically runs for three years and can, in some cases, be extended for another two years. However in practice, only two chairmen, Raj Kumar Talwar and Arundhati Bhattacharya had their terms extended. Arundhati Bhattacharya was also the first female chairperson of the bank and continues to be the only woman to have held that post 
The inaugural officeholder was the Indian railway minister John Matthai, while P. C. Bhattacharya holds the unique distinction of having been in office for the longest time. P. C. Bhattacharya also held the post of governor of Reserve Bank of India. 
Although SBI, through its predecessors the Imperial Bank of India and others, has existed in some form since 1806; this article strives to list only those chairmen who have headed the bank since its formation in its modern form, that is since 1955. 
The station is located underground beneath the Terminal 2 Building of Haneda Airport. It has a single island platform, fitted with chest-high platform edge doors. Another island platform which shares one track with the platform now in use is provided but not in use. 
"Even the Queen" is a science fiction short story by Connie Willis, exploring the long-term cultural effects of scientific control of menstruation.  It was originally published in 1992 in Asimov's Science Fiction, and appears in Willis' short-story collection Impossible Things (1994) and The Best of Connie Willis (2013), as well as in the audio-book Even the Queen and Other Short Stories (1996). 
Three generations of women discuss the decision of one of their daughters to join the "Cyclists", a group of traditionalist women who have chosen to menstruate even though scientific breakthroughs (in particular, a substance called "ammenerol") have made this unnecessary. The title refers to the fact that "even the Queen" (of the United Kingdom) menstruated. 
The Village Voice considers it "light-hearted" and "a comedy of identity politics and mother-daughter relations", while Billboard, reviewing the audiobook, describes it as a "sly jab at both feminists and anti-feminists." 
Bryan Keane (born 20 August 1980) is an Irish triathlete who won a team bronze medal at the 2000 European Cross Country Championships. He placed 7th at the 2010 ITU Sprint Distance Triathlon World Championships and 40th at the 2016 Olympics. 
Set in an Oregon logging community, Lillian (Stiles), is a woman newly returned to her hometown after the death of her mother. She is being harassed by a local man named Blackway (Liotta), who is a big criminal in their little town. He operates with impunity in this small community on the edge of the wilderness. 
After Blackway kills her cat, she goes to the town sheriff for help, but is basically told that her best option is to leave town. Lillian refuses to be run out of town by Blackway, but Sheriff Wingate is reluctant to act against Blackway out of fear; feeling sympathetic to Lillian, he tells her to go to the town lumberyard mill and ask for a man named Scotty. The following events that unfold afterwards all happen within one single day. 
In the early morning, Lillian goes to the lumberyard mill, where a group of elderly men are gathered in the shop's office, run by Whizzer. Lillian tells Whizzer that she is looking for Scotty on the recommendation of Sheriff Wingate to help her with Blackway. Scotty isn't there, and the men also tell her the same thing that the sheriff said, which is to leave town rather than go up against Blackway. 
They head out to a local diner, where Lester asks the cook, Chris, who is newly released from prison on drug charges, where they could find Blackway. Chris tells Lester to try Blackway's motel, where he runs his drug business as well as other criminal activities. They find Blackway at his motel in the afternoon, but do not act upon it, as Lester can see that it's not a good opportunity yet. 
Inside one of the motel rooms, Lillian finds an old school acquaintance handcuffed to a bed, she releases her while Lester and Nate distracts two of Blackway's men. Lester grabs a handgun from one of the men, while Nate grabs a shotgun that was in sight. Nate causes an explosion inside the motel room, presumably because meth was being cooked in the room; Lillian puts her old acquaintance on a bus to get out of town after rescuing her. 
It is now evening time, and the three drive up into the deep woods, while Whizzer is narrating to the men in the shop about the dangers of the deep backwoods. Since Nate and Lester have been causing Blackway so much trouble all day, Lester knows that he will be looking for them. They settle in for the night out at a camping ground area of the woods, and Lester goes off with his antique rifle, leaving Lillian and Nate alone together. 
Blackway shows up at night, armed with a gun pointed at Lillian and Nate. Lester has a clear shot of Blackway from inside a trailer and is about to kill him, but unbeknownst to Nate of Lester's vantage point, Nate fends off Blackway to protect him and Lillian. When Lester gets another chance of a clear shot of Blackway again, he gets shot instead by Murdoch who finds him in the trailer, and Blackway is able to knock out Nate. 
Lester tells them that they'll have to drag Blackway and Murdoch's bodies deep into the woods so that the wild animals will scavenge their bodies and they'll never be found. 
At daybreak the next morning, the three drive back into town. Whizzer, who is opening up his lumber mill during daybreak, sees the pickup truck coming back into town and knows that the town is finally rid of Blackway from doing so. Lester gets dropped off at his house, while Lillian and Nate are driving back to their homes, and an attraction is evident between Nate and Lillian. 
Filming began on November 12, 2014 primarily in Enderby, British Columbia. It would also be shot in Lumby. Filming lasted until late December. 
On review aggregator Rotten Tomatoes, the film holds an approval rating of 20% based on 5 reviews, with an average rating of 3.92/10. Guy Lodge of Variety called the film a "turgid, tension-free revenge thriller". 
The Six Days of New York was a former six-day cycling event, held in New York City, in Madison Square Garden's velodrome. Between 1899 and 1961, a total of 73 editions were held, sometimes three per year. Only the Six Days of Berlin and the Six Days of Ghent had more runnings. Australian Alfred Goullet and Italian Franco Giorgetti hold the record with eight wins each. 
The song was performed last on the night, following Denmark's Birthe Wilke & Gustav Winckler with "Skibet skal sejle i nat". The song was placed eighth out of ten songs, and gained a total of 5 points. 
Pig Goat Banana Cricket is an American animated television series on Nickelodeon. Created by Dave Cooper and Johnny Ryan, the series follows the adventures of the eponymous characters Pig (Matt L. Jones), Goat (Candi Milo), Banana (Thomas F. Wilson), and Cricket (Paul Rugg). Most episodes present the escapades of the four characters separately until they meet at the end. The first season premiered on July 16, 2015. 
On June 25, 2015, it was announced that the series had been picked up for a second season of 14 episodes, ahead of the series premiere. 
The second season of the show got moved to sister network Nicktoons. The show ended on August 11, 2018. 
A grandson of James Ussher, head of the Church of Ireland from 1625 to 1656, in 1648 he married his cousin Alicia Ussher, another of his grandchildren. Of his four brothers, Henry and Ambrose were also bishops in the Church of Ireland, while Michael and Oliver were senior soldiers and politicians. 
Little is known of his career prior to the Irish Rebellion of 1641 when he fought in the Irish Confederate Wars, first with the Earl of Ormonde's Royal Irish Army, then later under Oliver Cromwell. When Ireland was part of the Commonwealth of England from 1653 to 1660, he sat as MP in the Second and Third Protectorate Parliaments. Prior to The Restoration in 1660, he and his brother Henry were instrumental in securing Ireland for Charles II. 
In return, he was appointed to the Privy Council of Ireland, made Clerk of the Pells in the Exchequer of Ireland, Scoutmaster of Ireland and elected for Meath in the 1661 to 1666 Parliament of Ireland. He largely withdrew from public life after 1664 and died in Osbertstown, County Kildare on 2 January 1685. 
For the next three years, Jones served with Robert Venables in the campaign to subdue Leinster and Ulster, including the battles of Scarrifholis and Lisnagarvey. In April 1653, the last of the rebel leaders in Ulster surrendered to him at Cloughoughter Castle. 
W Network (often shortened to W) is a Canadian English language specialty channel owned by Corus Entertainment. The channel primarily broadcasts general entertainment programming oriented towards a female audience. 
W Network was established in 1995 as the Women's Television Network (WTN), which had a focus on women's lifestyle programming. The channel was eventually acquired by Corus in 2001 and relaunched under its current branding in 2002. As part of the relaunch, W's programming shifted to a mix of both entertainment and lifestyle programming. By 2017, W had moved its lifestyle programming to its sister networks, focusing exclusively on entertainment programming.  
The channel is available in two time shifted feeds, East (operating from the Eastern Time Zone) and West (operating from the Pacific Time Zone). 
In June 1994, Linda Rankin, on behalf of a corporation to be incorporated, (later incorporated as Lifestyle Television (1994) Limited, principally owned by Moffat Communications) was granted a television broadcasting licence by the Canadian Radio-television and Telecommunications Commission (CRTC) to operate a channel called Lifestyle Television, described as offering "information and entertainment programming of particular interest to women." 
The channel subsequently launched on January 1, 1995 as Women's Television Network (WTN). Like Moffat's other cable television operations, WTN was headquartered in Winnipeg, Manitoba. Linda Rankin served as the president of the network from its launch. 
The channel suffered from low ratings in the beginning. Of the slew of new channels launched on January 1, WTN was initially the lowest rated channel on average. Linda Rankin later resigned in August 1995 citing "differences in management philosophy". 
On August 2, 2011, the channel launched its HD feed, a simulcast of W Network's standard-definition Eastern-time feed. The HD feed was added to Bell Satellite TV satellite and Bell Fibe TV channel lineups on March 23, 2012. It was also available on Eastlink, Telus TV and Shaw Direct. On October 1, 2013, an HD feed for the Western-time channel was launched on Shaw Cable. 
On October 25, 2018, Corus announced a content deal with Crown Media Holdings, giving W Network exclusive Canadian rights to original movies and series produced for Hallmark Channel and Hallmark Movies & Mysteries. W Network will broadcast branded blocks of Hallmark Channel content, including local versions of Hallmark Channel's seasonal programming events. The partnership officially launched on November 1, 2018 with the Countdown to Christmas event. 
W Network primarily broadcasts a mix of television dramas and films, including programming acquired from Hallmark Channel, most of which is filmed in Canada. W is best known for producing the Love It or List It and Property Brothers franchises, which are seen on HGTV in the United States, and have since moved to the Canadian HGTV channel. 
It is one of four Poropuntius species endemic to the Bolovens Plateau, three of which were treated as trophic morphs of P. bolovenensis by Tyson R. Roberts but more recently Maurice Kottelat has determined that these are separate species, as the specialisation is present in juveniles which mean it is genetically determined, Kottelat also described a fourth species. P. consternans is Roberts'  acuticeps morph. 
The Story Bridge is a heritage-listed steel cantilever bridge spanning the Brisbane River that carries vehicular, bicycle and pedestrian traffic between the northern and the southern suburbs of Brisbane, Queensland, Australia. It is the longest cantilever bridge in Australia. 
The road across the bridge is named Bradfield Highway. The bridge connects Fortitude Valley to Kangaroo Point. The Story Bridge opened in 1940 and was tolled until 1947. It is named after prominent public servant John Douglas Story. 
Before the opening of the Sydney Harbour Bridge in 1932 the Government of Queensland asked John Bradfield to design a new bridge in Brisbane.[citation needed] 
The bridge carries an average of 97,000 vehicles each day. The Story Bridge carries three lanes of traffic in either direction as well as a shared pedestrian and cycle way flanking each side. The road on the bridge is called the Bradfield Highway. It is not to be confused with the Bradfield Highway that spans the Sydney Harbour Bridge. 
Initially a toll of sixpence (5 cents) was charged to use the bridge, with toll booths constructed at the southern end of the Bradfield Highway. The toll was removed in 1947. Between 1952 and 1969 trolley-buses operated by the Brisbane City Council used the bridge. 
Following completion of the bridge, an expressway was constructed on the southern side of the bridge (opened 18 May 1970), and a tunnel/loop was constructed at Kemp Place on the northern side (completed 10 July 1972). 
The Story Bridge was closed to traffic from midnight of Friday 3 January 2014 until 5.30 a.m. Monday, 6 January 2014, for essential maintenance work of resurfacing all six lanes. 
Closure for maintenance occurred again from 9 p.m. Friday 27 April 2018 until 5 a.m. Monday 30 April 2018. 
The Story Bridge features prominently in the annual Riverfire display and is illuminated at night.  In 1990 road traffic was halted so pedestrians could celebrate the 50th anniversary of the bridge's construction. The bridge was again closed to road traffic on 5 July 2015 to celebrate the 75th anniversary. The celebration attracted almost 75,000 visitors to the bridge who enjoyed food, drink and entertainment as they walked across lanes usually reserved for vehicles. 
In 2009 as part of the Q150 celebrations, the Story Bridge was announced as one of the Q150 Icons of Queensland for its role as a "structure and engineering feat". 
Mahmud Gawan (1411, Iran - 1481) was a Prime Minister in the Bahamani Sultanate of Deccan. Khwaja Mahmud Gilani, from the village of Gawan in Persia, was well-versed in Islamic theology, Persian language and Mathematics and was a poet and a prose writer of repute. Later, he became a minister in the court of Muhammad III (1463-1482). A storehouse of wisdom, Mahmud enjoyed the trust and confidence of rulers, locals as well as that of foreign kingdoms, who had great respect for Mahmud. 
Mahmud Gawan served the state most faithfully and enlarged the kingdom to an extent never achieved before. He conquered Kanchi or Kanjeevaram during the course of campaign against Vijayanagar. He fought successful wars against rulers of Konkan, Sangameshwara, Orissa and Vijayanagar. He captured Goa and Dabhol, the best part of Vijayanagar empire. 
He built the great university in Bidar which is known as Mahmud Gawan Madrasa. Almost at the centre of Bidar's old Town stand the graceful buildings, which bear testimony to the genius and eclecticism of Mohammad Gawan. A linguist and a mathematician, he, together with carefully chosen scientists, philosophers and religious seers, created a distinguished religious school. His extensive library boasted of 3,000 manuscripts. 
There were two factions of nobles: The Deccanis (Of local origin) and Afaqis. (Of Foreign origin). Mahmud was an Afaqi, so he faced many challenges. Unfortunately, plots were hatched to topple him by the Deccanis, the nobles forged a treasonous document purportedly from him. In a drunken state, the Sultan ordered him executed in April 1481. "With him departed all the cohesion and power of the Bahmani Sultan." 
A Russian traveler, Athanasius Nikitin, who visited Bidar, has recorded that Mohammad Gawan's mansion was guarded by a hundred armed men and ten torchbearers. 
Archers of Loaf vs. The Greatest of All Time (often shortened to either "Greatest of all Time" or simply GOAT) is the first EP by North Carolina indie rock band Archers of Loaf. The EP was recorded shortly after their first album Icky Mettle, and the styles are very similar. 
The song "Greatest of all Time" was not featured on this release but rather their second full length, Vee Vee. 
This article related to a river in the US state of Georgia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
She represented the Czech Republic at the IIHF Women's World Championship Top Division tournaments in 2016, 2017, and 2019 and at the 2015 IIHF Women's World Championship Division I Group A tournament. 
This biographical article relating to a Czech ice hockey player is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Turkish association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Hoogheemraadschap van Delfland is a Dutch waterboard, which is responsible for water management. It covers the municipalities of Delft, Midden-Delfland and The Hague, and is fully located in the province of South Holland. The organization was established in 1289 when William I, Duke of Bavaria (As William V, Count of Holland) authorized the "Heemraden of Delft" to manage water and serve as a court. 
The Hoogheemraadschap is tasked with water quality and water quantity issues in its region. Its main activities are 
The organization is led by a general board called "verenigde vergadering", consisting of 30 representatives which are representatives of the inhabitants (21 by direct elections), industry (4), owners of open land (mainly farmers) (4) and owners of nature (1). The present constitution is: 
The inhabitants parties of VVD, AWP, CDA and Water Natuurlijk together with the representatives of Land and Industry together form the governing coalition. The 5 Hoogheemraden that form with the Dijkgraaf the Dagelijks Bestuur (Executive Council) thus stem from those 5 groups. The civil organization employs 550 people and has a turn over of 260 million euro. 
The gemeenlandshuis at the Oude Delft in Delft houses the main office of the Delfland Water Board. The building is a rijksmonument and was built in 1505. The Late-Gothic building, situated on the Oude Delft 167, was built in 1505. The first owner was Jan de Huyter, bailiff of Delft and steward of Delfland. Later occupants were Philips, Count of Hohenlohe who was married to Maria of Nassau, a daughter of Willem of Orange. The Delfland Water Board has been established here since 1645. 
Debora Agreiter (born 25 February 1991) is an Italian cross-country skier.  She competed at the 2014 Winter Olympics in Sochi, in skiathlon and women's classical. 
This biographical article relating to Italian cross-country skiing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a radio station in the Philippines is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In building his house, Ichabod Miller employed a mix of logs: some were hand-hewn, while others retained their original round shape, and all are notched to enable them to fit together at the corners.  The entire building is one and one half stories tall. 
Fusion Academy & Learning Center (often referred to as Fusion Academy or Fusion) is a private, alternative school for grades 6-12. All classes are taught on a one-to-one basis with one student and one teacher per classroom. Students generally complete schoolwork on-site, instead of at home. 
Fusion Academy was founded in 1989 by Michelle Rose Gilman, as an after-school tutoring program in her garage in Solana Beach, California. The company began to offer a full-time curriculum in 2001. In 2009, the company opened its second campus in Los Angeles. In 2011, Inc. Magazine included Fusion Academy in its annual "Inc. 5000" list of America's fastest-growing private companies, the second time the company had made the list. 
Campuses offer therapeutic support from outside professionals for which parents pay extra, compassion and tolerance education, staff mentoring, tutoring, organizational and homework assistance, and support in areas such as time management, preparation for high school entrance or SAT, ACT, GED exams, college applications and career planning. One session of college Consulting is offered per year. Parents are charged for additional  sessions in addition to the tuition. 
Eschweilera beebei is a species of woody plant in the family Lecythidaceae. It is found only in Venezuela. 
Meanwhile the holidays continue. Natasha is very fond of Victor, he secretly is in love with her, but Natasha categorically rejects all of his timid advances. Unexpectedly an unpleasant surprise happens: on the beach Victor loses his clothes and passport and is detained by the police. To help Victor out of this difficult predicament, Natasha makes an "official" statement that he is her husband. And then it becomes clear that the ridiculous game of "spouses" has developed into true love... 
Maehara Stadium is a stadium in Wailuku, Hawaii.  It is primarily used for baseball, and was the home field of Na Koa Ikaika Maui from 2010 to 2013. It also hosted the Maui Stingrays of the Hawaii Winter Baseball league. 
The park opened in 1973 and holds 1,500 spectators.  It is named after Ichiro "Iron" Maehara, a Maui baseball advocate.  It is located next to War Memorial Stadium. 
This article about an American Episcopal or Anglican bishop is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Delhi Aerodrome (TC LID: CDH6) is a registered aerodrome located adjacent to Delhi, Ontario, Canada. 
In 1955, Vivian was commissioned to the 3rd Carabiniers (Army Emergency Reserve), which later merged with the Royal Scots Greys into the Royal Scots Dragoon Guards.  
In 1957 he transferred to a Regular Army commission. From 1976, he commanded the 16th/5th The Queen's Royal Lancers. Having then worked for defence intelligence staff at the UK Ministry of Defence, Vivian became deputy commander of the land forces in Cyprus in 1984. Elevated to the rank of Brigadier in 1987, he commanded the British Communication Zone until 1990, when he stepped down. Shortly after this, he was promoted Honorary Colonel of 306 Field Hospital, Territorial Army. 
In 1991, Vivian succeeded to his father's titles and joined the House of Lords, where he was Shadow Minister for Defence. Between 1994 and 2000, he was Commissioner for the Royal Hospital, Chelsea.[citation needed] 
He had one son, Charles (7th Baron Vivian) and one daughter, Henrietta (married to Philip Hoyland. Children: Jack, Francesca, George), by his first wife, and two daughters by his second wife, Natasha (married to Jamie Piggott. Children: Harry, Jemima, Olivia, Florence) and Camilla (married to William Wallace. Children: Agatha, George). 
This biography of a baron in the peerage of the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Malaxis macrostachya  is a species of orchid widespread across much Mexico, Central America, and the southwestern United States (Arizona, New Mexico, western Texas). It has only one leaf per plant, along with a tall flower stalk with as many as 160 tiny, green flowers. 
Thetapapillomavirus is a genus of viruses, in the family Papillomaviridae. Birds serve as natural hosts. There is only one species in this genus: Thetapapillomavirus 1. Diseases associated with this genus include cutaneous lesions. 
Viral replication is nuclear. Entry into the host cell is achieved by attachment of the viral proteins to host receptors, which mediates endocytosis. Replication follows the dsDNA bidirectional replication model. DNA-templated transcription, with some alternative splicing mechanism is the method of transcription. The virus exits the host cell by nuclear envelope breakdown. Birds serve as the natural host. Transmission routes are contact. 
The Press and Registration of Books Act contains the duties and functions of the RNI. On account of some more responsibilities entrusted upon RNI during all these years, the office is performing both statutory as well as some non-statutory functions. Online registration system was formally inaugurated in 2004 by the Information and Broadcasting Minister S. Jaipal Reddy. 
Baradulin was the last Belarusian who received the title of the People's Poet (1992). He received some other important awards for several books of poems and translations. He started publishing his works in 1953. 
His first poems appeared in the newspaper Chyrvonaya zmiena. The first book of his poems, "Maladzik nad stepam" appeared in 1959. All in all Ryhor Baradulin published around 70 books of poems (including poems for children, satiric and humorous poems), articles, essays, translations. In 2006, Baradulin was nominated for the Nobel Prize in Literature for his book of poems called Ksty. 
Section 5 of the Constitution of Australia empowers the Governor-General of Australia to prorogue the Australian Parliament, thereby bringing the current legislative session to an end.  Prorogation clears all business pending before Parliament and allows the Houses to be called back on a particular date without triggering an election.  The date for the new session of Parliament may be specified either in the proroguing proclamation or when the Governor-General summons the Houses to meet again. 
The Governor-General may appoint such times for holding the sessions of the Parliament as he thinks fit, and may also from time to time, by Proclamation or otherwise, prorogue the Parliament, and may in like manner dissolve the House of Representatives. 
After any general election the Parliament shall be summoned to meet not later than thirty days after the day appointed for the return of the writs. 
The Parliament shall be summoned to meet not later than six months after the establishment of the Commonwealth. 
Since 1990, it has been the practice for the Parliament to be prorogued on the same day that the House is dissolved so that the Senate will not be able to sit during the election period. 
The Turnbull Government relied on section 5 to reconvene the Australian Senate a week early on 3 May 2016, despite a majority of Senators having voted not to reconvene before 10 May 2016. This forced the Senate (in which the Government lacked a majority) to reconvene and consider legislation that could form triggers for a double dissolution before the 2016 Australian federal election. 
Diodora levicostata is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Fissurellidae, the keyhole limpets and slit limpets. 
The Cadillac Escala is a concept car built by Cadillac for the 2016 Pebble Beach Concours d'Elegance. The last of a trifecta of concept cars initially conceived in 2007, it is preceded by the Ciel and Elmiraj, which had debuted back in 2011 and 2013 respectively. The Escala previews Cadillac's future design language, being an evolution of the Art and Science design philosophy that has been used on its cars for over a decade. 
The Escala was featured in a Cadillac advertisement as a symbol of what Cadillac's future will look like. 
His wife  Catherine Gilmour died on 19 February 2011 at age 36 after a long battle with cancer.  Ewen Gilmour resigned from his position at Waitakere City Council in August 2007, after his wife's brain tumor was removed in 2006, so he could care for her. 
Firozabad is a city near Agra in the state of Uttar Pradesh in India. It is the centre of India's glassmaking industry and is known for the quality of the bangles and also glasswares produced there. 
The city lies in the cultural region of Braj and was a part of the Surasena Mahajanapada during the Vedic Age. It was subsequently ruled by the bigger kingdoms including the Mauryas, Guptas, Scythians, Kushans, Indo-greeks, Harsha before falling into the hands of  Brahmin Peshwa ,Rajput and Jat rulers. 
General Lek and General Vellajally attacked Firozabad in 1802. In the beginning of British regime Firozabad was in Etawah district but after some time it was attached to Aligarh district. When Sadabad was created as a new district in 1832, Firozabad was attached to it. Later on, in 1833 Firozabad was attached to Agra district. In 1847, the business of lac was flourishing at Firozabad. 
Firozabad railway station served by the Delhi-Howrah trunk route of the Indian Railways. Several trains serve the city connecting it to long and short distanced destinations including New Delhi, Howrah, Mumbai, Kanpur, Lucknow, Jaipur, Jammu Tawi, Amritsar, Jamshedpur, Patna, Aligarh, Agra, Hathras, Puri, Ajmer, Ambala, Bareilly, Mathura, Etawah, Basti, Gorakhpur and Tundla. 
The city is well connected with Yamuna Expressway and Taj Expressway to national capital New Delhi and state capital Lucknow respectively. 
Since few years, Firozabad has been suffering with a severe water pollution problem. The water has been polluted by the indiscriminate discharge of wastes by the industries, causing a literal water "crisis". The water has been tendered practically unusable. Citizens have no option but to install water purifiers at home and use packaged drinking water for consumption. 
In Suhag Nagari, holy center of "Jain Nagar" was established by Lt. Seth Chhadamilal. The temple has a 45-foot granite idol of Bahubali, the largest in North India, weighing more that 3500 tonnes. There are many Jain temples near this temple. 
Born and raised in Townsville, Queensland, Cedar began playing basketball as a youth for the Whirlwinds Basketball Club. He attended Townsville State High School, where he led the basketball team to the 2006 National Schools title and was regarded as one of the best young Australian guards at the time. The following year, he led the Queensland Under 20 side at the U20 National Championships in Ballarat, Victoria. 
On 22 November 2017, Cedar re-signed with the Meteors for the 2018 season. In 20 games, he averaged 16.2 points, 4.4 rebounds, 3.7 assists and 1.4 steals per game. 
On 8 January 2019, Cedar re-signed with the Meteors for the 2019 season. In 19 games, he averaged 19.7 points, 6.5 rebounds, 5.3 assists and 1.4 steals per game. 
Cedar had signed with the USC Rip City for the 2020 NBL1 North season, but the season was cancelled due to the COVID-19 pandemic. He later played in the 2020 Queensland State League (QSL) for the Logan Thunder. In 10 games, he averaged 20.1 points, 5.6 rebounds, 5.6 assists and 2.6 steals per game. 
Cedar's older brother, Michael, is also a professional basketball player who played eight seasons in the NBL for the Townsville Crocodiles between 2005 and 2013. Michael has also played in the QBL. In addition, Cedar's wife, Naomi, has played many years in the QBL women's competition. 
Artworks is an album by saxophonist Art Pepper recorded in 1979 at the sessions that produced So in Love but not released on the Galaxy label until 1984. 
The AllMusic review by Scott Yanow noted "The performances on this Galaxy LP are essentially outtakes and leftovers from Art Pepper's 1979 sessions for Artists House, but the quality is quite high. "Body and Soul" and "You Go to My Head" are particularly special, for they are unaccompanied alto solos, and on "Anthropology," Pepper has a rare outing on clarinet". 
The 1920 Barcelona City Council election was held on Sunday, 8 February 1920, to elect half of the Barcelona City Council. 26 out of 50 seats were up for election (1 was a vacant seat). 
Ramoetsana is a community council located in the Mafeteng District of Lesotho. Its population in 2006 was 10,519. 
Ha Beo Ha Berente Ha Bukana Ha Chechane Ha Fako Ha Ferete Ha Hlasoa Ha Jobo Ha Leaooa Ha Leboto Ha Lekhoa Ha Lekokosa Ha Lenka Ha Letsema Ha Liholo Ha Limo Ha Maama Ha Mabusetsa Ha Majela Ha Makhabane Ha Makhejane Ha Makhomo 
Ha Makoae Ha Maletlatsa Ha Matabane Ha Matee Ha Mateu Ha Mathabang Ha Matheka Ha Mokena Ha Mokhethi Ha Molati Ha Moluo-luo Ha Monaheng Ha Moolisa Ha Mopeli Ha Mothepu Ha Motloang Ha Motoai Ha Motsamai Ha Motumi Ha Mpheulane Ha Nalana Ha Ndaemane 
Ha Nketsi Ha Nkhahle Ha Nkieane Ha Notoane Ha Nthota Ha Poliaroto Ha Qhooja Ha Rammuso Ha Ramoetsane Ha Rampeteku Ha Rantsipe Ha Rasoai Ha Ratjopa Ha Roitire Ha Salae Ha Seahle Ha Sechaba Ha Seeiso Ha Seele Ha Sekhaila Ha Sekhaoli 
Maphonkoane Masaleng Matebeleng Mekokong Moeaneng Mohlanapeng Mokurutlung Molleloa Moqechane Moreneng Moseaneng Motse-mocha Motsekuoa Phahameng Phocha Phuthalichaba Sekokoaneng Taboleng Thaba-Bosiu Thaba-Kotjo Thaba-Sekoka   
Imran Aslam graduated from Government College University, Lahore, Pakistan. He also studied at the London School of Economics later. 
Before he turned to journalism, he worked for Sheikh Zayed bin Sultan Al Nahyan of the UAE. He began his journalistic career as the editor of an English language newspaper The Star in the 1980s. 
In the 1990s, he was editor of The News, a Karachi English daily newspaper.  In 2015, he is the Group President of GEO Television Network, a subsidiary of the Jang Group of Newspapers. 
"During his tenure as president, Geo Network launched Geo News channel, Geo Entertainment channel, Geo Super channel, Aag channel, Geo Kahani channel and Geo Tez channel." 
This Pakistani biographical article related to television is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1960, Sharma was appointed by the Rajasthan State Archives as General Editor of a comprehensive history of Rajasthan to be published by the Government of Rajasthan. This became the definitive work on the history of Rajasthan.[citation needed] Titled Rajasthan through the Ages this work was largely written by Sharma and was published in 1966. Samrat Prithiviraj Chauhan tritiya aur unka yug (in Hindi) is an updated text on Prithviraja III. 
Born in Hamburg in August 1933, Nathan came with his family to England at the age of three to escape Nazi persecution. 
Nathan was educated at Berkhamsted Boys School in Hertfordshire, and subsequently studied wool manufacture at the Scottish Woollen Technical College in Galashiels, Scotland. He was awarded an MPhil at the University of Leeds in Textile Industry. 
Nathan was the founding Chairman of The Centre for the Study of Jewish-Christian Relations (1998-2003) (now The Woolf Institute) in Cambridge, which is devoted to teaching, research and dialogue between the three Abrahamic faiths. He subsequently became its Honorary Vice President. He was a Board Member of the Conference on Jewish Material Claims Against Germany and was Life President of the Support Group for the Centre for German-Jewish Studies at the University of Sussex. 
In 2004 Nathan established the Clemens Nathan Research Centre, organizing numerous international conferences and publishing many books on human rights  
As a result of his work, amongst other public engagements he gave a lecture at The Peace Palace in the Hague for a conference on reparations hosted by REDRESS, entitled 'The Relevance of Post-Holocaust Experience', and he was invited to lecture at the University of Pennsylvania in 2009 on 'Human Rights in the 21st Century'. 
Nathan was also a respected and prominent figure within the UK Jewish community. He was President of the Anglo-Jewish Association (1983-1989), Joint Chairman of the Consultative Council of Jewish Organisations (CCJO), and a director of the Sephardi Centre in London. He was also a governor of the Shenkar College of Engineering and Design in Israel. 
Nathan was described as "the human of human rights" and "amongst the outstanding Englishmen of today and one of the great Jews of our generation". In 2012, he was one of a small group to offer the loyal address by the British Jewish Community to the Queen on the occasion of her Diamond Jubilee. 
Nathan married Rachel in 1963 with whom he had three children. Nathan was a member of the Worshipful Company of Glovers and the Athenaeum Club. He died on 2 June 2015. 
In 2016 the Clemens N Nathan PhD Scholarship Programme was established in tribute of Clemens Nathan. Run by the Centre for German-Jewish Studies at the University of Sussex, it has been partially funded by the Association of Jewish Refugees and the Anglo-Jewish Association. 
An edited book of essays entitled "Contemporary Human Rights Challenges: The Universal Declaration of Human Rights and its Continuing Relevance" was published in Nathan's memory to mark the 70th Anniversary (10 December 2018) of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights. The book's foreword is written by UNESCO Secretary General Audrey Azoulay and contains 18 essays including ones by Lord Williams and President Jimmy Carter. 
Courseulles, was a railway station at the end of the CF Caen-Mer, terminus of trains from Caen and Luc-sur-Mer. 
The Games was an Australian mockumentary television series about the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney. The series was originally broadcast on the ABC and had two seasons of 13 episodes each, the first in 1998 and the second in 2000. 
Guest stars included John Farnham, Dave Gray, Frank Woodley, Barrie Cassidy, Maxine McKew, and actor Sam Neill. 
The final episode was broadcast days before the opening ceremony of the real Games. In this episode, the three stars and Bell were forced to stand in for The Seekers at the closing ceremony rehearsal to sing "The Carnival Is Over". The Seekers did indeed perform this song, but at the closing ceremony of the Paralympics some weeks later. 
The Games was named Most Outstanding Comedy Program at the Logie Awards of 2001. John Clarke and Ross Stevenson won Best Screenplay in a Television Drama at the 43rd Australian Film Institute Awards for the episode Solar. Season 1 was released on DVD by Umbrella Entertainment in December 2004, Season 2 was released by ABC DVD in December 2009. All episodes are on PAL format VHS. 
In New Zealand, the series was one of the first programs on TVNZ 6 on 30 September 2007, the day of the channel's launch. 
In Australia, The Comedy Channel currently airs the series as part of their Aussie Gold block hosted by Frank Woodley. The show has since returned to the ABC. 
Clarke and Riley were due to reprise their roles in a spin-off series The Games: London Calling, in which the characters became consultants to the 2012 Summer Olympics. The series did not go into production by the Nine Network. 
In 2011, the BBC TV mockumentary Twenty Twelve was criticised by The Games' makers as bearing a strong resemblance to the earlier Australian series, with Clarke saying, "We worked very hard on that project and we had long conversations with these people who've now done a show like that in Britain". The BBC denied claims of plagiarism, saying: "It is a very different show, the only similarities between them are that they are both set around the Olympics". 
Clarke's website later called The Games' writers "John [Clarke] and Ross Stevenson, who run a charitable institute supplying formats to British television". 
Born in Los Angeles, De Lory was the son of a studio musician. As a child he studied piano and began arranging music while in the Army. Upon his discharge, he worked as a pianist in studio orchestras and in clubs. 
In the late 1950s De Lory co-wrote the 1960 #1 hit novelty song "Mr. Custer", recorded by Larry Verne. As an L.A. based session musician in the early 1960s De Lory played keyboards for various Phil Spector "Wall of Sound" productions, recordings of Surf rock, and The Beach Boys' Pet Sounds. 
By the mid-1960s Ken Nelson had hired him as producer and arranger for Capitol Records, and he provided a key element in the success of Glen Campbell's million selling hit singles and albums from 1967 to 1972. As a bandleader he had his own hit in 1970 with an instrumental version of the "Song from M*A*S*H". In the 1970s he moved to Nashville, producing country artists and film soundtracks, (including The Devil's Rain). He also played and recorded with his own Latin Jazz groups. 
Donovan, The Four Preps, Dobie Gray, The Lettermen, Donna Loren, Al Martino, Anne Murray, Jim Nabors, Wayne Newton, Andy Russell, The Sugar Shoppe, The Turtles, Ricky Van Shelton 
This biographical article relating to Norwegian football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
McNab remained a stalwart of the Reds backline for four more years when he was allowed to leave for West London club Queens Park Rangers in June 1928 at the age of 34. McNab had appeared in a red shirt 222 times, exactly 200 in the league, scoring 6 goals, all of which were in the league. He played regularly for QPR for two years before retiring. He later ran a hotel in Bootle, Merseyside. 
This article about a member of the Pennsylvania State Senate is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Each piece is different in that they were individually designed, and then hand made and chased which by nature produces uniqueness, where no two pieces can be the same 
The church has its roots in the ghost town of Port Crescent, Michigan. In 1844, Rev. W. Swartz of Ruth, Michigan organized the area Lutherans and ultimately founded the church under the name of The German Evangelical Lutheran St. Peters Church of Port Crescent in 1873. Services were held in private homes. In 1893, the congregation, under Rev. E. Berner, purchased the All Saints Episcopalian Church, which had been built in 1885. 
In 1907, the businessmen of Kinde, Michigan offered the congregation $130 and a plot of land to relocate to their town. The congregation accepted and the church building was moved from Port Crescent. Since then the church has been served by many pastors and joined with Zion Lutheran Church in 1950. 
As of 2016[update], St. Peter's Lutheran Church is served by Pastor Larry K. Loree Sr. The church has 68 baptized members with 45 congregants on an average Sunday. 
Pati, Barwani is a village & Tehsil in Barwani district in the Indian state of Madhya Pradesh. In 2014, Pati was selected by Ministry of Tribal Affairs among 10 tribal blocks in the country, to introduce tribal welfare scheme known as Van Bandhu Kalyan Yojana launched by Arun Jaitley, cabinet minister with Government of India. 
This article related to a location in Madhya Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mossend International Railfreight Park (previously known as Mossend Railhead) is a freight-handling station in Mossend. It is situated across the line from the Mossend EuroTerminal. 
Plans to expand the facility were rejected by North Lanarkshire Council in 2014, but the decision was overturned by Scottish ministers the following year. The council subsequently challenged the decision at the Court of Session, where in 2016 the judge ruled in its favour, stating that the Scottish ministers had not given adequate reasoning for overturning the original decision to reject the project. 
There are plans to expand the facility. Once complete, the facility will operate 24 hours per day and be capable of handling 16 trains each day. 
The 1988 Miami Hurricanes baseball team represented the University of Miami in the 1988 NCAA Division I baseball season. The Hurricanes played their home games at Mark Light Field. The team was coached by Ron Fraser in his 26th season at Miami. 
The Hurricanes reached the College World Series, where they finished tied for fifth after recording a win against Fresno State and losses to eventual semifinalist Cal State Fullerton and champion Stanford. 
The 1974 Wellington City mayoral election was part of the New Zealand local elections held that same year. In 1974, elections were held for the Mayor of Wellington plus other local government positions including eighteen city councillors. The polling was conducted using the standard first-past-the-post electoral method. 
Jagath Balasuriya (born 21 November 1940) is the Minister of National Heritage in the Sri Lankan government. He belongs to the Sri Lanka Freedom Party. He was acting Governor of Central Province in 2005 from September to December. 
Lorde admitted that it was a challenge to create a soundtrack for a much-anticipated film, but she "jumped" at the chance. In a press release, the singer spoke of her experience curating the soundtrack. "The cast and story are an inspiration for all musicians participating and, as someone with cinematic leanings, being privy to a different creative process has been a unique experience. I think the soundtrack is definitely going to surprise people." 
The following track, "Scream My Name", details how accustomed one can become to dealing with problems on a day-to-day basis. "Kingdom" is a dream pop piano ballad written by Charli XCX and Vampire Weekend's Rostam Batmanglij after the pair got drunk at a Miley Cyrus concert. The following track, "All My Love", was described by critics as an electropop and dance-pop number with elements of dancehall in its production. "Lost Souls" is a "tense lament" that features Raury rapping. 
Credits for The Hunger Games: Mockingjay, Part 1 (Original Motion Picture Soundtrack) adapted from AllMusic. 
Naarda nodariodes is a species of moth in the family Erebidae first described by Prout in 1928. It is known from Borneo. 
This biographical article related to a Belgian cyclist born in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Prior to 1936, the municipality was called Abruka. During the Second World War, the Battle of Tehumardi took place in Salme.  The location is marked by a 21-metre Soviet monument. 
The Kopylov House was built in 1901 and belonged to Rodion Martemyanovich Kopylov, who headed the Union of the Russian People (Novonikolayevsk department). 
This article about a Russian building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pteronotus is a genus of bats. Eight extant species have been recognized, as well as one relatively recently extinct species. 
The British Science Fiction Association Limited is an organisation founded in 1958 by a group of British academics, science fiction fans, authors, publishers and booksellers, in order to promote the writing, criticism, and study of science fiction in every form. The first President of the BSFA was Brian Aldiss. Pat Cadigan became president in August 2020, and Tade Thompson became the Vice President in June 2021. 
The BSFA Awards are presented annually by the British Science Fiction Association, based on a vote of BSFA members and members of the British national SF convention (Eastercon). The BSFA also nominates two out of five of each year's judging panel for the Arthur C. Clarke Award. 
The BSFA is responsible for the BSFA Awards, which are based on a vote of BSFA members, and members of the British national SF convention, Eastercon. The BSFA is also responsible for nominating two out of the five judges for the judging panel of the Arthur C. Clarke Award. 
The BSFA was the fourth attempt to set up a national organisation of science fiction fans in Britain. The first attempt, the Science Fiction Association (SFA), was set up in 1937 by fans who attended the first British science fiction convention in Leeds in May of that year, and was "devoted to the stimulation of interest in science fiction and scientific progress". It was disbanded on the outbreak of World War II barely two years later. 
The second attempt was called the British Fantasy Society (no connection with the later organisation of the same name), and was established in June 1942 by many of the people behind the SFA with the objective of giving members better access to science fiction through its extensive library. The British Fantasy Society did not last long and was wound-up in November 1946. 
The third attempt was in 1948, when Captain Ken Slater proposed the founding of a new national fan organisation. From this, the Science Fantasy Society was born. Slater was later posted to the army in Germany and the remaining committee members did not share his "flaming enthusiasm" for the organisation; in September 1951 the SFS was declared to be "a glorious flop". 
Romanian architecture is diverse, including medieval architecture, modern era architecture, interwar architecture, communist architecture, and contemporary 21st century architecture. In Romania, there are also regional differences with regard to architectural styles. 
In the first half of the 19th century, urban life grew considerably and there was a Western-oriented modernization policy. Thus the architecture of Romanian cities became a combination of Romanticism and Neoclassical elements. 
The Romanian School designed residences and administrative buildings in several neoclassical styles. One was the classic revival style, such as the Grigore Antipa National Museum of Natural History, and the Cantacuzino Palace (George Enescu Museum). 
Industrialization brought some engineering feats such as the King Carol I Bridge (later renamed Anghel Saligny Bridge). Built between 1890 and 1895 in over the Danube, when it was completed it then became the longest bridge in Europe and the third in the world. 
In the first decades of the 20th century, Romanian towns and cities still had a contrasting aspect, exhibiting a sharp difference between the downtown sumptuous buildings and the almost rural outskirts, while the villages remained, architecturally speaking, mainly unchanged. Nevertheless, the first signs of town planning appeared in some urban districts (the first two- or three-storied blocks of flats or one-family houses on two levels). 
The Symbolist movement in Romania introduced the Art Nouveau style. The Art Deco style was introduced during the Interwar period, with examples including the Bucharest Telephone Palace (Palatul Telefoanelor, 1933) and former "National Stadium" (Stadionul ONEF, 1926). 
The communist Romanian People's Republic was established in 1947. Gheorghe Gheorghiu-Dej was premier of the Socialist Republic of Romania from 1947 until 1965. He began the country's policies of industrialization, with infrastructure development for heavy industry, and construction for mass resettlement to new industrial and agricultural centers away from Bucharest and other principal cities. 
Prior to the mid-1970s, Bucharest, as most other cities, was developed by expanding the city, especially towards the south, east, and west. High density dormitory neighbourhoods were built at the outskirts of the city. Some, such as Drumul Taberei, Titan, and Giurgiului have architectural and/or urban planning value. 
Night & Day: Big Band is the eighteenth studio album by the American band Chicago, and twenty-second overall, released in 1995. It is a departure from Top 40 material for a more thematic project, with a focus on classic big band, jazz, and swing music. 
Chicago left Reprise Records and started their own imprint, Chicago Records, to re-distribute their music. This album was carried by Giant Records, a subsidiary of Warner Music, who also distributes Reprise. 
With producer Bruce Fairbairn, Chicago recorded Night & Day: Big Band from late 1994 to early 1995 and released it that May.  Although Bruce Gaitsch played guitar on the sessions, the guitar slot would eventually be filled that year by Keith Howland, who remains Chicago's present guitarist. Joe Perry of Aerosmith was brought in to add a solo to "Blues in the Night". 
Chicago made its "television variety debut" in February 1973 on a television special honoring Duke Ellington, Duke Ellington... We Love You Madly, which aired on CBS. They performed the Ellington composition, "Jump for Joy". They were the only rock musicians invited to appear on the show. Walter Parazaider cited the group's participation in the television special, and Duke Ellington's comments to them afterwards, as important factors in their decision to record this album. 
A porters' lodge or porter's lodge (colloquially, plodge) is a place near the entrance of a building where one or more porters can be found to respond to enquiries from the public and direct them around the building. It is particularly associated with university accommodation in the United Kingdom and Canada (such as the majority of colleges of the Universities of Cambridge, Oxford, Durham, York and Toronto). 
This article related to a type of room in a building is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This United Kingdom university, college or other education institution article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nodulotrophon septus is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Muricidae, the murex snails or rock snails. 
This article about a location in ancient Cappadocia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a populated place in the Byzantine Empire is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A BBC Music review commented "Her dry and introspective tone complement[s] her impassioned lyrics, and perfectly suit[s] the cool jazz backing that makes up the majority of this voyage of self-discovery." 
The Minister of the Interior also takes on the role of the former Minister of Worship and is formally consulted in the process of appointment of Catholic diocesan bishops (Briand-Ceretti Agreement). The Minister of Worship used to be a fully-fledged position; the office was abolished in 1912. 
While the Ministry of the Interior supervises police forces, it does not supervise criminal enquiries. Those enquiries are conducted under the supervision of the judiciary. 
During the First Empire, the Interior Ministry's tasks were reduced; in 1824, the Ministry of Public Instruction was established to oversee France's education policy. In 1832, the Interior Ministry was primarily occupied with the holding of elections and maintenance of the firefighters force, as the Institut de France and national public libraries were transferred to the Public Instruction Ministry. In 1836, the Ministry of Public Works, Agriculture and Commerce was established. 
In 1911, the Directorate of Penitentiary Administration, established in 1858 in the Interior Ministry to oversee prison conditions, was placed under the authority of the Minister of Justice. Nine years later, the Interior Ministry lost its public health policy department to the newly-established Ministry of Hygiene, Assistance and Social Security. 
The Douglas AC-47 Spooky (also nicknamed "Puff, the Magic Dragon") was the first in a series of fixed-wing gunships developed by the United States Air Force during the Vietnam War.  It was designed to provide more firepower than light and medium ground-attack aircraft in certain situations when ground forces called for close air support. 
The AC-47 initially used SUU-11/A gun pods that were installed on locally fabricated mounts for the gunship application. Emerson Electric eventually developed the MXU-470/A to replace the gun pods, which were also used on later gunships. 
One of the most publicized battles of the Vietnam War was the Battle of Khe Sanh in early 1968. More than 24,000 tactical and 2,700 B-52 strikes dropped 110,000 tons of ordnance in attacks that averaged over 300 sorties per day. During the two and a half months of combat, fighters were in the air day and night. At night, AC-47 gunships kept up constant fire against enemy troops and provided illumination for the base.[citation needed] 
As the United States began Project Gunship II and Project Gunship III, many of the remaining AC-47Ds were transferred to the Republic of Vietnam Air Force, the Royal Lao Air Force, and Cambodia's Khmer Air Force, after Prince Norodom Sihanouk was deposed in a coup by General Lon Nol. 
Airman First Class John L. Levitow, an AC-47 loadmaster with the 3rd SOS, received the Medal of Honor for saving his aircraft, Spooky 71, from destruction on 24 February 1969 during a fire-support mission at Long Binh.  The aircraft was struck by an 82-mm mortar round that inflicted 3,500 shrapnel holes, wounding Levitow 40 times, but he used his body to jettison an armed magnesium flare, which ignited shortly after Levitow ejected it from the aircraft, allowing the AC-47 to return to base. 
By the end of 1969 most AC-47Ds were transferred to the Republic of Vietnam Air Force. the RVNAF kept using them until 1975. most of them were destroyed or captured by North Vietnam at the end of the war. 
In 1969, Laos received its first AC-47 armed with SUU-11/A minigun pods. These pods ended up being unsatisfactory so later RLAF AC-47s were equipped with .50 cal machine guns or the MXU-470/A minigun modules. 
The Khmer Air Force received some AC-47Ds from the USAF between 1973 and 1974 and also converted some with .50 cal machine guns. several of them were given to Thailand after the end of the Cambodian Civil War. 
In 1970, the Indonesian Air Force converted a former civilian DC-3. The converted aircraft was armed with three .50 cal machine guns. During 1975, the Indonesian Air Force used its "AC-47" in the Indonesian invasion of East Timor to attack the city of Dili. Later, the aircraft was used in Indonesian military close air support missions in East Timor. Its retirement date is unknown. 
Between 1980 and 1981 Uruguay converted C-47 T-508 into a gunship for COIN missions by installing three .50 cal machine guns to the last two rear windows. 
The Philippines also converted some C-47s by mounting .50 cal machine guns and used them against Muslim guerrillas on the Battle of Jolo in 1974 
In 1967, Thailand converted its first AC-47D installing it the SUU-11/A minigun pods. It kept converting a few more airframes and also received some former Khmer Air Force AC-47Ds from Cambodia in late 1975. Thai AC-47s also were equipped with a combination of two .50 cal machine guns and an M197 20mm Electric cannon. 
Aircraft painted to represent AC-47s are on static display at the Air Commando Park at Hurlburt Field and the Air Force Armament Museum at Eglin Air Force Base. These airframes never were AC-47s and were actually regular unarmed C-47s.[self-published source?] 
13. On their 1989 album "Agent Orange", Thrash metal band Sodom made a song about the AC-47 called "Magic Dragon". The album's cover art shows the inside of an AC-47, and the inner sleeve shows AC-47's encircling a VC camp. 
In 1945, Curry applied for a position in United States government foreign service, and after passing the Foreign Service exam she relocated to Munich, Germany to work as an administrative assistant at the consulate. She held another foreign service position as the director of the Fulbright Program in Turkey. 
Curry met United States Army officer John Montgomery while the two were living in Germany. They married in 1948. 
She enrolled in correspondence courses at New York University and at George Washington University to strengthen her career opportunities. George Ferris Jr., then vice president of Ferris & Company, was one of her professors and recognized her aptitude for financial investing. She was the first woman to earn a degree in business from George Washington University. Ferris hired her as a broker with his securities firm, Ferris & Co. Inc. in 1955. 
In 1957, John Montgomery died in an accident.  As a career woman with four children, she needed reliable childcare so she employed her mother-in-law to stay with her children, "paying her 20 percent of her earnings, plus health benefits, a pension plan and profit-sharing." Five years after she was widowed she had the highest earned income of any woman in Washington, DC. 
In 1962 Montgomery at age 39 was the first woman to graduate from the 13-week Advanced Management Program of the Harvard Business School. While at Harvard Business School Montgomery faced the "full force of male chauvinism" for the first time. 
She married Thomas M. Walsh, a real estate executive, in 1963. She was the mother to twelve children - four sons with Montgomery (John Montgomery, Stephen Montgomery, Michael Montgomery, and Mark Montgomery), one daughter with Walsh (Margaret Walsh Cornog), and seven stepchildren (Mary Frances Walsh, Patrick Joseph Walsh, Kathleen Walsh Carr, Thomas D. Walsh, Joan Walsh Cassedy, Anne Walsh Walton, Daniel E. Walsh). 
Walsh was recruited by her professor, George Ferris, to his securities firm, Ferris & Co. Inc. first as an unpaid intern in 1955. She spent twenty-two years at Ferris, and held positions of general partner (1959), senior vice president (1971) and vice chair (1973). At that time, Walsh was the only woman to be a partner of a New York Stock Exchange firm in Washington. 
Attempting to change the 116-year tradition of male only membership, Walsh and Phyllis S. Peterson applied for full membership in American Stock Exchange (AMEX) in 1965. At the time the exchange had some women associate members, but no woman was a full member. Both women were admitted. 
In 1972, she was the second woman elected to the AMEX Board of Governors, and the first woman to come from the securities industry. As a Governor, she successfully formulated a plan to attract companies to the AMEX. 
In 1977 President Jimmy Carter offered her a seat on the Security Exchange Commission which she turned down because after her term ended she would be "too young to retire" and "too old to develop another career." Walsh served as director of Esmark and Pitney Bowes. 
Looking for a challenge and thinking that the time was right for a woman to prosper in financial services, Walsh founded Julia Walsh and Sons in 1977. In November 1979, the firm joined the New York Stock Exchange. 
Walsh thought that business people had a responsibility to engage in public service. In 1980, Walsh was appointed by President Jimmy Carter to Board of Directors of the Pennsylvania Avenue Development Corporation. 
In 1969, Walsh received an honorary LL.D., Doctor of Laws from Hood College. In 1982, the American Association of University Women (AAUW) Educational Foundation presented Walsh with the AAUW Achievement Award. She was inducted into the Ohio Women's Hall of Fame in 1986. 
In 1985 Walsh was the first woman to be president of the Greater Washington Board of Trade. United States President George H. W. Bush appointed her to the commission to help rebuild post-Cold War Czechoslovakia. 
Walsh retired in 1993 after several vascular strokes. Walsh and her family raised funds to research stroke prevention.  In 1996, she wrote her memoir, Risks and Rewards: A Memoir, with Anne C. Carson. 
In 1998, after his junior year at Dartmouth, Fick attended the United States Marine Corps Officer Candidates School and was commissioned a second lieutenant upon graduating college the following year. 
Fick left the U.S. Marine Corps as a captain in December 2003, and Captain Brent Morel took his place as platoon commander. Morel was killed in a firefight in Fallujah in April, 2004. One Bullet Away is dedicated to Morel. 
After leaving the Marines, Fick used the GI Bill to attend Harvard Business School and the Harvard Kennedy School. 
Fick became the Chief Operating Officer (COO) at the Center for a New American Security in 2008 and later was appointed CEO in June 2009. 
Endgame's endpoint security platform is widely deployed across commercial and government customers. In 2018, Endgame was named one of the "100 Best Cloud Companies in the World" by Forbes, and Nate was recognized by Fast Company Magazine as one of the "Most Creative People in Business." 
He comments frequently in the media on technology and national security matters, and his writing has appeared in the New York Times, The Washington Post, and the Wall Street Journal. He appears regularly on business television, including CNBC and Bloomberg TV. Fick has testified before the United States Senate on Iraq and spoke at the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver on August 28, 2008, the night Barack Obama accepted the presidential nomination. 
Fick was elected to Dartmouth College's Board of Trustees in April 2012. He also serves on the Military & Veterans Advisory Council at JPMorgan Chase & Co. 
Fick and his platoon were the subjects of a series of articles in Rolling Stone and the book Generation Kill by the embedded journalist Evan Wright. The articles won the National Magazine Award in 2003. Generation Kill was adapted by David Simon and Ed Burns into a miniseries of the same name for HBO, in which Fick was portrayed by Stark Sands. 
The 1944 Waterford Senior Hurling Championship was the 44th staging of the Waterford Senior Hurling Championship since its establishment by the Waterford County Board in 1897. 
On 21 October 1945, Mount Sion won the championship after a 3-08 to 2-05 defeat of Dungarvan in the final. This was their fifth championship title overall and their first title since 1943. 
The Battle of Invernahavon was a Scottish clan battle between the Clan Cameron and the confederation of Clan Chattan that consisted of the Clan Mackintosh, Clan Macpherson, and Clan Davidson. Some sources give the date as 1386, others as 1370. 
During the chiefship of Lachlan Mackintosh, 8th chief of Clan Mackintosh, a feud had raged for some years with the Clan Cameron, apparently over the disputed lands of Glenlui and Loch Arkaig. Each side had raided each other's lands, lifting property. 
According to Lachlan Shaw the Battle of Invernahavon gave occasion to the Battle of the North Inch in Perth in 1396 that was also fought between the Clan Chattan and Clan Cameron. Alexander Mackintosh-Shaw also stated that it is highly likely that the combat at Perth had some connection with that at Invernahavon. 
Although the play was acclaimed, it had an extremely brief run and was not a box-office success. It was, however, filmed by a NY based company THEATRE ON FILM Inc and released as a 90 minute 16mmm film in 1941. This is probably the source of the film excerpts from the stage performance -  labeled "a screen reproduction of the play" on a website. 
The Mirage is a play by Edgar Selwyn.  It was the first play presented at the Times Square Theater and debuted on September 30, 1920.  It closed in March 1921 after 192 performances. 
In response to those questioning the plausibility of the plot, Selwyn said it was based on "not at all uncommon" situations in New York. 
The 1931 movie Possessed, starring Joan Crawford and Clark Gable, in an adaptation of the play.   The 1924 silent movie The Mirage was also an adaptation.  
Protect formerly Public Concern at Work (PCaW) is a whistleblowing charity. Established in 1993, Public Concern at Work advises individuals with whistleblowing dilemmas at work, supports organisations with their whistleblowing arrangements and informs public policy and seeks legislative change. 
Odostomia thea is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusc in the family Pyramidellidae, the pyrams and their allies. 
He retired to Lido Key in Sarasota, Florida in 1958, where he and his wife Marion were benefactors of New College of Florida, including the endowment of a chair in Asian Studies. 
Frisky, naughty and bursting with raw power: [La Joie de Vivre] is one of the most technically adept animations ever made, and represents a milestone in the development of an international style of animation on par with the Art Deco movement.
The nine-minute film is described in the Internet Movie Database as "A tone poem [in which] two woodland sprites dance about, atop power lines and among flowers and leaves, while being pursued. Everyone spends some time pulling levers to switch trains, too." 
The New York Public Library has a copy of this film, titled Around the World in Eighteen Minutes, published by McGraw-Hill in 1962. 
Alloblennius is a genus of combtooth blennies (family Blenniidae) found in the western and northeastern Indian Ocean. 
He was born in Richmond, Virginia and moved to Clarksville, Tennessee when he was 11 years of age. Later, as a young adult, he studied art in New York, England, and France. Newman served briefly as an artillery lieutenant for the Confederate Army during the American Civil War. He died of asphyxiation from a gas leak from a stove on March 31, 1912. 
This article about a painter from the United States born in the 1820s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In the prelude to the siege of Port Hudson, Louisiana, Rear Admiral David Farragut attempted to move a flotilla of ships, including the Richmond, up the Mississippi River past the town of Port Hudson. On March 14, 1863, the flotilla reached the town and came under heavy fire from Confederate artillery batteries. The enemy guns inflicted severe damage on the Union flotilla, forcing most of the ships to turn back. 
During the battle, the Richmond's fireroom, which housed its boilers, was damaged by an enemy shell and began to fill with hot steam. Vantine entered the room and "hauled the fires", or put out the furnaces, to prevent further danger. For his actions he was awarded the Medal of Honor four months later, on July 10, 1863. 
Rank and organization: First Class Fireman, U.S. Navy. Accredited to: Pennsylvania. G.O. No.: 17, July 10, 1863. 
Medal of Honor recipient Joseph E. Vantine died of general debility as a result of a paralytic stroke at age 69 and was buried at Glebe Cemetery in New Castle, Delaware. 
"Chain Armor Joe" at Rest, Special to the Inquirer. NEW CASTLE, Del., May 8. - Joseph E. Vantine, formerly of Philadelphia, where he was born March 20, 1835, and was afterwards educated, was laid to rest in the new P. E. Cemetery this afternoon with Masonic ceremony. Many persons from Philadelphia and Wilmington were present at the funeral.
Franz Obrist was an Italian luger who competed from the mid-1980s to the early 1990s. A natural track luger, he won three singles medals at the FIL World Luge Natural Track Championships with one silver in 1994 and two bronzes in 1992 and 1996. 
Obrist won two men's singles medals at the FIL European Luge Natural Track Championships with a gold in 1991 and a bronze in 1993. 
This biographical article relating to Italian luge is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In his novel In Search of the Castaways (1867), Jules Verne wrote, "Araucania is populated by the Mapuche, the native Chilean race extolled in verse by the poet Ercilla". 
The women's K-4 500 metres event was a fours kayaking event conducted as part of the Canoeing at the 1992 Summer Olympics program. 
16 crews entered in two heats. The top two finishers from each of the heats advanced directly to the finals while the remaining teams were relegated to the semifinals. 
The top two finishers in each of the semifinals and the fastest third-place finisher advanced to the final. 
Hungary beat Germany (formerly East and West Germany) after finishing second to them in every major competition since 1988. 
Bradley R. Listorti (born October 11, 1984 in Milford, Connecticut) is a former American football tight end. He was signed by the Atlanta Falcons as an undrafted free agent in 2008. He played college football at Massachusetts. 
This biographical article relating to an American football tight end born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dr. Bhagwat Kisanrao Karad is a surgeon and an Indian politician belonging to the Bharatiya Janata Party. He is a member of the Rajya Sabha the upper house of Indian Parliament from Maharashtra. He was the Mayor of Aurangabad twice. He is organisational man of Bharatiya Janata Party,Maharashtra from Aurangabad. 
He became Minister of State in the Ministry of Finance in the reshuffle of PM Modi's cabinet in the second term. 
This article about a Bharatiya Janata Party politician from Maharashtra is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Digoxin is a widely used medication that is effective for many cardiac conditions in adults and children. Some side effects are expected, some are common but serious, some are uncommon and not serious and others are rare but serious. 
Digoxin may be prescribed for a child to treat heart defects. Possible side effects in children are: dysrhythmia, nausea, vomiting, a slower-than-normal heart rate and anorexia. Children may demonstrate side effects if they are breastfed. Digoxin is also absorbed by the infant in utero. 
Kidney function gradually decreases as someone ages. The elderly are also likely to be underweight. In addition, these older people tend to be dehydrated and be taking other medications. These factors increase the likelihood of developing side effects of digoxin and digoxin toxicity. Often lowering the dose is considered by the prescriber. 
Side effects can become pronounced due to the interactions of digoxin and these substances: licorice, aloe, and St. John's wort. 
This article about a United States film actor born in the 1850s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After the tragic death of his mother, Adam takes refuge even more in music with his band and his girlfriend. His father, Joseph, who works as a detective, is faced with the mission of saving Adam's soul, since angels and demons disguise themselves as humans. This ancient spiritual war between good and evil will put Adam's faith to the test, while an unknown being full of darkness descends to Toronto to further damage this war. 
The website dove.org has given Adam's Testament a positive review, calling it a "captivating film that portrays the spiritual conflicts between good and evil, the symbolism of the angels and the demons in this story convincingly illustrates the battle and the actors are so very powerful in their interpretation as effective in their roles". 
Rautahat 1 is one of four parliamentary constituencies of Rautahat District in Nepal. This constituency came into existence on the Constituency Delimitation Commission (CDC) report submitted on 31 August 2017.
This biographical article relating to volleyball in Japan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In August 1916, when troops from the Romanian Old Kingdom entered Austria-Hungary, the first village they took was Fundata, also capturing their first prisoners there and suffering their first battle death. 
Patel v Ali  Ch 283 is an English contract law case, concerning the possibility of claiming specific performance of a promise after breach of contract. 
A vendor of a house became disabled after the sale. If she went through with the sale she would have lost the house. The buyer of the house demanded specific performance to convey the property. 
Goulding J refused to grant specific performance, and granted only damages. As a discretionary, equitable remedy, specific performance was refused on the ground that considerable hardship would be caused. 
The failure was attributed to dynamic load due to the storm and the soldiers, particularly as they seem to have been somewhat in step, combined with corrosion of the anchors for the main cables. The cable anchorages at Angers were found to be highly vulnerable, as they were surrounded by cement, which was believed to rustproof them for the indefinite future. However, the wire strands separated from their cement surrounds. This allowed water to penetrate and corrode the wires. 
When the London Thames Millennium Bridge was opened in 2000, the motion of pedestrians caused it to vibrate, and they fell into step with the vibrations, increasing them. This same mechanism may have increased the vibrations of the Angers Bridge.  The problem at the Millennium Bridge was corrected during the next two years. 
"Love, Love, Love" is the premiere episode of the fifth season of the American musical television series Glee, and the eighty-ninth episode overall. The episode was written by series co-creator Brad Falchuk and directed by Bradley Buecker, and first aired on September 26, 2013 on Fox in the United States. 
An album was released on September 24, 2013 to coincide with the premiere of the episode, which features music from this episode and the episode "Tina in the Sky with Diamonds". The album, Glee Sings the Beatles, has received generally positive reviews from critics. 
Kurt Hummel (Chris Colfer) and Blaine Anderson (Darren Criss) rekindle their relationship with a performance of "Got to Get You into My Life", and Blaine decides to move forward with his plan to propose to Kurt. He and Sam Evans (Chord Overstreet) rally New Directions, Vocal Adrenaline, the Dalton Academy Warblers and the Haverbrook Deaf Choir to participate in Blaine's proposal through a performance of "Help!". 
Blaine becomes concerned by Tina's bitterness and recruits Sam, Jake Puckerman (Jacob Artist) and Ryder Lynn (Blake Jenner) to cheer her up through a performance of "I Saw Her Standing There". Tina is then given the opportunity to choose Blaine, Sam or Ryder as her date for prom, and selects Sam. 
According to co-creator Murphy, the first two episodes of the fifth season had been written in May 2013, and would be tribute episodes to the Beatles. The Beatles tribute had been in the works for four years. This first episode was written by co-creator Brad Falchuk, and directed by executive producer Bradley Buecker. 
This is the first episode that the actors playing the roles of Jake Puckerman (Jacob Artist), Marley Rose (Melissa Benoist), Kitty Wilde (Becca Tobin), Wade "Unique" Adams (Alex Newell) and Ryder Lynn (Blake Jenner) have been given main cast credits. All five were first reported as being promoted to the main cast at the end of June 2013. 
Two new special guest stars appeared in the episode in New York sequences. Peter Facinelli played the Funny Girl director, Rupert Campion, and Ioan Gruffudd the lead male actor in the show, Paolo San Pablo. 
Erinn Westbrook debuts as a new recurring McKinley cheerleader, Bree, who is said to be a "mean girl". Other recurring characters in this episode included former glee club member Mercedes Jones (Amber Riley), Kurt's father Burt Hummel (Mike O'Malley), cheerleading coach Roz Washington (NeNe Leakes), Principal Figgins (Iqbal Theba), Haverbrook School for the Deaf choir director Dalton Rumba (Michael Hitchcock), and Dalton Academy Warbler Sebastian Smythe (Grant Gustin). 
"Love, Love, Love" was given mixed to positive reviews by critics. Miranda Wicker of TV Fanatic gave the episode a 3.5 out of 5, saying the episode "was a technicolor return for the series, full of fun music for the audience to keep the audience singing along. But Finn Hudson's absence is evident." She commented negatively on the season's time-jump, saying "[it] robbed the audience of some good moments," but commented positively on Blaine's proposal speech, calling it "beautiful." 
 Lauren Hoffman of Vulture gave the episode a 4 out of 5, saying " it was a strong hour of Glee: fun, vibrant, and (against all odds) aware of continuity and character development. And if some of the vocal arrangements felt too derivative, well, then, at least they were derivative of the Beatles, and everyone likes the Beatles." Also, in regards to Finn's absence, she said 
The Associated Press noted how the premiere offered "a subtle, sad reminder of the late Glee star Cory Monteith" in the scene where Rachel "gaze[s] at a photo on her cellphone: It's a group shot of her old high school glee club pals, among them Monteith's Finn Hudson." 
 Beth Douglass of Wetpaint gave the episode a more mixed review, specifically about the episode's theme, saying 
Glee is now a completely different show from whatever creator Ryan Murphy intended, for better or for worse. It had to come back sometime, and instead of pulling off the bandage of grief upfront, Glee gave themselves a soft landing with a two-part season opener focused on the music of The Fab Four. While Glee has dabbled in the Beatles before, the hyper-focus special episode format keeps us feeling familiar, safe and generally upbeat as we transition into the brand new Glee world.
An album was released on September 24, 2013 to coincide with the premiere of the episode, which features music from this episode and the episode "Tina in the Sky with Diamonds." 
Nadruz represented Uruguay at U15 and U17 level. He won twenty-three caps for the U15s from 2010, prior to featuring six times and scoring once for the U17s in 2011. 
According to the Garuda Purana, this river falls on the path leading to the Southern Gate of the city of Yama. It is also mentioned that only the sinful souls come via the southern gate. 
However, other texts like the Harihareshwara Mahatmya in the Skanda Purana mention a physical river as well, that joins in the eastern ocean; he who bathes in it is supposed to forever be free from the torment of Yama.  
It first appears in the TirthaYatra Parva (Pilgrimage Episode) of the Mahabharata, where it is mentioned to be rising from the Vindhyas and falling into the Bay of Bengal after passing through Odisha as present Baitarani River.  
Apart from that it appears in Matsya Purana, and Vamana Purana, lastly it is the Padma Purana which reveals the etymology of Vaitarani in Vaitarani Mahatmya, where it is defined as Vai (truly) tarini (saving) and that related the legend wherein it was brought on to the earth from Patala, due to the penance of Parashurama resulting in a boon from Shiva. 
The river was created for the sinful. It is nigh-impossible to cross, and the far bank cannot be seen. 
There are a few ways to cross this river. It is important to note that as mentioned in the description of the river, only those souls who have sinned have to cross this river. The souls with good deeds or good karma do not travel on the path through which the Vaitarna River flows. 
After successfully crossing this river, the sinners reach the terrifying Southern Gate of the City of Yama. In this city the sinners along with the souls with good deeds are judged by the Lord of Justice (Yama or Yamaraja). The sinners are taken to hell and the better souls are taken to heaven. 
If a soul cannot cross the Vaitarna River then he cannot be taken to hell. He is stuck at its shore. Thus this prevents him from getting reborn on earth as human or animal. These souls are considered as the ghosts who have not passed on and are stuck. 
The first USS Walke (DD-34) was a  Paulding-class destroyer in the United States Navy during World War I. She was named for Rear Admiral Henry A. Walke. 
Walke was laid down on 5 March 1910 at Quincy, Massachusetts, by the Fore River Shipbuilding Company; launched on 3 November 1910; sponsored by Miss Mildred Walke Walter, granddaughter of Rear Admiral Walke; and commissioned on 22 July 1911 at the Boston Navy Yard. 
On 18 July, Walke arrived in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania to begin preparations for inactivation. The ship was decommissioned on 12 December. 
Walke remained at the Philadelphia Navy Yard until the mid-1930s. She received the alphanumeric hull designation DD-34 on 17 July 1920 but lost her name 13 years later on 1 July 1933 when it was reassigned to DD-416. Known simply as DD-34, she was struck from the Naval Vessel Register on 20 March 1935 and was scrapped at the Philadelphia Navy Yard on 23 April 1935 under the terms of the London Naval Treaty. 
The word stud is often restricted to larger domesticated (especially farm) animals, such as cattle and horses.  A specialized vocabulary exists for the studs of other animals, such as kennel (dog), cattery (cat) and aviary (birds). 
A stud manager or "stud master" is an individual responsible for an employer's breeding stock.  The term is usually used for individuals working with dogs or horses.  It is usually applied regardless of gender. 
The stud manager typically suggests desired matings to the owner, and arranges for the same, whether in-house or by contract with animals standing at stud, approves and arranges matings to the owner's animals at stud requested by outsiders, and keeps all records, including notifying the appropriate animal registries. 
In a European large or formal household the "Stud Master" or manager may be a permanent title and position; in this case this individual is often responsible for overseeing the maintenance of the stables and kennels as well.  Most large stud farms have a full-time individual assigned to stallion management, but many stud managers have either a part-time or contractual arrangement or their duties as stud manager may be incorporated with those of the overall farm or stable manager. 
In old English law, a commission of rebellion, or writ of rebellion, was a process of contempt on the nonappearance of a defendant. It was issued out when a man, after proclamation issued out of the chancery, or the exchequer, and made by the sheriff, to present himself, under pain of his allegiance, to the court by a certain day, does not appear. 
Allen "Jubilee" Dunbar (born May 17, 1947) is a former American football wide receiver who played two seasons in the National Football League with the New Orleans Saints and Cleveland Browns. He was drafted by the San Francisco 49ers in the third round of the 1972 NFL Draft. He played college football at Southern University and attended Washington High School in Lake Charles, Louisiana. Dunbar was also a member of the Philadelphia Bell of the World Football League. 
During his Georgia tenure, six of VanGorder's players were selected in the first two rounds of the NFL Draft, including defensive tackle Johnathan Sullivan, safety Thomas Davis and defensive end David Pollack in the first round, and safety Sean Jones and linebackers Boss Bailey, as well as Odell Thurman in the second round. During his four years at Georgia the Bulldogs defense only gave up 30 points one time, against LSU in the 2003 SEC Championship Game. 
On January 9, 2012, VanGorder was hired by Auburn University coach Gene Chizik as defensive coordinator. He replaced Ted Roof who departed for the defensive coordinator position at the University of Central Florida. 
On December 28, 2013, just hours after winning the 2013 Pinstripe Bowl, the University of Notre Dame announced VanGorder will take over as defensive coordinator, replacing Bob Diaco, who took over as head football coach at the University of Connecticut. 
VanGorder announced his retirement from coaching college football in 2021 and became the defensive coordinator at Gulf Shores High School in Alabama under Mark Hudspeth. 
Underground Producciones is a media producer in Argentina that produces television and film. The company was created in 2006 by Sebastian Ortega and Pablo Culell.  
In 2006, the company's first project was the dramatic telenovela Weather Does Not Stop, aired on Argentina channel 9. The show won several awards. That same year, Underground Producciones put our the Househusband sitcom and the sitcom Gladiators of Pompeii on the same channel.  
In 2008, in partnership with Telefe Contenidos and Endemol, creates and produces Los Exitosos Pells, sold to over 40 countries, including adaptations.  
Later, in 2012 produced for Telefe, a successful sitcom called Graduados, a project created in 2004 and resumed that year. 
On August 14, 2019, NBCUniversal (through their Telemundo division) acquired the company, becoming an extension of Telemundo global studios. 
Murphy was born on 2 May 1923 in Rathdown, Ireland. He was regarded as an expert on the life and works of Mikhail Sholokhov and edited Robert Daglish's English translation of Sholokhov's best-known work And Quiet Flows the Don. In 1977, he travelled to meet Sholokhov at the latter's hometown of Veshenskaya. He also published a book on Mikhail Zoshchenko. Murphy died in Oxfordshire, England on 15 May 2017, at the age of 94. 
Americus Mayo (died 1891) was a state legislator in Arkansas. Scholars have had difficulty confirming details about his life. He voted against the impeachment of Arkansas Supreme Court Justice John McClure. He served in the Arkansas House of Representatives. He was a Republican. 
Recent work suggests that lamellar bodies form a continuous membranous structure with the trans-Golgi network. 
Lamellar body secretion and lipid structure is abnormal in the epidermis of patients with Netherton syndrome, a skin disorder characterised by chronic inflammation and universal pruritus (itch). 
Deficient lipid membrane causes cold damage in patients of asteatotic eczema (also known as winter eczema). 
This article about a location in the municipality of Srebrenica, Republika Srpska is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Davida (minor planet designation: 511 Davida) is a large C-type asteroid. It is the one of the largest asteroids; approximately tied for 7th place, to within measurement uncertainties, and the 5th or 6th most massive. It was discovered by R. S. Dugan in 1903. Davida is named after David Peck Todd, an astronomy professor at Amherst College. 
There have been 9 occultation events observed since 1987, many of which produced two or three chords. Two examples shown here. 
The Social Security Act of 1935 is a law enacted by the 74th United States Congress and signed into law by US President Franklin D. Roosevelt. The law created the Social Security program as well as insurance against unemployment. The law was part of Roosevelt's New Deal domestic program. 
Industrialization and the urbanization in the 20th century created many new social problems and transformed ideas of how society and the government should function together because of them. As industry expanded, cities grew quickly to keep up with demand for labor. Tenement houses were built quickly and poorly, cramming new migrants from farms and Southern and Eastern European immigrants into tight and unhealthy spaces. Work spaces were even more unsafe. 
65 percent of the African American workforce was excluded from the initial Social Security program (as well as 27 percent of white workers). Many of these workers were covered only later on, when Social Security was expanded in 1950 and then in 1954.
The Social Security Act has been amended significantly over time. The initial act had ten major titles, with Title XI outlining definitions and regulations. More titles were added as the Social Security Act was amended.  
Title II establishes the Federal Reserve account used to pay for Social Security benefits and gives the Secretary of the Treasury the authority to invest excess reserves from the account. 
Title VI concerns public health services (investigation of disease and problems of sanitation). It grants the Surgeon General the power to distribute money to the States for that purpose with the approval of the Secretary of the Treasury. 
Title VII establishes the Social Security Board and outlines that it is to be composed of three appointees chosen by the President and approved by the Senate and serving for six years. 
Title VIII establishes a payroll tax used to fund Social Security. In the amendments of 1939, the tax was removed from the Social Security Act, placed in the Internal Revenue Code, and renamed the Federal Insurance Contributions Act. When Medicare was established in 1966, the FICA tax was increased to fund that program as well. 
Title IX establishes an excise tax to be paid on the first day of every year by employers proportional to the total wages of their employees. It also establishes the first federal unemployment insurance program in the United States. 
Retirement-aged wives, children under 16 (under 18 if attending school), widowed mothers caring for eligible children, and aged widows were all made eligible for dependents and survivors benefits. 
Under select circumstances, parents of deceased insured workers were also made eligible for Survivors Insurance. To be eligible parents must be at least age 65, not entitled to Old-Age Insurance, wholly dependent upon the insured worker for income, and mustn't have married since the death of the insured worker. Furthermore, the parent(s) are not eligible if the deceased insured worker leaves a widow or unmarried surviving child under the age of 18. 
The 1939 Amendments also increased benefit amounts and accelerated the start of monthly benefit payments from 1940 to 1942.  
These amendments raised benefits for the first time and placed the program on the road to the virtually universal coverage it has today. Specifically it is the introduction of the cost-of-living adjustment (COLA). 
In 1940, Social Security benefits paid totaled $35 million and rose to $961 million in 1950, $11.2 billion in 1960, $31.9 billion in 1970, $120.5 billion in 1980, and $247.8 billion in 1990 (all figures in nominal dollars, not adjusted for inflation). In 2004, $492 billion of benefits were paid to 47.5 million beneficiaries. In 2009, nearly 51 million Americans received $650 billion in Social Security benefits. 
Reflecting the continuing importance of the Social Security Act, biographer Kenneth S. Davis described the Social Security Act "the most important single piece of social legislation in all American history." 
Philippe Koch (born 8 February 1991) is a Swiss football defender who most recently played for Swiss club FC St. Gallen. 
This biographical article related to a football defender from Switzerland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Before 1907 numbering was somewhat erratic.  New locomotives might take the numbers of old engines, which were placed on the duplicate list and had an A suffix added to their numbers.  In 1907 the whole stock were renumbered in a systematic way, each class in a consecutive sequence, classes being ordered by type (passenger/tank/goods), power and age. After the grouping this system was adapted for the whole LMS 
The Midland classified their stock into three classes numbered 1 to 3 with 1 the least powerful and three the most.  Stock were also split into passenger and freight engines.  When the two largest 4-4-0 classes, the 3-cylinder compounds and the "999s", were introduced these were put into Class 4.  This system formed the basis for the subsequent LMS and BR classification systems. 
Midland formed in 1844 from the Midland Counties Railway, the North Midland Railway and the Birmingham and Derby Junction Railway, and took over a number of others including the Leicester and Swannington Railway and the Birmingham and Gloucester Railway.  See 
Initially, the Midland concentrated on maintaining and improving the somewhat varied fleet that it had inherited, with the assistance of The Railway Foundry in Leeds. In addition, it bought in twenty-four of their Jenny Lind locomotives and, in 1848, two unique Crampton locomotives. 
In 1912 the Midland bought the London, Tilbury and Southend Railway, but this continued to be operated more or less separately.  The Midland, and the LMS subsequently built some LT&SR designs. 
Prior to 1883 painted green.  After 1883 the Midland adopted its distinctive crimson lake livery for passenger engines. 
The London, Midland and Scottish Railway (LMS) continued the Midland's small engine policy until William Stanier arrived in 1933.  The last new Midland design was Stanier 0-4-4T of 1932/3 but some Fowler 4Fs were constructed as late as 1941. 
Further, there are several more engines to later non-Midland designs built at Derby which have survived. 
Hard Eight is the eighth novel by Janet Evanovich featuring the bounty hunter  Stephanie Plum. It was written in 2002. 
Hard Eight revolves around a child custody bond, rather than a criminal bail bond, and marks the (sometimes repeated) departure of the series from Stephanie chasing bad guys to Stephanie being stalked by bad guys.  The ninth, tenth, eleventh and twelfth volumes likewise revolve around Stephanie having a stalker. 
After interviewing Evelyn's bondsman, Les Sebring, and Steven Soter, Stephanie is baffled; Steven was domineering and abusive, and Evelyn had no friends or other family members she might go to in an emergency, and no one has any idea where she might have gone.  Steven seems to be less concerned about Annie's well-being than he is eager to get his hands on the bond money. 
While snooping through Evelyn's apartment, Stephanie encounters her landlord, a local crime boss named Eddie Abruzzi.  He warns Stephanie that if she knows where Evelyn is, she should tell him, or else he will "declare war" and she will be "the enemy." Stephanie's mentor, Ranger Manoso, explains to her that Abruzzi is an avid wargamer, and tends to frame everything in quasi-military terms. 
At the Plum home, a new crisis arises when Stephanie's "perfect" sister, Valerie, gets fired from her job at the bank.  Stephanie's mother turns to her in desperation, and Stephanie improvises, setting Valerie up with Albert Kloughn, Evelyn's hapless divorce lawyer.  Kloughn's practice has been slow in taking off, so he soon becomes attached to Stephanie, following her and Lula around in trying to apprehend fugitives and investigate Evelyn's whereabouts. 
As she is trying to track down Evelyn, Stephanie is unnerved to realize that she is being stalked.  First, someone leaves a bag of wild snakes attached to her apartment door, then a large tarantula on the seat of her car.  Worse, men dressed in animal costumes are following her around.  An attack by one of the men destroys Stephanie's car, then a second.  When the men try to kidnap her, her mother sees them and impulsively runs over one with her car. 
Finally, Stephanie comes home one night and finds Steven Soter on her living room couch, shot through the head.  The police investigate, and when she asks Joe Morelli how the body got into her apartment without any of her neighbors noticing, she is horrified by his answer: Soter's body was sawed in half at the waist, and the pieces were carried in with two large bags, then taped back together. 
Stephanie realizes that Abruzzi is "conducting psychological warfare" against her, believing that she knows where Evelyn is.  Ranger asks around and finds out that Abruzzi is searching obsessively for his most prized possession: a medal that once belonged to Napoleon.  Abruzzi, besides being a wargamer, is an avid collector of military memorabilia, and believes the medal is a lucky talisman.  Ranger admits he doesn't know why Abruzzi would think Evelyn has the medal, but obviously he does. 
Then Ranger informs her that he is collecting on her "debt" to him, and, since Stephanie is on a "break" from her relationship with Morelli, she consents to have sex with Ranger. 
Now that Evelyn is finally free of Steven, she has arranged to sell the medal to a collector in Miami for enough money to start a new life.  She knew Abruzzi was threatening Mabel, but she couldn't come out of hiding or go to the police, knowing that "the law moves too slowly for a guy like Abruzzi."  Stephanie, seeing how scared and desperate Evelyn is, lets her and Annie go. 
Running home, Stephanie calls both Morelli and Ranger.  After listening to her story, Ranger excuses himself, and a short time later, Abruzzi is found dead in his car, with a note saying that he has killed himself over some recent business failures.  Stephanie is unnerved to know that Ranger has killed Abruzzi to keep her and Evelyn safe, but she and Morelli silently agree not to pursue it any further. 
Kim Barnes (born 1958 Lewiston, Idaho) is a contemporary American author of fiction, memoir, and personal essays. She served as Poets Laureate of Idaho. 
Barnes received her B.A. in English from Lewis-Clark State College in 1983, her M.A. in English from Washington State University in 1985, and her M.F.A. in Creative Writing from the University of Montana in 1995.  Barnes teaches creative writing at the University of Idaho, and lives with her husband, Robert Wrigley, a poet, in Idaho.  They have three children. 
Barnes's creative works addresses subjects including the American West, religious fundamentalism, women's issues, logging, and the environment, and reflects her interest in feminist interpretations of mythology and Jungian archetypes. In A Country Called Home, one of her main characters has the condition known as synesthesia and sees color when she hears music. 
Her work has appeared widely in anthologies and journals, including The Georgia Review, Shenandoah, MORE Magazine, and the Pushcart Prize anthology. 
Barnes will appear on the new Lit Hub/Podglomerate Storybound (podcast), accompanied by an original score from Americana duo Pretty Gritty. 
She is the recipient of two grants from the Idaho Commission on the Arts. In 1995, she was chosen to receive the PEN/Jerard fellowship given to an emerging woman writer of nonfiction. In 1997, she was honored with a Pacific Northwest Booksellers Association Award for In the Wilderness, which was also a finalist for the Pulitzer Prize, and the Quality Paperback Book Club's New Visions Award. From 2004 to 2007, she served as Idaho Writer-in-Residence. 
George Barton Rock (born 24 May 1936) is a former Barbadian cricketer who played eight matches of first-class cricket for Barbados between 1961 and 1969. 
Rock studied radio announcing in New York City in 1965. He represented the US in the annual match against Canada in 1964. He obtained a coaching certificate in England and returned to New York in 1969 to coach cricket. 
Bluebird is a 2004 Dutch television film directed by Mijke de Jong. It is the first in a trilogy of films made by de Jong about young women becoming adults. 
Merel (Elske Rotteveel) is a 13 year old girl living in Rotterdam and looking after her younger disabled brother. She is successful at school, but hounded by a group of a classmates. As the bullying intensifies, Merel finds it hard to talk about it and her behaviour changes. 
The Atlanta Exposition Centers (AEC) are a pair of convention centers located in Atlanta. The centers are located at 3650 and 3850 Jonesboro Road, at the intersection of Jonesboro Road and Interstate 285. 
A set function generally aims to measure subsets in some way. Measures are typical examples of "measuring" set functions. Therefore, the term "set function" is often used for avoiding confusion between the mathematical meaning of "measure" and its common language meaning. 
Gert Prix (* 25. September 1957 in Klagenfurt) is an Austrian musician, mathematics teacher, informatics teacher and engineer as well as the founder and the head of operations at the Eboardmuseum. 
Gert Prix was born in Klagenfurt, where he spent his childhood. His father Helmut was a businessman and inventor, his mother Felicitas was employee. In 1984 Prix married his wife Gerti, who gave birth to two children, Thomas and Denise. 
Since 1973 Gert Prix has been interested in technics and history of electronic musical instruments. In 1987 the Eboardmuseum, which is now considered to be the largest museum for electronic keyboard instruments worldwide, arose out of his rapidly growing collection of vintage instruments. 
In 1939, Servel (then Electrolux-Servel) exhibited its residential gas air conditioner at the New York World's Fair. The exhibit, called "Magic Caves of Ice", was staged in the "Court of Flame", a building dedicated to promoting the gas industry. 
As the United States entered World War II, Servel shifted its manufacturing to support the war effort. In addition to cooking units and munitions, Servel built wings for the Republic P-47 Thunderbolt. By the end of the war, they'd produced over 6,000 pairs of wings for the US Air Force fighters. 
Starting in 1949, National Electric started receiving classified research and development contracts for the government, resulting in the production of rockets and guided missiles, JATO, and sustainer motor bodies for U.S. missiles and rockets, particularly the Nike family of guided missiles. 
In 1991, the company's remaining brands and manufacturing facilities were sold to Robur Group, an Italian manufacturer. 
After several years working as a presenter and interviewer for BBC Radio 4, Vernon's first travelogue series was Fat Man On A Bicycle. As the title implied, Vernon was obese and the first episode followed the health tests he had to undergo before setting off on his journey, which took him from Muswell Hill to the Mediterranean coast of southern France. He would repeat this journey fifteen years later for the TV series, Fat Man in France. 
Fat Man at Work and his first television series, Fat Man in the Kitchen, deviated from the travelogue style of the other series. The former featured Vernon talking to people working in factories, while the latter was a cookery programme filmed in his own kitchen in Muswell Hill in which each edition was devoted to cuisine of a different country. 
The larvae feed on Ballota hirsuta. They mine the leaves of their host plant. The mine has the form of a large, full depth blotch that starts at the leaf margin. The frass is deposited in irregular grains and is concentrated in the beginning of the mine. Pupation takes place inside the mine. Larvae can be found from April to May. 
The Unloved Woman (Spanish: La malquerida) is a 1913 play by the Spanish writer Jacinto Benavente. It has been adapted a number of times for films and television including the 1921 American silent film The Passion Flower, the 1940 Spanish film The Unloved Woman and the 1949 Mexican film The Unloved Woman. 
Sing No Evil is the fourth studio album by the rock group Half Japanese, released in 1984 by Iridescence. 
Craig Marks, in the Spin Alternative Record Guide, wrote that the album "finds Half Jap brushing up against normalcy--traditional song structures, metaphorical lyrics--with uneven, if sometimes booming, results." 
Anaqua was formed in 2004 and bought by Beacon Equity Partners in 2005. In 2006, Anaqua received $4 million from Northstar Global Partners, which they used to relocate headquarters from London to Boston and hire more staff.  In 2010, Anaqua merged with SGA2, an ISO 9000-certified supplier of global patent annuity and trademark renewal services.  In 2013, Beacon Equity Partners sold Anaqua to Insight Venture Partners. 
Major-General Thomas Handasyd, also spelt Handasyde, was an English soldier from Northumberland who served in the armies of William III and Queen Anne from 1674 to 1710. He was military commander and Governor of Jamaica from 1702 to 1711. 
After returning to England in 1711, he purchased Gaynes Hall near Great Staughton in Cambridgeshire, where he lived quietly in retirement until his death on 26 March 1729.  
Thomas Handasyd was born about 1645 in Elsdon, Northumberland, to Colonel Roger Handasyd and his wife Margaret. He was the third of four children, three of whom lived to a great age; Gerrard (ca 1640-1735), Ann (ca 1644-?) and Roger (1653-1734). 
In 1686, he married Anna Morel (died 1704) and they had five surviving children; Roger Handasyd (1689-1763), Thomas (1692-1729), William (1693-1745), who all served in the military, as well as Clifford (1695-1772) and Anne (1697-1777). 
The 1638-1651 Wars of the Three Kingdoms created strong resistance in Scotland and England to a permanent military; this meant those who wanted to pursue a military career often did so in foreign armies. When the Third Anglo-Dutch War began in 1672, the Duke of Buckingham was authorised to recruit a regiment for service against the Dutch. Handasyd's cousin James was also a lieutenant in this unit. 
Before seeing active service, the war ended in January 1674 and many of these recruits transferred to one of the English regiments of the Scots Brigade, a mercenary unit employed by the Dutch. Handasyd joined what later became the 5th Foot and fought in the Franco-Dutch War, including the Siege of Maastricht and battles of Cassel and Saint-Denis. 
After the war ended with the 1797 Treaty of Ryswick, Parliament was determined to reduce costs; Gibson's Regiment was disbanded and by 1699, the English military was less than 7,000 men. When the War of the Spanish Succession began in 1701, Handasyd was promoted Lieutenant-Colonel in the 22nd Foot. Sent to Jamaica, a notoriously unhealthy location, in April 1702 he replaced Colonel William Selwyn who died soon after arrival. 
His wife Anna died in September 1704 and was buried in St. Jago de la Vega or Spanish Town Cathedral. Like his predecessor, Sir William Beeston, Thomas had a difficult relationship with the planter-dominated Jamaican Assembly. This came to a head in 1710, when he tried to dissolve the Assembly and in the ensuing commotion, its President Peter Beckford died after allegedly falling down the stairs. 
Handasyd now requested he be relieved and was replaced as Governor by Lord Archibald Hamilton, while his son Roger became Colonel of the regiment. Promoted Major-General, he returned to England in early 1711 and purchased Gaynes Hall near Great Staughton, Cambridgeshire. He died there on 26 March 1729 and was buried in the parish church of St Andrews, where his memorial can still be seen. 
In 1901 the current facade was built, and September 30, 1906, Bishop Angelo Roncalli consecrated the altar. In the second half of the 1990s, the Holy Land began an extensive renovation of the church, completed in 1999. 
In most object-oriented languages, such as Java or C#, references may be null. These references need to be checked to ensure they are not null before invoking any methods, because methods typically cannot be invoked on null references. 
The Objective-C language takes another approach to this problem and does nothing when sending a message to nil; if a return value is expected, nil (for objects), 0 (for numeric values), NO (for BOOL values), or a struct (for struct types) with all its members initialised to null/0/NO/zero-initialised struct is returned. 
Instead of using a null reference to convey absence of an object (for instance, a non-existent customer), one uses an object which implements the expected  interface, but whose method body is empty. The advantage of this approach over a working default implementation is that a null object is very predictable and has no side effects: it does nothing. 
For example, a function may retrieve a list of files in a folder and perform some action on each. In the case of an empty folder, one response may be to throw an exception or return a null reference rather than a list. Thus, the code which expects a list must verify that it in fact has one before continuing, which can complicate the design. 
By returning a null object (i.e., an empty list) instead, there is no need to verify that the return value is in fact a list. The calling function may simply iterate the list as normal, effectively doing nothing. It is, however, still possible to check whether the return value is a null object (an empty list) and react differently if desired. 
The null object pattern can also be used to act as a stub for testing, if a certain feature such as a database is not available for testing. 
Since the child nodes may not exist, one must modify the procedure by adding non-existence or null checks: 
This, however, makes the procedure more complicated by mixing boundary checks with normal logic, and it becomes harder to read. Using the null object pattern, one can create a special version of the procedure but only for null nodes: 
It is not a pattern from Design Patterns, but is mentioned in Martin Fowler's Refactoring and Joshua Kerievsky's Refactoring To Patterns as the Insert Null Object refactoring. 
Chapter 17 of Robert Cecil Martin's Agile Software Development: Principles, Patterns and Practices is dedicated to the pattern. 
From C# 6.0 it is possible to use the "?." operator (aka null-conditional operator), which will simply evaluate to null if its left operand is null. 
A language with statically typed references to objects illustrates how the null object becomes a more complicated pattern: 
Here, the idea is that there are situations where a pointer or reference to an Animal object is required, but there is no appropriate object available. A null reference is impossible in standard-conforming C++. A null Animal* pointer is possible, and could be useful as a place-holder, but may not be used for direct dispatch: a->MakeSound() is undefined behavior if a is a null pointer. 
The null object pattern solves this problem by providing a special NullAnimal class which can be instantiated bound to an Animal pointer or reference. 
The special null class must be created for each class hierarchy that is to have a null object, since a NullAnimal is of no use when what is needed is a null object with regard to some Widget base class that is not related to the Animal hierarchy. 
Note that NOT having a null class at all is an important feature, in contrast to languages where "anything is a reference" (e.g., Java and C#). In C++, the design of a function or method may explicitly state whether null is allowed or not. 
C# is a language in which the null object pattern can be properly implemented. This example shows animal objects that display sounds and a NullAnimal instance used in place of the C# null keyword. The null object provides consistent behaviour and prevents a runtime null reference exception that would occur if the C# null keyword were used instead. 
Following the Smalltalk principle, everything is an object, the absence of an object is itself modeled by an object, called nil. In the GNU Smalltalk for example, the class of  nil is UndefinedObject, a direct descendant of Object. 
In Lisp, functions can gracefully accept the special object nil, which reduces the amount of special case testing in application code. For instance, although nil is an atom and does not have any fields, the functions car and cdr accept nil and just return it, which is very useful and results in shorter code. 
Since nil is the empty list in Lisp, the situation described in the introduction above doesn't exist. Code which returns nil is returning what is in fact the empty list (and not anything resembling a  null reference to a list type), so the caller does not need to test the value to see whether or not it has a list. 
The null object pattern is also supported in multiple value processing. If the program attempts to extract a value from an expression which returns no values, the behavior is that the null object nil is substituted. Thus (list (values)) returns (nil) (a one-element list containing nil). The (values) expression returns no values at all, but since the function call to list needs to reduce its argument expression to a value, the null object is automatically substituted. 
In Common Lisp, the object nil is the one and only instance of the special class null. What this means is that a method can be specialized to the null class, thereby implementing the null design pattern. Which is to say, it is essentially built into the object system: 
The class null is a subclass of the symbol class, because nil is a symbol. Since nil also represents the empty list, null is a subclass of the list class, too. Methods parameters specialized to symbol or list will thus take a nil argument. Of course, a null specialization can still be defined which is a more specific match for nil. 
Unlike Common Lisp, and many dialects of Lisp, the Scheme dialect does not have a nil value which works this way; the functions car and cdr may not be applied to an empty list; Scheme application code therefore has to use the empty? or pair? predicate functions to sidestep this situation, even in situations where very similar Lisp would not need to distinguish the empty and non-empty cases thanks to the behavior of nil. 
In duck-typed languages like Ruby, language inheritance is not necessary to provide expected behavior.  
Attempts to directly monkey-patch NilClass instead of providing explicit implementations give more unexpected side effects than benefits. 
In duck-typed languages like JavaScript, language inheritance is not necessary to provide expected behavior. 
The null object pattern solves this problem by providing a special NullAnimal class which can be instantiated as an object of type Animal. As with C++ and related languages, that special null class must be created for each class hierarchy that needs a null object, since a NullAnimal is of no use when what is needed is a null object that does not implement the Animal interface. 
The following null object pattern implementation demonstrates the concrete class providing its corresponding null object in a static field Empty. This approach is frequently used in the .NET Framework (String.Empty, EventArgs.Empty, Guid.Empty, etc.). 
This pattern should be used carefully as it can make errors/bugs appear as normal program execution. 
This biographical article related to Luxembourgian artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
James "Jim" Moloney (born 20 September 1954) is an Australian children's author. A prolific writer whose books span an age range from seven- to seventeen-year-olds, he is best known for his young adult novels. He has been nominated and won awards for his books in the Children's Book Council of Australia Awards. His books have been translated into French, Korean, Lithuanian and Flemish/Dutch. 
I like to get inside the head of today's adolescents to connect with the passion they have for like and understand what they care about. The challenge then is to express it in a story.
His themes in his novels for older readers include family, love, belonging, body image, rites of passage, sexism, mateship/friendship, winning at all costs, relationships, identity, disability and racial issues. 
Bettiah Raj was the second-largest zamindari in the region of India now known as Bihar. It generated annual land revenue rentals of more than 2 million rupees. 
The Bettiah Raj forests were managed for timber production. Bihar state government took over management of the Bettiah Raj forests in 1953 and 1954 under the Bihar Private Protected Forests Act (1947). Valmiki National Park and Wildlife Sanctuary include portion of the former Bettiah Raj estate. 
The Bettiah Gharana is one of the three (others being Darbhanga Gharana, and Dumraon Gharana) oldest style of Dhrupad vocal song from the state of Bihar. 
Before 1945 the area was part of Germany. For the history of the region, see History of Pomerania. The village has a population of 1,162. 
Milson Island is located in New South Wales, Australia. It was first settled over 100 years ago and has been used as a bacteriological station, quarantine station, a hospital to treat soldiers from WWI with venereal disease, mental hospital, a rehab for alcoholics, a women's jail, and now a sports and recreation centre.  
All that is left of the old mental asylum is the nurses' quarters or hospital. When the mental asylum was operating, an alarm system was set up, so that people on the island could keep themselves safe from mad escapees. The nurses' quarters are now rotted away, but the furnishings from the asylum still remain. 
The Sport and Recreation Centre still uses the refurbished sleeping quarters as the dining room and kitchen. The rooms at Milson Island range from school kids' rooms that sleep up to five people to lodges for one to four people. 
The Lajeado State Park (Portuguese: Parque Estadual do Lajeado) is a state park in the state of Tocantins, Brazil. It protects a fragile, dry, hilly environment near the state capital of Palmas. 
The park contains springs, waterfalls and cave paintings. There is a staff residence in the park. The park may be visited after giving advance notice for hiking, contemplation or interpretation with guidance from trained guides. There was a fish farm before the park was established, but it has been closed. The park is surrounded by the Serra do Lajeado Environmental Protection Area. 
171 species of flora have been found, from 61 families. Leguminosa was the family with the highest number of species (28), followed by Aracaceae (8), Melastomataceae, Rubiaceae and Vochysiaceae with six species each.  There are no endemic, rare or endangered plant species. The main species are Qualea grandiflora (pau-terra), Curatella americana (Lixeira), Plathymenia reticulata (pau-santo), Vellozia squamata (canela-de-ema) and Byrsonima subterranea (murici). 
After going undrafted in the 2015 NFL Draft, Henry signed with the Green Bay Packers on May 8, 2015. On September 5, 2015, he was released by the Packers during final team cuts. 
Henry was claimed off waivers by the Denver Broncos on September 6, 2015. He appeared in two games in the first five weeks of the Broncos season. On October 14, 2015, Henry was released by the Broncos to make room for the signing of tight end Richard Gordon. 
On October 16, 2015, Henry was signed to the Packers' practice squad, where he spent the rest of his rookie season. He was re-signed by the Packers after the season ended on January 18, 2016. 
Entering his second season; Henry missed time during training camp due to a groin injury. He later broke the index finger on his right hand in the second preseason game against the Oakland Raiders, resulting in his having to wear a club cast on his hand for the second straight year. On August 30, 2016, Henry was placed on injured reserve. He was waived by the Packers after reaching an injury settlement on September 1, 2016. 
Henry was signed to the Baltimore Ravens' practice squad on November 7, 2016 but was released three days later. 
In December 2016, Henry was diagnosed with acute myeloid leukemia after being released by the Ravens. He started feeling pain in his shoulder in November, and doctors later discovered a cancerous mass in his chest. Henry received well-wishes from former coach Mike McCarthy, former teammate Peyton Manning, and others. Henry had been told by the Ravens that he was going to be re-signed soon, but then started feeling pain a few days after he was cut. 
On June 30, 2017, Henry died from acute myeloid leukemia at the age of 24. He is survived by his wife Madison. 
Following the 1981 season the Dallas Tornado merged with Tampa Bay. At the time, Dallas principals Lamar Hunt and Bill McNutt retained a minority stake in the Rowdies. Two years later after the 1983 season, Strawbidge, Hunt and McNutt sold the team outright to local investors Stella Thayer, Bob Blanchard and Dick Corbett. 
While Mike Connell's and Perry Van der Beck's numbers have since been retired by the current franchise, Wegerle's #7 continues to be reissued each season. 
While anyone who supported the club could call themselves a Fanny, members of the official Rowdies Fan Club particularly claimed the moniker as their own. The fan club held regular meetings and social events and published a newsletter. 
The "Wowdies" were the Rowdies' cheerleaders. The team also had a pep band known as the "Loudies" that sat in the south endzone and attended local pep rallies. 
The NASL folded in 1984, but the Rowdies continued to play for several more years. Tampa Stadium continued to be used as their home ground for outdoor games except during the 1991 and 1992 seasons in the APSL. Those two years were spent at the USF Soccer Stadium, before returning to Tampa Stadium in 1993 for the team's final season in existence. 
As an independent club, the Rowdies played only one match in 1985. It was against the U.S. Men's team on the Fourth of July in front of 30,038 fans. 
In the summer of 1988, the Rowdies joined the third incarnation of the American Soccer League. They would stay in this league and its successor (the APSL) until the team folded after the 1993 season. During this six year stretch they achieved moderate success, winning one division title and making the playoffs four times. In 1992 they finished as runners-up to Colorado in the regular season, in the Professional Cup final, and in the APSL final as well. 
MLS initially operated the team with the hope of selling to a private local owner. That became difficult after Malcolm Glazer bought the Tampa Bay Buccaneers of the National Football League in 1995 and demanded that the community build a new stadium. Raymond James Stadium was completed in 1998 and Tampa Stadium was demolished soon thereafter, forcing the Mutiny to move to the new facility. 
The Bucs' lease agreement in their new home allowed them to keep most non-ticket revenues from all events at the facility, including Mutiny matches, severely damaging the financial viability of the soccer club. As financial losses mounted (up to $2 million a year), MLS desperately courted Glazer to buy the Mutiny. Glazer declined, so the league opted to fold the Mutiny, along with other Florida-based MLS team of that era, the Miami Fusion, in early 2002. 
To date, the new Rowdies have honored both Mike Connell's and Perry Van der Beck's significant contribution to soccer, both on and off the field in the community at large, by retiring their jerseys. The Rowdies won the 2012 NASL Championship. As of 2017 they are currently members of the second division, United Soccer League, and have announced their intention to gain entry into MLS's next wave of expansion. 
 All lyrics are written by Anne Preven, except where noted; all music is composed by Preven and Scott Cutler, except where noted.
Potamogeton gemmiparus, is a species of plant found in North America. It is also known as Potamogeton pusillus var. gemmiparus, common names capillary pondweed, slender pondweed, and budding pondweed.  It is listed as threatened in Connecticut and in New Hampshire, as rare in Indiana, and as a special concern in Rhode Island. 
On Mussel Ridge, hydrothermal alteration of rocks has produced several minerals like alunite, amorphous silica, anhydrite, barite, chalcopyrite, cristobalite, magnetite, marcasite, natroalunite, natrojarosite, pyrite, pyrophyllite, smectite, and native sulfur; in some places, the volcanic rocks have been entirely replaced by alteration products. Hyaloclastic rocks have also been observed. 
Early observations of volcanic activity at Monowai occurred in 1977 and 1978. The last eruption sequence may have occurred in October 2014 or May 2016, when pumice rafts and water discolouration were observed, respectively. Both events were accompanied by seismic episodes which indicate that between April 2014 and January 2017 there were about two eruptions per month. Monowai may be the most active submarine volcano in the world. 
The town is a part of Gobichettipalayam constituency and elects its member of legislative assembly every five years, and a part of the Tirupur constituency that elects its member of parliament. The town is administered by a municipality established in 1949 and has a population of 60,279 as of 2011. It is known as " Mini Kollywood" because of the film shooting that takes place here and many films in Tamil and other languages have been shot. 
The population is dominated by the Kongu Vellalar community. There are a significant number of North Indians, Gurkhas, Malayalis, Uralis, Senguntha Mudaliars, Vanniyars, Dalits, Nadars and Vettuva Gounders. As per the religious census of 2011, Gobichettipalayam had 90.3% Hindus, 7.1% Muslims, 2.5% Christians and 0.1% others. 
Gobichettipalayam Municipality was constituted on 1 October 1949 as III grade as per G.O. Ms. No. 1948 (Local Administration Department) dated 12 August 1949 with effect from 1 October 1949 and was elevated to Grade II as per G.O. Ms. No. 194 (Local Administration Department) dated 10 February 1970 and to first Grade with effect from 1 October 1977 as per G.O. Ms. No. 1532 (R.D & L.A.), 21 September 1977, and to Selection Grade as per G.O. Ms. No. 238 (MA&WS), 2 December 2008. 
The town elects a Member to the legislative assembly. It is currently represented by education minister K. A. Sengottaiyan of AIADMK. Gobichettipalayam was a parliamentary constituency until 2009 and was replaced by the newly formed Tirupur constituency during delimitation by Election Commission of India. After the delimination, Gobichettipalayam assembly constituency is part of the Tirupur constituency. 
Gobichettipalayam has a good educational infrastructure. Notable schools are Diamond Jubilee Higher Secondary School, established over a 100 years ago and visited by Mahatma Gandhi and Shree Vidyalaya, which has a full-time dyslexic center. The city is also home to Gobi Arts and Science College, one of the oldest arts colleges in the state. The city itself has only a few engineering colleges, but its proximity to Namakkal and Erode makes it an ideal educational hub. 
The city is developing quickly and has been described by the government as "Bi-functional", with 31% of the work force engaged in agriculture, 56% in trading and other activities and 13% in industry. A number of banks have been established in the town in recent years, testimony to the growth and prosperity of the local economy. ICICI Bank established its third branch in Tamil Nadu here. The economy is predominantly dependent on agriculture. 
The economy of Gobichettipalayam centers on agriculture, with paddy, sugarcane, plantain, tobacco and turmeric being the principal crops. The taluk is known for its lush green paddy fields which attracts cine industry. Gobichettipalayam is well known for its plantain cultivation and the production of coconuts. There are regulated market places run by the Government of India for the trade of agricultural products mainly turmeric, copra and bananas. 
Gobichettipalayam is one of the leading producers of silk cocoon in the country. Mulberry cultivation has increased in the recent years and a silk research extension center was established by the Government of Tamil Nadu in collaboration with the Central Silk Board. India's second automated silk reeling unit was established in here in 2008. 
A large number of spinning mills have come up in to support to the weaving and knitwear to supplement Tirupur. IT and BPO sectors are  also developing with a few start up companies based out of the town. Other industries include cotton textiles, motors, pumps, automobile spares, textile machinery manufacturing, castings and machined parts. 
Since its founding, Ragazzi has performed regularly with the San Francisco Opera, San Francisco Symphony, Opera San Jose, West Bay Opera, Lawrence Pech Dance Company, Peninsula Symphony, Masterworks Chorale and the Stanford University Symphonic Chorus among others.[citation needed] 
Domestically Ragazzi has toured Minnesota where they attended AMERICAFEST (2003), Oregon where they attended PICCFEST (2005) as a feature choir, Montana where they attended the International Choral Festival (2006), and Arizona (2009). 
In July 2009 Ragazzi's YME toured the San Francisco East Bay, attending the Golden Gate International Children's Choral Festival,. The group won the following awards: 
This article about a historic property or district  in Onondaga County, New York, that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fabio Trinidade da Silveira (born 26 May 1977 in Pantano Grande, Rio Grande do Sul), commonly known as Fabinho, is a Brazilian footballer who plays as a forward. He is currently a free agent. 
Fabinho proved his value as a late sub again on April 19 when Randers FC played against FC Copenhagen. Fabinho scored the winning goal in the ending minutes. 
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football forward born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The third day is always Fast of Gedalia, it follows Rosh HaShanah. It is a half day fast, meaning it is only observed from dawn of the third day until dusk of that same day. However, when the third of Tishrei falls on Shabbat, the fast is postponed to the fourth day. 
After Rosh Hashanah ends and before Yom Kippur starts the next notable day is the special Shabbat that has its own name Shabbat Shuvah ("Sabbath [of] Return") meaning the Sabbath devoted to "teshuva" which means "repentance" in Judaism.  
Three of the main observances are themes that are repeated in both the Rosh Hashanah and Yom Kippur prayer services and printed in every mahzor ("holiday prayer book") of those two holy days: "Repentance, Prayer and Charity (teshuva, tefila, tzedaka) remove the evil decree": 
There are many observances, customs, rituals and prayers said and performed on Rosh Hashanah, such as:  
As with all Jewish festivals, practicing Jews will not use any electronic devices during the holiday. 
Fasting is done partially only on Fast of Gedalia and for the full day of Yom Kippur. Money in any form is not handled or carried on Jewish holidays according to Jewish law, but promises to make donations are allowed. 
In contemporary Judaism, many congregations offer a Selichot service near midnight on the Saturday night preceding the Ten Days of Repentance. This, often short, prayer service serves as a preamble to the High Holy Days (Yom Kippur in particular). The service itself comprises prayers of atonement, the liturgy of which may be found in many machzorim (prayer books for the High Holy Days) or in special prayer books or pamphlets known as "slechot." 
Some Jews and communities have the custom of performing Kapparot during a weekday, a ritual in which either a chicken or money is swung over one's head usually three times as a symbolic atonement by the chicken or the money "assuming the sins" of the one performing the ritual. This custom is not required by the Torah. 
As with all Jewish festivals, practicing Jews will not use any electronic devices during the holiday. 
Yom Kippur is over at sundown on the tenth day at nightfall but is 'confirmed' as concluded after the recitation of the Kaddish following the end of ne'ila ("closing") prayer and the shofar is sounded. The services end in joy with the hope that all have been inscribed in the Book of Life. 
During these days some are stricter and eat only baked goods produced with a Jew involved in the baking process known as Pat Yisrael even though during the year they eat any kosher baked goods known as pat paltar. If while traveling it is not possible to obtain Pat Yisrael, then being stricter is not a requirement. 
There are conflicting customs whether weddings should be held during the weekdays of the Ten Days: some Orthodox Jews avoid holding weddings during this more serious period, while other Orthodox Jews as well as non-Orthodox Jews may do so. 
The most serious and comprehensive reasons behind the Ten Days of Repentance are derived from the works of Maimonides (known in Hebrew as the RAMBAM): 
Massimiliano Valcareggi (born February 12, 1995 in Trieste, Italy) is an alpine skier from Italy. He will compete for Greece at the 2014 Winter Olympics in three alpine skiing events. 
Although born in Italy, Valcareggi's mother is Greek, allowing him to compete for Greece. He chose to compete for Greece because he felt he had a better chance of making their national team. 
This biographical article relating to alpine skiing in Greece is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a biologist from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kadakkattu Para is a small village included in Tenhippalam panchayath.  It is three kilometers west of the Upper Chelari bus stop.  The main villages on this route are Shanthi Corner, Alungal, Mukkood and Pichanadathilpady.  The important places of worship are Thrakkannoor Shiva Temple, Pichanadathil Masjidh and Kadakkattoor Masjidh.  Other important landmarks are AEMS Public School, VEM Public School and Shamsul Hudha Madrassah 
The 2007 Triple J Hottest 100 was announced on Australia Day, 26 January 2008.  It was the fifteenth countdown of the most popular songs of the year, as chosen by the listeners of Australian radio station Triple J. 
Voting began on 1 January 2008, and closed on 20 January 2008.  More than 700,000 votes were counted in the poll. The broadcast began at 10 a.m. AEST, and for the first time was broadcast live to all time zones (as opposed to being on a delayed broadcast).  Triple J hosted two live sites, one at The Domain, Sydney and one at Melbourne Docklands. 
The 2007 poll was the closest in Hottest 100 history with only 13 votes separating the number 1 and 2 songs. The 2007 Hottest 100 contained 52 works by Australian artists. This equals the results in the 1999 poll. 
Triple J's Hottest 100 Volume 15 is the compilation featuring the best of the Top 100 voted tracks on two CDs.  It went on sale 8 March 2008. 
The inclusion of the Riemannian circle as the equator (or any great circle) of the 2-sphere of constant Gaussian curvature +1, is an isometric imbedding in the sense of metric spaces (there is no isometric imbedding of the Riemannian circle in Hilbert space in this sense). 
Linda Nagata (born November 7, 1960 in San Diego, California) is a Hawaii-based American author of speculative fiction, science fiction, and fantasy novels, novellas, and short stories. Her novella Goddesses was the first online publication to win the Nebula Award. She frequently writes in the Nanopunk genre, which features nanotechnology and the integration of advanced computing with the human brain. 
Nagata began writing after graduating from university, and published her first short story in 1987. She now publishes under her independent imprint, Mythic Island Press, LLC., which publishes e-books and trade paperbacks.  She is perhaps most recognized for her Nanotech Succession series, which is considered exemplary of the Nanopunk genre. 
The three begin to live together as a family for a while, and Rayber is excited to have his nephew back in order to raise him as a normal boy and provide him with a proper education. However, Francis resists his uncle's attempts at secular reform very much the same way he resisted Mason's attempts at religious reform. Rayber understands what Francis is going through, as he himself had been kidnapped as a child by Mason, but Rayber's father had managed to rescue him. 
Tarwater runs away into the woods and tries to make his way back to his great-uncle's house to confront his demons once and for all. He eventually hitches a ride with another man, who entices Tarwater to get drunk. Tarwater takes the man's offer and passes out, eventually waking up naked against a tree with his clothes neatly folded beside him. He dresses hurriedly and sets fire to the area. 
From the days of John the Baptist until now, the kingdom of heaven suffereth violence, and the violent bear it away.
Another possible meaning is that both secularism and fundamentalism (that is, the Protestant functioning outside of the Roman Catholic Church) are heresy, which blinds their adherents to God's truth. When God's grace comes into contact with an errant life, a violent revelation occurs. Falsehood and heresy are burnt off, and the sinner then sees the truth clearly. Those who suffer this spiritual violence bear the kingdom of God with them as they go through the world. 
Flannery O'Connor was a devout Catholic, and The Violent Bear It Away reflects her religious beliefs. It is filled with religious imagery and themes, ranging from the power of passion to the dominance of destiny. 
James Cantrell feels that O'Connor's Irish heritage is central to the novel, serving as the foundation of her exploration of the conflicts between Christ and secularism in America. He says, for example, the surname "Tarwater" is completely understood only by focusing on Irish culture and history. 
The Cebu IT Park (formerly known as Asiatown IT Park) is a 27-hectare mixed use business park in Cebu City, Philippines, envisioned to attract locators in the information technology services. It is developed by Cebu Property Ventures and Development Corporation, a subsidiary of Cebu Holdings, Inc. Cebu Holdings itself is a subsidiary of Ayala Land. 
The site of where the Cebu IT Park is on used to be the site of the old Lahug Airport, which opened on 1938 before suspending operations in 1966, when Cebu's airport was transferred to the island of Mactan. One event of historical note occurred in February 19, 1981, when Pope John Paul held an open-air Papal Mass on the airport's runway. 
The airport was finally closed in the mid-1990s, after it was acquired by Philippine property developer Ayala Land, just a couple of years after the same developer acquired the Club Filipino golf course (which would later become the site of the Cebu Business Park). It was approved by the Philippine Economic Zone Authority (PEZA) board as an economic zone on April 6, 2000. On February 27, 2001, Presidential Proclamation No. 12 made it an Information Technology Special Economic Zone. 
Construction on eOffice One, the first office modules in Cebu IT Park, began in 2001 and opened in 2002. 
Opened in 2019, the Ayala Malls Central Bloc is the second Ayala Mall in Cebu, and is the first major retail establishment within the property. Also located adjacent to the mall's complex is a Seda Hotel and two office buildings. 
This article about a location in Central Visayas region of the Philippines is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Peterlee Community Hospital is a health facility in O'Neill Drive, Peterlee, County Durham, England. It is managed by North Tees and Hartlepool NHS Foundation Trust. 
The facility was commissioned after pressure from local members of parliament to provide modern healthcare in this growing industrial area. After appropriate ground condition surveys, construction started and it opened as Peterlee Community Hospital in the late 1990s. The urgent care centre closed for overnight treatment in late 2019. 
Carson Ferri-Grant (born December 17, 1950) is an American actor and artist. Grant has created characters and stories in visual mediums as drawings, paintings, in films and on stage. 
Grant moved to New York City in 1970 to study acting technique with Lee Strasberg. He joined the professional acting unions: Screen Actors Guild, American Federation of Television and Radio Artists and Actors' Equity Association; and was represented by the William Morris Agency, who created the stage name 'Carson Grant'. He trained with Wally Harper, who coached his baritone voice, and Phil Black who trained him with modern jazz and fencing. 
Grant performed various acting roles with New York City Opera and began his film acting career in films as Man on a Swing, The Front and Death Wish. He portrayed 'Romeo' in Romeo and Juliet at New Jersey Shakespeare in the Park and was young 'Thomas Jefferson' in The Last Ballot in the WNET 13 Bicentennial series. 
Graduating as a Psi Chi Honors Society recipient in Psychology and elected Psi Chi president at CUNY - Hunter College BA program, Grant's master thesis on the Therapeutic Validity of Drama/Art Therapy, earned him an MA (summa cum laude) at University of Connecticut. He pursued postgraduate work at Columbia University. Grant presented his research at Georgetown's Drama Therapy Association 1985 convention. 
Grant attended and taught at Pratt School of Art and Design, New York City to enhance his knowledge of computer graphics and digital editing. He worked as a computer graphic artist, animator and editor using AT&T- NASA software, creating formats for the premiere of CD-ROM and DVD and Internet technology, for companies such as Fusion, Advanced Graphics, Exhibit Technologies, Carabineer, and Ogilvy & Mather Advertising. 
Painting on the computer tablet, Carson created animations for the 1991 Sony's Time Square Video Screen, present-day Panasonic panel hung on the One Times Square building, for the Ayer advertising campaign "Breakthrough with the Unexpected" animation of an egg cracking to release a butterfly  and also projects for IBM, Intel, Kodak, DeBeers, Shell, American Express, and National Geographic's Global Access Interactive Gallery in Washington, DC. 
Grant participated as a visual artist in many group art exhibitions in New York City as a curator, a contributing painter and photographer. As a film actor, Grant has portrayed more than 400 film characters in commercial and independent films as of 2012. 
In 2011, Carson Ferri-Grant curated an exhibition "Fall: Rising Above 9-11" for the West Side Arts Coalition, New York City. He asked the contributing artists to create original art work of their feelings about 9-11 for the tenth anniversary. , 
In 1998, Italian director Edoardo Amati asked Grant to portray his lead character in the film Master Shot. 
In 2008, Carson Ferri-Grant was elected Vice President of GIAA (Guild of Italian American Actors) and represented GIAA delegate on the 4 A's (Associated Actors and Artistes of America) meetings chaired by President Theodore Bikel. 
As a film actor, Grant has portrayed more than 400 film characters in commercial and independent films as of 2020. In 2013 performed at Symphony Space, NYC in 50 year tribute to JFK in gala event "November 21, 1963: The day before". 
Grant has won a number of artistic and civic awards, including the Rhode Island Scholastic Gold Key Art Award (1962), Avon Foundation grant 1981, America The Beautiful Fund grant (1981), ACM SIGGRAPH: Vision in Art Award (1990), and the GIAA Italian American Heritage Award (2007). The latter was awarded for contributing to the positive portrayal of Italian American culture via his role in the film God Bless America. 
In 2008, Carson Ferri-Grant, was honored with a membership into the National Society of the Sons of the American Revolution through the Rhode Island Chapter. In 2009 Carson Ferri-Grant was included in the Marquis "Who's Who in American Art", and "Who's Who in America", and in 2010 was honored for inclusion in Marquis "International Who's Who". 
The town lies in the northern part of the commune, where it is crossed by the Allier, which flows northeast through the northern part of the commune. 
The IHF Women's Youth World Championship is the official competition for women's national handball teams under age 18, has been organized by the International Handball Federation since 2006. It takes place every two years in even years. 
Glory TV is based in London, with recording of various programs taking place in key Christian communities in the United Kingdom such as Slough, Hounslow, Leicester, Wolverhampton, Southall, Glasgow and other areas with prominent British Asian churches. Programs are also recorded in and broadcast from Italy, France and the Netherlands, where Punjabi- and Urdu-speaking Christians are located. Religious programming and tour footage from Israel are also shown on a daily basis. 
On 27 September 2014 Glory TV entertained the thoughts and opinions of inspirational Christian speakers, Howard and Renu Dwyer, the latter of the two gave a heartfelt testimony on her near death experience. 
In 2014 Glory TV went off the air for a short time due to not being able to provide its broadcasting fees due to lack of funding as the channel relies entirely upon viewer donations. 
Sportzentrum Maspernplatz is an indoor sporting arena located in Paderborn, Germany.  The capacity of the arena is 3,040 people.  It is currently home to the Paderborn Baskets basketball team. 
This article about a North Rhine-Westphalian building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
While he studied medicine at the University of Berlin, he was an assistant to pathologist Rudolf Virchow (1821-1902). After graduation, he continued as an assistant to Virchow until 1886. From 1886 to 1921 he taught as a professor at the University of Greifswald, where he also served as director of the pathological institute. 
He is known for his pioneer work with tissue cultures, and his experimentation in the field of bacteriology. "Grawitz' tumour", also known as renal cell carcinoma, is named after him.  
This article about a German person in the field of medicine is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 17th-century Acta Sanctorum records a story of a blind English woman miraculously cured by Triduana. The saint appears to her in a dream, and instructs her to travel to Restalrig. She does so, and regains her sight at Triduana's tomb. The woman's daughter is later cured of blindness after praying to Triduana. 
St Tredwell's Chapel, Papa Westray is a renowned Orkney pilgrimage-centre, standing on a conical mound on a small peninsula (about 4.5 metres high and 35 metres across at the water level) in St Tredwell's Loch. The remains of the late medieval walls can be seen, built over Iron Age remains, including a tunnel leading to a circular building or broch. The thick walls of the chapel and records of tracery work indicate an important and well-founded establishment. 
Such was the veneration entertained by the inhabitants for this ancient saint, that it was with difficulty that the first Presbyterian minister of the parish could restrain them, of a Sunday morning, from paying their devotions at this ruin, previous to their attendance on public worship in the reformed church. Wonders, in the way of cure of bodily disease, are said to have been wrought by this saint, whose fame is now passed away and name almost forgotten.
Both songs were composed by Tetsuji Hayashi, who was the composer for the previous version of the band Kiyotaka Sugiyama & Omega Tribe. The B-side was written by Yasushi Akimoto, who was one of the lyricists for S. Kiyotaka & Omega Tribe. 
Honduras competed at the 2011 World Aquatics Championships in Shanghai, China between July 16 and 31, 2011. 
Justin Lee Collins (born 28 July 1974) is a former British radio and television presenter, and actor from Bristol, England. 
In 2014 Collins starred in the comedy/horror feature film The Hatching alongside Thomas Turgoose and Andrew Potts and in 2015 played a small role in the time travel comedy Time Slips. 
Collins was born on 28 July 1974 in Southmead, Bristol, to Anita and Danny Collins, a self-employed electrician. Collins is an only child. In 1990, Collins left education at Speedwell Technology College at the age of 15 with no qualifications and started working at Marks & Spencer as a warehouseman. 
Collins began his career in entertainment as a stand-up comic whilst still working part-time as a double-glazing window demonstrator. He won the best New Comedy Act award at the Glastonbury Festival in 1997 and reached the finals of the BBC New Comedy Awards at the Edinburgh Fringe Festival the same year. Collins gave up stand-up comedy in 2002 to concentrate on TV and radio presenting, stating that he never intends to return to the profession. 
In 2008 Collins appeared as Amos Hart in the hit show Chicago, for which he rehearsed for at the Cambridge Theatre. Collins said of the role, "I'm over the moon to be playing the sexiest part in the best show on the West End stage. I've already gone through a dozen pairs of tights." 
From August 2011 to September 2012 Collins played Dennis Dupree in the West End production of Rock of Ages. 
Collins began hosting a radio show on XFM in 2003, initially on Sundays at 1 to 3 am, later progressing to Saturday afternoons from 3 to 6 pm. He left in December 2005 and returned to host the Saturday 2 to 6pm slot during April 2011. On 17 September that year, Collins sat in for Dermot O'Leary's Saturday show on BBC Radio 2. Collins was heard performing a Tom Jones impersonation on BBC Radio 1's Chris Moyles Show in January 2008. 
In 2014, Collins returned to radio with his own weekly show on Fubar Radio, an uncensored station featuring Andy Parsons and Mark Dolan. The show is also available via iTunes in podcast form. 
In 2002, Collins made shows for Bravo and MTV and became the host of the companion show for the first series of Strictly Come Dancing. He was replaced by Claudia Winkleman the following year and the show moved from BBC Three to BBC Two. 
In 2005 and 2006, Collins presented The Games: Live At Trackside on E4 alongside Caroline Flack. The series was the companion show to Channel 4's sports-based reality programme The Games. 
On 7 May 2007, he was a guest presenter on The New Paul O'Grady Show on Channel 4 when O'Grady took a break. Collins appeared on Top Gear with Alan Carr on 22 June 2008, for the Star in a Reasonably-Priced Car segment. 
In June 2008, a show was aired on Sky One entitled Justin Lee Collins: 180, which followed his quest to be a professional darts player. In the show, he practised with Keith Deller and played in the BDO International Open on 15 June 2008. He lost in the first round 3-0 in legs to county player Stuart Bousfield, who was in the top 100 in the BDO rankings at the time. 
In 2014, Collins was cast in British feature film The Hatching as 'Stan'. Directed by Michael Anderson. Collins stars alongside Andrew Potts and Thomas Turgoose. The following year he had a bit-part in time travel comedy Time Slips, directed by Stephen Hyams. 
In August 2016 Collins made a return to TV, four years after his conviction, by becoming a regular presenter on FanTV. The show attracted a small audience and was cancelled a few months later. 
In 2007, Collins signed a three-album deal with Universal. Due to other commitments the first album was never released and subsequently the deal was called off. Collins stated in an interview with Reveal Magazine (2012) that he would like to resume his efforts to release music in the future. 
In September 2009 Collins' autobiography Good Times! was published by Ebury Press. An audiobook followed. 
In 2003, Collins married Karen Lee. She gave birth to their first child, a boy, in May 2005. In January 2008, Collins announced that his wife had recently given birth to their second son. Collins separated from his wife in late 2010. 
The 1992 Sonoma State Cossacks football team represented Sonoma State during the 1992 NCAA Division II football season. Sonoma State competed in the Northern California Athletic Conference in 1992. 
The Killer Shrews is a 1959 American independent science fiction film directed by Ray Kellogg, and produced by Ken Curtis and Gordon McLendon. The film stars James Best, Ingrid Goude, Curtis, McLendon, Baruch Lumet and "Judge" Henry Dupree. 
Shot outside of Dallas, Texas, it was produced back-to-back with The Giant Gila Monster. Now in the public domain, the film has been issued multiple DVD releases and was lampooned in the fourth season of Mystery Science Theater 3000. 
Principal photography took place outside of Dallas, Texas. Special effects were provided by first-time director Kellogg, who served as the head of 20th Century Fox's special effects department throughout most of the 1950s. Close-ups of the shrews were filmed using hand puppets, and for the wider shots, coonhounds were costumed as the shrews. 
This low-budget feature was regarded as one of the more successful "regional films". Unlike other regional films, however, it received national and even foreign distribution. 
On Rotten Tomatoes, The Killer Shrews holds an approval rating of 50%, based on 10 reviews, with a weighted average rating of 4.6 out of 10. 
Leonard Maltin awarded the movie 2.5 out of 4 stars, calling it "an inventive but silly sci-fi tale". 
Despite mixed reviews, the movie was a commercial success. Unlike many American creature features of the time, it was released internationally adding to its profits. 
The sequel Return of the Killer Shrews was produced in 2012, again starring Best as Thorne Sherman. Bruce Davison took the role of Jerry. The movie also stars John Schneider and Rick Hurst, Best's co-stars in The Dukes of Hazzard. The length of time between the original movie's release and the sequel's release (more than 50 years) is one of the longest time periods in movie history between original movies and sequels. 
The remake/parody Attack of the Killer Shrews was released in 2016 by White Lion Studios. Directed by Ken Cosentino, it was filmed as a horror comedy with "deliberately awful...horrible shrew puppets" and a different cast of characters. 
On 17 August 1929, Footscray played a round 16 fixture against Melbourne at the MCG, during which Stevens was involved in several on field incidents. As the players were leaving the field at half time, Stevens was struck in the face by a man from the crowd and hit "by a woman with her parasol", before being assisted to the rooms by police constables. The spectator that struck Stevens, Hector Michael Davis, was charged with assault and fined in court. 
At the VFL Tribunal, Stevens was suspended for 10 league games, on three charges. He received four weeks for "kneeing" Melbourne player Col Deane, two for conducting himself in "an unseemly manner" (an objectionable gesture) and four for elbowing and attempting to strike Melbourne's George Cassidy. 
Stevens made just five appearances in the 1930 VFL season. On his first game back from suspension, at Corio Oval in round 10, the umpire reported him for attempting to elbow Geelong player Jack Plunkett. Although cleared of the charge at the tribunal, he received a four-week ban for his actions after he had been approached by the umpire, when he threw the ball away. 
In 1931 he played 11 games and was a member of a Footscray team that missed out on the finals only on percentage. 
He featured in the opening eight rounds of the 1932 season, then found himself back at the tribunal, reported for striking Melbourne's Joe Kinnear with his elbow. For this he received an eight-week suspension. His next and ultimately final appearance for Footscray came in round 18, against North Melbourne. He retired at the end of the season. 
Stevens died at the age of 54 on 7 July 1953, when he was struck by a train on the railway line at Reservoir, Melbourne. 
He had a son, Harvey, who played for Footscray and was a member of their historic 1954 premiership team. 
Two great grandsons have also played in the league, Daniel Talia for Adelaide and Michael Talia for the Western Bulldogs and Sydney Swans. 
The Adams County Courthouse is a building located in Council, Idaho which was built in 1915.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1987. 
It is a two-and-a-half-story building on a raised basement, located on a hill rising above Council's downtown, and appears monumental despite its small size. It has an L-shaped plan with the front entrance in the inside corner of the L. 
This article about a property in Idaho on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a building or structure in Idaho is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Selective breeding of the brown rat has produced the fancy rat (rats kept as pets), as well as the laboratory rat (rats used as model organisms in biological research). Both fancy rats and laboratory rats are of the domesticated subspecies Rattus norvegicus domestica. 
By the early to middle part of the 19th century, British academics believed that the brown rat was not native to Norway, hypothesizing (incorrectly) that it may have come from Ireland, Gibraltar or across the English Channel with William the Conqueror. As early as 1850, however, a new hypothesis of the rat's origins was beginning to develop. The British novelist Charles Dickens acknowledged this in his weekly journal, All the Year Round, writing: 
It is frequently called, in books and otherwise, the 'Norway rat', and it is said to have been imported into this country in a ship-load of timber from Norway. Against this hypothesis stands the fact that when the brown rat had become common in this country, it was unknown in Norway, although there was a small animal like a rat, but really a lemming, which made its home there. 
Academics began to prefer this etymology of the brown rat towards the end of the 19th century, as seen in the 1895 text Natural History by American scholar Alfred Henry Miles: 
The brown rat is the species common in England, and best known throughout the world. It is said to have travelled from Persia to England less than two hundred years ago and to have spread from thence to other countries visited by English ships. 
Though the assumptions surrounding this species' origins were not yet the same as modern ones, by the 20th century, it was believed among naturalists that the brown rat did not originate in Norway, rather the species came from central Asia and (likely) China. 
The brown rat is nocturnal and is a good swimmer, both on the surface and underwater, and has been observed climbing slim round metal poles several feet in order to reach garden bird feeders. Brown rats dig well, and often excavate extensive burrow systems. A 2007 study found brown rats to possess metacognition, a mental ability previously only found in humans and some primates, but further analysis suggested they may have been following simple operant conditioning principles. 
Rats may also emit short, high frequency, ultrasonic, socially induced vocalization during rough and tumble play, before receiving morphine, or mating, and when tickled. The vocalization, described as a distinct "chirping", has been likened to laughter, and is interpreted as an expectation of something rewarding. Like most rat vocalizations, the chirping is too high in pitch for humans to hear without special equipment. Bat detectors are often used by pet owners for this purpose. 
In research studies, the chirping is associated with positive emotional feelings, and social bonding occurs with the tickler, resulting in the rats becoming conditioned to seek the tickling. However, as the rats age, the tendency to chirp appears to decline. 
In addition, they commonly squeak along a range of tones from high, abrupt pain squeaks to soft, persistent 'singing' sounds during confrontations. 
The brown rat is a true omnivore and will consume almost anything, but cereals form a substantial part of its diet. Martin Schein, founder of the Animal Behavior Society in 1964, studied the diet of brown rats and came to the conclusion that the most-liked foods of brown rats include scrambled eggs, macaroni and cheese, raw carrots, and cooked corn kernels. According to Schein, the least-liked foods were raw beets, peaches, and raw celery. 
Foraging behavior is often population-specific, and varies by environment and food source. Brown rats living near a hatchery in West Virginia catch fingerling fish.  Some colonies along the banks of the Po River in Italy will dive for mollusks, a practice demonstrating social learning among members of this species. Rats on the island of Norderoog in the North Sea stalk and kill sparrows and ducks. 
When lactating, female rats display a 24-hour rhythm of maternal behavior, and will usually spend more time attending to smaller litters than large ones. 
Brown rats live in large, hierarchical groups, either in burrows or subsurface places, such as sewers and cellars. When food is in short supply, the rats lower in social order are the first to die. If a large fraction of a rat population is exterminated, the remaining rats will increase their reproductive rate, and quickly restore the old population level. 
Females are capable of becoming pregnant immediately after giving birth, and can nurse one litter while pregnant with another. Females are able to produce and raise two healthy litters of normal size and weight without significantly changing their own food intake. However, when food is restricted, females can extend pregnancy by over two weeks, and give birth to litters of normal number and weight. 
Males can ejaculate multiple times in a row, and this increases the likelihood of pregnancy as well as decreases the number of stillborns. Multiple ejaculation also means that males can mate with multiple females, and they exhibit more ejaculatory series when there are several oestrous females present. Males also copulate at shorter intervals than females. In group mating, females often switch partners. 
Dominant males have higher mating success and also provide females with more ejaculate, and females are more likely to use the sperm of dominant males for fertilization. 
In mating, female rats show a clear mating preference for unknown males versus males that they have already mated with (also known as the Coolidge effect), and will often resume copulatory behavior when introduced to a novel sexual partner. 
Females also prefer to mate with males who have not experienced social stress during adolescence, and can determine which males were stressed even without any observed difference in sexual performance of males experiencing stress during adolescence and not. 
Rats are known to burrow extensively, both in the wild and in captivity, if given access to a suitable substrate. Rats generally begin a new burrow adjacent to an object or structure, as this provides a sturdy "roof" for the section of the burrow nearest to the ground's surface. Burrows usually develop to eventually include multiple levels of tunnels, as well as a secondary entrance. Older male rats will generally not burrow, while young males and females will burrow vigorously. 
Burrows provide rats with shelter and food storage, as well as safe, thermo-regulated nest sites. Rats use their burrows to escape from perceived threats in the surrounding environment; for example, rats will retreat to their burrows following a sudden, loud noise or while fleeing an intruder. Burrowing can therefore be described as a "pre-encounter defensive behavior", as opposed to a "post-encounter defensive behavior", such as flight, freezing, or avoidance of a threatening stimulus. 
Possibly originating from the plains of northern China and Mongolia, the brown rat spread to other parts of the world sometime in the Middle Ages. The question of when brown rats became commensal with humans remains unsettled, but as a species, they have spread and established themselves along routes of human migration and now live almost everywhere humans are. 
As it spread from Asia, the brown rat generally displaced the black rat in areas where humans lived. In addition to being larger and more aggressive, the change from wooden structures and thatched roofs to bricked and tiled buildings favored the burrowing brown rats over the arboreal black rats. In addition, brown rats eat a wider variety of foods, and are more resistant to weather extremes. 
 In the absence of humans, brown rats prefer damp environments, such as river banks. However, the great majority are now linked to man-made environments, such as sewage systems. 
In the United Kingdom, some figures show that the rat population has been rising, with estimations that 81 million rats reside in the U.K.[citation needed] Those figures would mean that there are 1.3 rats per person in the country. High rat populations in the U.K. are often attributed to the mild climate, which allow them higher survival rates during the winter. With the increase in global temperature and glacier retreat, it is estimated that brown rat populations will see an increase. 
In tropical and desert regions, brown rat occurrence tends to be limited to human-modified habitats. Contiguous rat-free areas in the world include the continent of Antarctica, the Arctic, some isolated islands, the Canadian province of Alberta, and certain conservation areas in New Zealand. Most of Australia apart from the eastern and south-eastern coastal areas does not have reports of substantial rat occurrences. 
Many parts of the world have been populated by rats secondarily, where rats are now important invasive species that compete with and threaten local faunas. For instance, Norway rats reached North America between 1750 and 1775 and even in the early 20th century, from 1925 to 1927, 50% of ships entering the port of New York were rat infested. The following sections provide some examples, including attempts of rat control. 
Hawadax Island (formerly known as Rat Island) in Alaska was infested with brown rats following a Japanese shipwreck in 1780. They had a devastating effect on the native bird life. An eradication program was started in 2007 and the island was declared rat-free in June 2009. 
Alberta is the largest rat-free populated area in the world. Rat invasions of Alberta were stopped and rats were eliminated by very aggressive government rat control measures, starting during the 1950s. 
Similar to other rodents, brown rats may carry a number of pathogens, which can result in disease, including Weil's disease, rat bite fever, cryptosporidiosis, viral hemorrhagic fever, Q fever and hantavirus pulmonary syndrome. In the United Kingdom, brown rats are an important reservoir for Coxiella burnetii, the bacterium that causes Q fever, with seroprevalence for the bacteria found to be as high as 53% in some wild populations. 
This species can also serve as a reservoir for Toxoplasma gondii, the parasite that causes toxoplasmosis, though the disease usually spreads from rats to humans when domestic cats feed on infected brown rats. The parasite has a long history with the brown rat, and there are indications that the parasite has evolved to alter an infected rat's perception to cat predation, making it more susceptible to predation and increasing the likelihood of transmission. 
Surveys and specimens of brown rat populations throughout the world have shown this species is often associated with outbreaks of trichinosis, but the extent to which the brown rat is responsible in transmitting Trichinella larvae to humans and other synanthropic animals is at least somewhat debatable. Trichinella pseudospiralis, a parasite previously not considered to be a potential pathogen in humans or domestic animals, has been found to be pathogenic in humans and carried by brown rats. 
They can also be responsible in transmitting Angiostrongylus larvae to humans by eating raw or undercooked snails, slugs, mollusks, crustaceans, water and/or vegetables contaminated with them. 
Selective breeding of albino brown rats rescued from being killed in a now-outlawed sport called rat baiting has produced the albino laboratory rat. Like mice, these rats are frequently subjects of medical, psychological and other biological experiments, and constitute an important model organism. This is because they grow quickly to sexual maturity and are easy to keep and to breed in captivity. When modern biologists refer to "rats", they almost always mean Rattus norvegicus. 
The brown rat is kept as a pet in many parts of the world. Australia, the United Kingdom, and the United States are just a few of the countries that have formed fancy rat associations similar in nature to the American Kennel Club, establishing standards, orchestrating events, and promoting responsible pet ownership. 
The many different types of domesticated brown rats include variations in coat patterns, as well as the style of the coat, such as Hairless or Rex, and more recently developed variations in body size and structure, including dwarf and tailless fancy rats. 
A working rat is a rat trained for specific tasks as a working animal. In many cases, working rats are domesticated brown rats. However, other species, notably the Gambian pouched rat, have been trained to assist humans. 
Facilities include a library, computer labs for various purposes, separate CAM and CAD labs program guided machine operations and sports complex. 
Morgan Sanders (1934 - April 27, 2021), also known as Martha Sanders, was an American painter, photographer, poet, and author of the children's book Alexander and the Magic Mouse. 
Throughout her adult life, Sanders wrote poetry, which eventually "approached the Wordsworthian ideal of natural and yet heightened language." In 1975, one of her poems was included in an anthology of works by contemporary female poets. Sanders published a collection of her poems and a selection of her drawings in Looking for Lola: Poems & Drawings by Morgan Sanders, which was released in 2018. 
The Mechanicsville Historic District encompasses a cluster of residential properties that are all that remain of one of the early industrial areas of Grafton, Vermont.  Located a short way east of Grafton Village on Vermont Route 121, it includes ten well-preserved 19th-century properties, some located on properties where early mills once stood.  The district was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 2010. 
4.5 point player is a disability sport classification for wheelchair basketball.  Players in this class tend to have normal trunk movement, few problems with side to side movements, and ability to reach to the side of their chair.  Players generally have a below knee amputation, or some other partial single leg dysfunction.  This classification is for players with minimal levels of disability.  In some places, there is a class beyond this called 5 point player for players with no disabilities. 
The class includes people with amputations.  Amputees are put into this class depending on the length of their stumps and if they play using prosthetic legs. Classification into this classes has four phases.  They are a medical assessment, observation during training, observation during competition and assessment.  Observation during training may include a game of one on one.  Once put into this class, it is very difficult to be classified out of it. 
4.5 point players have the least amount of physical disability of all players on the court.  Players in this class can move easily and forcefully in all directions.  They have the ability to move while shooting and passing.  They can grasp the ball above their head with one or both arms.  They can quickly bring their wheelchair to a stop without tipping over. 
4 point players and 4.5 point players receive less playing time than 1 point players because of their higher point value. 
A number of disability groups are eligible to compete in this class, including people with amputations and with spinal cord injuries. 
Lower limb amputations effect a person's energy cost for being mobile.  To keep their oxygen consumption rate similar to people without lower limb amputations, they need to walk slower. People in this class use around 41% more oxygen to walk or run the same distance as some one without a lower limb amputation. 
ISOD classified A4 tend to be classified a 4 point players or 4.5 point players.  The cut off point between the two classes is generally based on the location of the amputations.  People with amputations longer than 2/3rds the length of their thigh are generally 4.5 point players.  Those with shorter amputations are 4 point players. A4 basketball players use around 7% more oxygen to walk or run the same distance as some one without a lower limb amputation. 
At the IWBF 1998 World Congress, two proposals were made.  One was to allow everyone to use strapping.  Another was to specifically ban strapping by 4.5 point players.  The practice of strapping had begun by lower point players earlier in the sports history to give them better trunk control.  Eventually, it was taken up by higher point players and included leg strapping. 
The classification was created by the International Paralympic Committee  and has roots in a 2003 attempt to address "the overall objective to support and co-ordinate the ongoing development of accurate, reliable, consistent and credible sport focused classification systems and their implementation." 
In Australia, wheelchair basketball players and other disability athletes are generally classified after they have been assessed based on medical, visual or cognitive testing, after a demonstration of their ability to play their sport, and the classifiers watching the player during competitive play. 
Australians Brad Ness, Troy Sachs and Justin Eveson are 4.5 point players. Amber Merritt is 4.5 point player for Australia's women's national team. Joey Johnson, Patrick Anderson and David Eng are a 4.5 point players for the Canadian men's national team. 
He wrote his reminiscences, under the title of My Life, in 1890. The largest public collection of Cooper paintings is owned by Canterbury City Council and housed at the Beaney House of Art & Knowledge in Canterbury. Examples are also held by the Tate Gallery, London, and the Victoria and Albert Museum, London, and other public collections, mainly in Britain. 
Pomelovka is located 11 km southwest of Kichmengsky Gorodok (the district's administrative centre) by road. Navolok is the nearest rural locality. 
This Kichmengsko-Gorodetsky District location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a Finnish sportsperson is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to table tennis is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bharatkund railway station is one of the railway station in the Ayodhya district of Indian state of Uttar Pradesh. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of Uttar Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In a 13-season career, Miller was a .245 hitter (695-for-2836) with five home runs and 231 RBIs in 927 games played, including 229 runs, 97 doubles, 33 triples, and 40 stolen bases. In eight postseason games, he went 3-for-22 for a .136 average. 
As a catcher, he collected 3870 outs with 1053 assists and committed 135 errors in 5058 chances for a .973 fielding percentage. 
His best season was 1920, when he posted a career-high .289 average and led National League catchers with .986 fielding percentage. 
Miller was also a participant in a historical play in the fifth inning of Game 5 of the 1920 World Series. He was tagged by Cleveland Indians second baseman Bill Wambsganss for the third out in the only unassisted triple play in World Series history. 
After his playing career ended, Miller managed the Atlanta Crackers in 1923 and was a coach for the Dodgers and Boston Red Sox. 
Miller died in Brooklyn at the age of 72, when he fell from a hospital window after cataract surgery. 
Bill Wambsganss (top left, in white) tags out Miller to complete an unassisted triple play in Game 5 of the 1920 World Series 
The Bogdanoff twins descend from a noble Muslim Tatar family dating back to the beginning of the 17th century, originally from Penza, which one of its mirzas converted to Orthodox Christianity, and was rewarded with a title of prince with the decree of Tsar Fedor III. However, they did not succeed in exercising this right, and the title of "Prince Bogdanoff" was quickly lost by the end of the 19th century. 
The twins spoke German, also learning French, Russian and English through contact, they would later say, with housekeepers and workers. Their grandmother spoke multiple languages. 
The brothers began careers in television, hosting several popular programs on science and science fiction. The first of these, Temps X (Time X), ran from 1979 to 1989. 
In 2002, the Bogdanovs launched a new weekly TV show Rayons X (X Rays) on French public channel France 2. In August 2004, they presented a 90-minute special cosmology program. 
Grichka Bogdanoff received a Ph.D. from the University of Burgundy (Dijon) in 1999. In 2002, Igor Bogdanoff received a Ph.D. in theoretical physics from the University of Burgundy. Both brothers received the lowest passing grade of "honorable". 
In October 2002, the Bogdanovs released an email containing apparently supportive statements by Laurent Freidel, then a visiting professor at the Perimeter Institute. Soon after, Freidel denied writing any such remarks, telling the press that he had forwarded a message containing that text to a friend. 
The online discussion was quickly followed by media attention. The Register reported on the dispute on November 1, 2002, and stories in The Chronicle of Higher Education, Nature, The New York Times, and other publications appeared soon after. These news stories included commentary by physicists. 
 I had given a favorable opinion for Grichka's defense, based on a rapid and indulgent reading of the thesis text. Alas, I was completely mistaken. The scientific language was just an appearance behind which hid incompetence and ignorance of even basic physics.
In May 2001, the journal Classical and Quantum Gravity (CQG) reviewed an article authored by Igor and Grichka Bogdanov, titled "Topological theory of the initial singularity of spacetime". One of the referees' reports stated that the article was "Sound, original, and of interest. With revisions I expect the paper to be suitable for publication." The paper was accepted by the journal seven months later. 
However, after the publication of the article and the publicity surrounding the controversy, mathematician Greg Kuperberg posted to Usenet a statement written by the journal's senior publisher, Andrew Wray, and its co-editor, Hermann Nicolai. The statement read, in part, 
Not all review evaluations were positive. Eli Hawkins, acting as a referee on behalf of the Journal of Physics A, suggested rejecting one of the Bogdanovs' papers: "It is difficult to describe what is wrong in Section 4, since almost nothing is right. [...] It would take up too much space to enumerate all the mistakes: indeed it is difficult to say where one error ends and the next begins. In conclusion, I would not recommend that this paper be published in this, or any, journal." 
In December 2004, the Bogdanovs sued Ciel et Espace for defamation over the publication of a critical article entitled "The Mystification of the Bogdanovs". In September 2006, the case was dismissed after the Bogdanovs missed court deadlines; they were ordered to pay 2500 euros to the magazine's publisher to cover its legal costs. There was never a substantive ruling on whether or not the Bogdanovs had been defamed. 
The Bogdanoff brothers have published a number of works in science fiction, philosophy and popular science. Since 1991, they sign their books as Bogdanov, preferring  "v" to "ff". 
The coordination of the international Movement rests with the General Assembly, as part of the General Council members, representatives of the regional councils, delegates from local groups, and the General Council, composed of members elected by the Assembly General. 
A French actor named Bernard (Jean-Louis Trintignant) comes across a beautiful young woman (Ewa Aulin) bending over the corpse of a murdered nightclub owner in London. He believes her that she is innocent of the crime, and runs off with her to protect her from a group of criminal types who are stalking her. 
Col cuore in gola was adapted from the paperback novel Il sepolcro di carta (1955) by Sergio Donati. Brass noted he was not very fond of the novel, and his producers wanted Jean-Louis Trintignant as the lead. On meeting Trintignant, he told him a different story than that of the novel, which led him to accept the role. Brass then sent over the actual script, stating that he had changed his mind. The film's working title at this point was Enigma. 
The film was shown in the United States in Portland, Oregon on 7 September 1969. The film was released in the United States as I Am What I Am on the Cult Epics label. 
Richmond North Centre is a provincial electoral district for the Legislative Assembly of British Columbia, Canada that was created in the 2015 redistribution from parts of Richmond Centre and Richmond East. It was first contested in the 2017 election. 
Student Vote Canada is a non-partisan program in Canada that holds mock elections in elementary and high schools alongside general elections (with the same candidates and same electoral system).  
This article about a location in British Columbia, Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Panama graduated from the University of California, Los Angeles. He was the sports editor of the campus newspaper, the Daily Bruin. 
Panama began his career in journalism at the International News Service. He subsequently worked in public relations for Harry Brand at 20th Century Fox. He represented celebrities like Faye Dunaway, Elvis Priestley, Henry Fonda, and Elizabeth Taylor. He was a publicist for The Simpsons and M*A*S*H. 
Panama died on May 13, 2018 at the Motion Picture & Television Country House and Hospital in Woodland Hills, Los Angeles. He was 93. 
Softvol is an Advanced Linux Sound Architecture (ALSA) plugin that adds a software based volume control to the ALSA audio mixer (alsamixer).  This is helpful when a sound card does not have a hardware volume control.  The softvol plugin is built into ALSA and does not require a separate installation. 
Another use case of the softvol is when a hardware volume control is unable to amplify the sound beyond certain threshold and thus renders an audio file too quiet. In this case software amplifiers can be created in order to boost the volume level at the price of sacrificing some quality. 
Many modern software pieces that are able to play audio files have their own, ALSA(or any other sound system)-independent softvol controls. 
Caupolicana elegans is a species of bee in the family Colletidae. It is found in Mexico and the United States (Arizona). 
Born in Denton, Norfolk, Prichard was the son of A. G. Prichard, a minister and politician.  Norman grew up in London, and was educated at the Henry Thornton School in Clapham, then at King's College, London.  He found work with the Inland Revenue, and became a supporter of the Labour Party.  He also qualified as a barrister, and was accepted at Lincoln's Inn in 1924. 
In 1965, London's local government was restructured.  Prichard won a seat on the new Greater London Council, and he also became the first chair of the London Boroughs Association.  He left the council in 1967, but was re-elected to it in 1970, representing Wandsworth.  In his last years, he advocated for free public transport. 
Lyndon Wallace James (born 27 December 1998) is an English cricketer. He made his first-class debut for Nottinghamshire in the 2018 County Championship on 10 September 2018. He made his List A debut on 1 May 2019, for Nottinghamshire in the 2019 Royal London One-Day Cup. He made his Twenty20 debut on 13 June 2021, for Nottinghamshire in the 2021 T20 Blast. 
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jeff Hubbard is the 2012 IBA World Tour bodyboarder champion from Kauai, Hawaii.  His brother David also won a bodyboarding world title: the 2009 IBA Drop Knee World Tour. Jeff won his first IBA World Title in 2006 and the second in 2009 and third in 2012. 
His style is characterized by aerial tricks, and recognized by constantly pushing the boundaries of the sport. His split leg invert and looped 360 airs are a kind of trademark, and he is also regarded as one of the few bodyboarders to ever land an aerial 720. He is a five-time winner of the IBA Pipeline Pro bodyboarding contest in 2002, 2006, 2011, 2012 and 2017. 
Jeff Now  owns his own bodyboard brand with his brother dave called Hubboards. www.hubboards.com  Jeff also has his own swim fins called Air Hubb swim fins. 
Three-time IBA World Champion (2006, 2009, 2012) Four-time IBA Pipeline Champion (2003, 2007,2011,2012) Eleven-time United States National Title Holder (8 professional and 3 amateur) Sintra Portugal Pro Champion 2009 Peruvian Inka Challenge Champion 2009 Canary Islands El Fronton Wild Wild Wave Champion 2010 Mexico Zigatela Pro Champion 2011, 2012/td> Encanto Pro Champion 2012 Port Macquarie festival of Bodyboarding Champion 2012 
Hubbard won the "El Fronton - The Wild Wild Wave Invitational 2010" and the "IBA Pipeline Pro 2011" reaching his third Pipe Title. With the last two high scoring waves (9.75 and 9.5 out of 10) in the last 5 minutes of the final, he dramatically jumped to the top spot after being fourth (and last) for most of the heat. 
A Ludi Magister was a teacher at a Roman school, Roman Ludus. Magistri were often Greek or other educated slaves. The Ludi Magister was the teacher of the first stage of Roman education, the equivalent of an elementary school teacher. A Ludi Magister would have a class of around 30 students. Students would go to a Ludi magister at multiple ages and leave at the age of 11. Classes would be held in a room rented by the ludi magister or outside. 
The subjects taught by a Ludi Magister were mainly reading and writing accompanied by a small knowledge of arithmetic and numbers. Teachers were allowed to employ corporal punishments if students were late or were disobedient and could be whipped. 
The second stage of Roman education was study under a grammaticus, and the third and final stage, only undertaken by young men from wealthy backgrounds, was instruction from a rhetor (the rhetor was almost always Greek and taught the art of public speaking). The ancient Romans did not have universities but they did have extra schooling taken by only the wealthiest families. 
This band marks the first solo outing of Ashcroft without the drummer of The Verve, Peter Salisbury, who played on his first three solo albums and tours. 
Since 1997, Ashcroft has had a string of 5 consecutive albums reach the top 3 of the UK album charts.  The Verve's Forth reached #1 in 2008, joining 1997's Urban Hymns (which also reached #1).  Ashcroft's three solo albums - 2000's Alone With Everybody (#1), 2002's Human Conditions (#3), and 2006's Keys to the World (#2) - all peaked in the top 3 of the UK album charts. 
The album "United Nations of Sound" debuted at #20 in the UK chart before falling to #59 the following week. 
After two months of silence, on 15 October Ashcroft releases through his website a second fanclub-only track, "Here We Go Again". On the same day the song "Are You Ready?" was released as a single also in the United States as a digital download. The radio edit of "Are You Ready?" is available for free on the US version of Richard's website. 
The album United Nations of Sound was released in the United States on 22 March 2011 under the name "Richard Ashcroft" through the record company Razor & Tie and the lead single "Are You Ready?" is featured over the closing credits of the film The Adjustment Bureau, along with the new song "Future's Bright", written and performed specifically for the film's opening by Richard and ten-time Oscar-nominated composer Thomas Newman. 
Yemen competed at the 2012 Summer Olympics in London, from 27 July to 12 August 2012. This was the nation's sixth consecutive appearance at the Olympics since its reunification in 1990. 
The Yemen Olympic Committee selected a team of four athletes, three men and one woman, to compete in three sports. Among the Yemeni athletes, judoka Ali Khousrof only made his second consecutive Olympic appearance. Taekwondo jin and 2011 Pan Arab Games champion Tameem Al-Kubati was the nation's flag bearer at the opening ceremony. Yemen, however, has yet to win its first ever Olympic medal. 
These are the official results of the Women's 4x100 metres event at the 2003 IAAF World Championships in Paris, France. Their final was held on Saturday 30 August 2001 at 19:45h. 
Bulimulus alethorhytidus is a species of  tropical air-breathing land snail, a pulmonate gastropod mollusk in the subfamily Bulimulinae. 
Mark Cuban, Daymond John, Kevin O'Leary and Robert Herjavec appear as sharks in every episode this season. Barbara Corcoran appears in 11 episodes and Lori Greiner appears in 4 episodes. 
Robert Henricks (born 1943) is an American theologian, currently the Preston Kelsey Professor of Religion, Emeritus at Dartmouth College. 
Shabab Yatta is a football club based in the town of Yatta, within the Hebron Governorate in the Palestinian West Bank. The club currently compete in the West Bank Premier League, one of the top two divisions of the Palestinian Football Association which runs parallel to the Gaza Strip League. The club plays out of Dora International Stadium.[citation needed] 
Palpi minute and porrect (extending forward). Antennae with large swollen basal joint. Tibia with short spurs. Forewings with long cell, veins 9 and 11 present, with vein 5 often comes from middle of discocellulars in male, but curved, if present. Hindwings with vein 3 from before angle of cell, vein 5 from above angle, veins 6 and 7 on a long stalk and vein 8 from near end of cell. 
The Police Combat Cross is the second highest departmental award of the New York City Police Department. The Police Combat Cross is awarded to police officers who, "having received Honorable Mention awards, successfully and intelligently perform an act of extraordinary heroism while engaged in personal combat with an armed adversary under circumstances of imminent personal hazard to life". 
The Police Combat Cross was first awarded July 19, 1934, to six members of the police department for heroic service in the previous year. More than two hundred members of the New York Police Department have been awarded the Police Combat Cross. 
Linga is almost completely round, with a central peak. It lies between the mouths of Olna Firth and Gon Firth on the west coast of the Shetland Mainland. To the north is Delting on the Mainland, and the Mainland is also to the south and east. Papa Little is to the south west, and Mavis Grind to the north. 
The island is composed of gneiss and schist, with some quartzite and pelite. Its landscape is one of rough grass and heather. 
QE2  is the sixth studio album by Mike Oldfield, released in 1980 on Virgin Records. The album was named after the ocean liner Queen Elizabeth 2. 
The album contained both original Oldfield compositions as well as two cover version of pieces recorded by other bands ("Arrival" by ABBA and "Wonderful Land" by The Shadows). 
Though only reaching number twelve on the German album charts, the album became the best-selling album of 1981 in Germany. 
The longest tracks on the album are "Taurus I" and the title track, "QE2", lasting 10 minutes and 7 minutes respectively. Some years later The Shadows responded to Oldfield's cover of "Wonderful Land", by releasing a cover of Oldfield's "Moonlight Shadow". The cover songs were released as singles. 
"Molly" was made for his daughter, Molly Oldfield, who would later play keyboards on The Songs of Distant Earth and play a part in the Songs for Survival project. 
The European Adventure Tour 1981, which ran from March to August of that year, was in promotion of the album. 
On the original vinyl label of the album, the title piece, "QE2" is listed as two tracks, "QE2" by Oldfield/Hentschel and "QE2 Finale" by Oldfield, but gives their running time as a single piece. 
The album was re-released by Mercury Records on 30 July 2012. This came as part of a deal in which Oldfield's Virgin albums were transferred to the label. It was released on the same day as Platinum and a year after the last Universal reissue of Incantations. 
The first disc is the original recording remastered with bonus material, and the second disc (available in the deluxe edition) is a live concert recorded at the time of the album's original release. The concert was recorded in April 1981 in Essen during Oldfield's European Adventure Tour. 
She finished 10th at the 2001 World Championships in Edmonton, fourth at the 2005 European Indoor Athletics Championships in Madrid and 10th at the 2005 World Championships in Helsinki. 
This biographical article about a German pole vaulter is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The men's flyweight is a competition featured at the 2017 World Taekwondo Championships, and was held at the Taekwondowon in Muju County, South Korea on June 27 and June 28. Flyweights were limited to a maximum of 58 kilograms in body mass. 
The council is made up of 12 council members, who were elected by proportional representation at the municipal election held on 7 June 2009, and the honorary mayor as chairman. 
Walsdorf's mayor is Horst Well; the representative from the outlying centre of Zilsdorf is Helmut Hohn. 
The municipality's arms might in English heraldic language be described thus: Argent a bend sinister gules charged with three cinquefoils Or pierced azure, the whole between an annulet and a fleur-de-lis, both of the second. 
Worthy of note are the Walsdorfer Trockenmaar, a dried-up maar, the lava quarry in the south of Walsdorf and the volcanic crater Arensberg (also called Arnulphusberg) in the north. 
Olivier Meslay is the Hardymon Director of the Clark Art Institute. He is the fifth director of the Clark. 
From 2009 to 2016 he served as associate director of curatorial affairs, senior curator of European and American art, and The Barbara Thomas Lemmon Curator of European Art at the Dallas Museum of Art (DMA).  In 2016, he became the fifth director of the Clark Art Institute. 
Fast Friends is a novel by British author Jill Mansell, about three school friends reunited after several years apart. 
Jill Mansell first had the idea for the book after reading an article in a magazine about women who had changed their lives by becoming best-selling authors. Eventually she decided to write the kind of book "I would love to read". The end result was Fast Friends. 
A cloud base (or the base of the cloud) is the lowest altitude of the visible portion of a cloud. It is traditionally expressed either in metres or feet above mean sea level or above a planetary surface, or as the pressure level corresponding to this altitude in hectopascals (hPa, equivalent to the millibar). 
The height of the cloud base can be measured using a ceilometer. This device reflects a beam of light off the cloud base and then calculates its distance using either triangulation or travel time. 
Alternatively, the cloud base can be estimated from surface measurements of air temperature and humidity by calculating the lifted condensation level. One method for doing this, used by the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration and often named after Tom Bradbury, is as follows: 
In well-defined air masses, many (or even most) clouds may have a similar cloud base because this variable is largely controlled by the thermodynamic properties of that air mass, which are relatively homogeneous on a large spatial scale. This is not the case for the cloud tops, which can vary widely from cloud to cloud, as the depth of the cloud is determined by the strength of local convection. 
Cloud base is an important meteorological variable for aviation safety, as it determines whether pilots may use visual flight rules (VFR) or instrument flight rules for take-off and landing. 
The Turtle is the name of two supervillains appearing in comic books published by DC Comics, who were primarily enemies of the Flash. 
Two versions of the Turtle made their live action debut on The Flash, portrayed by Aaron Douglas and Vanessa Walsh. 
The second Turtle (the Turtle Man) appears in Showcase #4 and was created by Robert Kanigher and Carmine Infantino. 
The original Turtle is a 1940s villain who uses tricks of slowness in battle with the Golden Age Flash (Jay Garrick). His main weapon is slow, deliberate planning. After a few clashes with the Flash, the Turtle fades from the public scene. 
Years later, the Turtle Man carries on his legacy. After the debut of the third Flash (Wally West) in recent years, the original Turtle returns, now with the younger Turtle Man as his henchman, to take over Keystone City from underground. A final clash with Wally and his allies results in the Turtle destroying his own headquarters and apparently himself with it. 
Later, the Turtle Man reappears again, seemingly cured from his severe injuries and having developed the ability to 'steal' speed, slowing down others around him to a crawl no matter how fast they were moving. 
During the Infinite Crisis, the Turtle Man is part of the Secret Society of Super Villains led by Alexander Luthor Jr. (posing as Lex Luthor), using his speed-stealing abilities to negate the power of speedsters and thus make it harder for the heroes to track the Society. 
He experimented with this energy force for decades, discovering he could negate any form of motion, including the progression of life. Eventually he became disillusioned with human life as he knew that he would outlive everyone he loved, this led him to kill his family with his powers as he saw them as a needless distraction from his work. Eventually he began going by the name "Turtle", most likely because of the motion negating powers he now possessed. 
In the pages of Flash Forward, Jai West is a manifestation of Wally West's fear of not being able to see his family again that was born in the Dark Multiverse. He is the twin brother of Irey West and was emigrated to Earth 0 by Wally. 
In the Watchmen sequel Doomsday Clock, Doctor Manhattan's vision of a possible future says that Jai will become a superhero called the Turtle. 
The Turtle Man wears a device that enables him to project a force field which can stop bullets. His shell is also body armor which can expand to cover his head and also has some jets in it. The Turtle Man also has a ray device that he uses to make people move slower, as well as a laser gun that causes the optic nerves of a person to see everything moving faster than they are. 
Overseas Police Adviser Peter Craig interviews a Rio, Brazil diamond dealer to investigate the source of unusual stone samples that have appeared at the International Diamond Institute in London. In the course of a social engagement, Craig encounters and quarrels with Graben, a violent and corrupt engineer that he arrested while working in West Africa. Graben is accompanied by the Alcidia. 
That evening, Craig survives an assassination attempt. When the police are called, they reveal that the diamond dealer has been murdered. The police agree to question Graben, who has disappeared. The investigation leads into a nearby favela, then to a gold mine near Belo Horizonte, which is owned by Alcidia's father. Alcidia and Craig meet at the mine's Casa Grande, and discover they are attracted to one another. Alcidia instructs Craig on how best to infiltrate the mine. 
Craig wakes up to discover that de Sa has taken his evidence against Graben and is covering up the murders to draw attention away from Alcidia and Craig, but insists Craig leaves the country. Craig and Alcidia arrange to meet in London, but the novel ends on a sour note as both realise their romance will have to end before it has begun. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Pelechuco Municipality is the second municipal section of the Franz Tamayo Province in the  La Paz Department, Bolivia. IN 2001 it had apopulation of 5,115. Its seat is Pelechuco. 
The municipality is bordered to the north by the Apolo Municipality, to the east by the Apolo and Curva Municipalities, to the south by the Curva and Charazani Municipalities and to the west by Peru. 
 Pattar Kalan is a village in Jalandhar district, Punjab, India situated on kapurthla to Kartarpur road. Its pincode is 144806. 
This article related to a location in Jalandhar district, Punjab, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
American Dad!'s eighth season debuted on the Fox network on September 25, 2011, and concluded on May 13, 2012. 
On February 23, 2011, it was announced that the series had been renewed for an eighth production cycle. 
Also, the hurricane-themed crossover episode titled "Hurricane!" with The Cleveland Show and Family Guy would have aired the previous season but was postponed due to the 2011 Super Outbreak in the Southern United States. It later aired on October 2, 2011. 
Stan tries to protect his family from a hurricane that's hitting Langley Falls, but every increasingly poor decision Stan makes endangers the family more than the actual storm. 
All eighteen episodes of the eighth season was released on DVD by 20th Century Fox in Region 2 on August 5, 2013, in Region 4 on August 21, 2013, and in Region 1 on September 24, 2013. This 3-disc box set includes all 18 episodes of Season 8, along with commentaries on select episodes, deleted scenes, and "Stan's Booty Dance." 
Fudbalski klub Blue Star is a Montenegrin football club based in Masline, a suburb of Capital Podgorica. Founded in 2002, they currently compete in Montenegrin Third League. 
Since 2002, FK Blue Star is using Stadion Masline as their home ground. Stadium is a part of Military of Montenegro complex in Podgorica suburb Masline. 
Anatinomma alveolatum is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Bates in 1892. 
The Owl's Head Historic District is a residential area located on the west side of Des Moines, Iowa, United States. Among its 50 buildings is the former Iowa governor's mansion. The district has been listed on the National Register of Historic Places since 1978. 
St. Petersburg College (SPC) is a public college in Pinellas County, Florida. It is part of the Florida College System and one of the institutions in the system designated a "state college," as it offers a greater number of bachelor's degrees than traditional community colleges focused on associate degrees. It is accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools and enrolled about 29,000 students in the fall of 2018. 
The school was founded in 1927 as a private junior college, the first in Florida. It later became a public institution and grew to include campuses throughout Pinellas County. Today it has eleven campuses and centers: four in St. Petersburg, Florida and seven in Seminole, Pinellas Park, Largo, Clearwater, and Tarpon Springs. 
Both the Student Services building on the St Petersburg/Gibbs Campus and the Natural Science, Mathematics and College of Education Building on the Clearwater Campus were both recently awarded LEED Gold Certification. The two buildings mark the first LEED Gold higher education buildings in Pinellas County. 
St. Petersburg College is partnered with the Multijurisdictional Counterdrug Task Force Training (MCTFT) and the Florida Army National Guard in counter-drug efforts. In partnership with St. Petersburg College, the MCTFT provides unique, tuition-free military and counter-drug training for local, state, federal, and military criminal justice professionals as well as awareness training for community leaders. 
St. Petersburg College is also partnered with the Combating Transnational Organized Crime (CTOC) Center of Excellence (COE). The CTOC COE provides unique, tuition-free CTOC training in support of Department of Defense strategies. The CTOC COE has campuses on Camp Blanding Joint Training Center near Starke, Florida, at St. Petersburg College in St. Petersburg, Florida, and on Camp Murray near Tacoma, Washington. 
The following notable drugs are of investigational interest as potential antidepressants but are not formally under clinical development for approval at this time: 
On August 20, 2017, she announced both on her blog and YouTube channel that she married someone outside the voice acting business on August 16, 2017. 
The song was first released as a 7" single, limited to 1500 copies through Love Train on November 4, 1996. The artwork featured on the sleeve of the 7" is by Neale Smith. 
WJWZ, also known as 97.9 Jamz, is an urban contemporary formatted radio station that serves the Montgomery Metropolitan Area, broadcasting on the FM band at a frequency of 97.9 MHz and licensed to Wetumpka, Alabama. The station is locally owned and operated by Bluewater Broadcasting Company, LLC. The station's transmitter is located in Montgomery. The station's studios are located on Wall St. in Midtown Montgomery. 
Local on-air personalities include Michelle C, Doughboy, and Frank White. WJWZ also participates in Montgomery rating survey by Arbitron (Market #150) and is monitored by Mediabase.  It is the home of Tom Joyner in the mornings as of October 2013, after crosstown urban WWMG dropped him for Steve Harvey.  Joyner replaces Russ Parr after five years, whom in turn replaced Doug Banks on the station. 
Vision Communications, Ltd. received the original construction permit to build a new 3,700 watt FM station at 97.9 MHz from the Federal Communications Commission on May 28, 1996. This construction permit was transferred from Vision Communications, Ltd. to Vision Communications, Ltd. II in April 1997. The new station was assigned the call letters WICE by the FCC on July 7, 1997. 
In April 1998, control of permit holder Vision Communications, Ltd. II was transferred from Philip L. Williams to Montgomery Broadcast Properties, Ltd. On April 4, 1998, the station applied to the FCC for program test authority which was finally granted on July 24, 1998. The station's call letters were changed to the current WJWZ on April 24, 1998. The transfer to Montgomery Broadcast Properties, Ltd., was approved by the FCC on June 19, 1998. 
In August 1998, Vision Communications, Ltd. II applied to assign the permit outright to Montgomery Broadcast Properties, Ltd. The transfer was approved by the FCC on September 16, 1998 and the transaction was consummated on September 22, 1998. 
In March 2004, Montgomery Broadcast Properties Ltd. (Allan Stroh, CEO) reached an agreement to sell this station to Bluewater Broadcasting LLC.  The sale was part of a multi-company four-station deal valued at a reported $15.3 million.  The deal was approved by the FCC on April 21, 2004, and the transaction was consummated on June 21, 2004.  At the time of the sale, WJWZ was broadcasting a Hip hop format. 
WJWZ broadcasts with a 5 kW Harris transmitter into a 2-Bay Shively Labs High-Power 6810 non-directional antenna. While the station is non-directional, it must protect to the northeast per FCC rules section 73.215 (contour protection). 
Progress M-26 launched on 15 February 1995 from the Baikonur Cosmodrome in Kazakhstan. It used a Soyuz-U rocket. 
Progress M-26 docked with the aft port of the Kvant-1 module of Mir on 17 February 1995 at 18:21:34 UTC, and was undocked on 15 March 1995 at 02:26:38 UTC. 
It remained in orbit until 15 March 1995, when it was deorbited. The deorbit burn occurred at 05:28 UTC and the mission ended at 06:15 UTC. 
This article about one or more spacecraft of the Russian Federation is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Premier League introduced a cap on the number of players in a squad. From this season onwards, clubs had to declare a squad of no more than 25 players when the summer transfer window shuts, and then again at the end of the January transfer window. Players aged 21 and under could be selected without being registered in the 25. 
Also being introduced this season was the "home grown players" rule, which aims to encourage the development of young footballers at Premier League clubs. The new rule required clubs to name at least eight players in their squad of 25 players that have been registered domestically for a minimum of three seasons prior to their 21st birthday. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as has been defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players and Managers may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Nike produced a new match ball, the Nike Total 90 Tracer, which was electric blue, black and white during the autumn and spring. A high-visibility version in yellow was released for the winter. Additionally, Umbro provided officials with new kits in black, lime green, yellow, red and cyan blue for the season. Tune Ventures, parent company of Air Asia, took over as sponsor of the referee kits for the next three seasons. 
She met German historian Leopold Ranke in Paris in July 1843. They were engaged in London, and married in October 1843 at Bowness-on-Windermere, England. The couple had three sons, one of whom died in infancy, and one daughter. The son of her brother Charles, Alfred Perceval Graves, married her great-grand-niece Amelie Elisabeth Sophie von Ranke. Her husband was later ennobled and the family name became "von Ranke". 
Ranke suffered with poor health for a number of years, which resulted in her developing an interest in nursing and medical issues. She met Florence Nightingale, and became involved in programmes assisting wounded soldiers. She died in Berlin on 20 April 1871, and is buried at Friedhof II der Sophiengemeinde Berlin. 
Centerville is a city in Leon County, in the U.S. state of Texas. The population was 892 at the 2010 census. It is the county seat of Leon County. 
Centerville was so named as it is near the geographic center of Leon County. However, it is also coincidentally located nearly midway between Dallas and Houston. 
Centerville became the county seat of Leon County in 1850.  It was originally built on 200 acres donated by Robert J Townes and D.C. Carrington. 
At the 2000 census, 903 people, 388 households, and 230 families  were living in the city. The population density was 620.9 people per square mile (240.4/km2). The 464 housing units had an average density of 319.0/sq mi (123.6/km2).  The racial makeup of the city was 75.30% White, 21.82% African American, 0.33% Native American, 0.22% Asian, 1.66% from other races, and 0.66% from two or more races. Hispanics or Latinos of any race were 1.99%. 
Of the 388 households, 25.3% had children under  18 living with them, 46.4% were married couples living together, 10.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 40.5% were not families. About 38.1% of households were one person, and 22.9% were one person aged 65 or older. The average household size was 2.17, and the average family size was 2.89. 
The age distribution was 22.1% under 18, 6.3% from 18 to 24, 22.6% from 25 to 44, 25.0% from 45 to 64, and 23.9% 65 or older. The median age was 44 years. For every 100 females, there were 83.9 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 77.5 males. 
The median  income for a household was $25,677 and for a family was  was $35,278. Males had a median income of $38,125 versus $19,167 for females. The per capita income for the city was $15,469. About 14.9% of families and 19.1% of the population were below the poverty line, including 19.7% of those under age 18 and 20.9% of those age 65 or over. 
Foreign advisor and naturalized Chinese citizen Israel Epstein was editor-in-chief of China Today from 1948, and later returned to China at the request of Soong Ching-ling. The magazine was renamed China Today in 1990. China Today is usually published the first week of the month. The editors usually showcase what they characterize as the growing modernization and development which has happened in China since 1949. 
The novelist, playwright and translator Gao Xingjian, who received the Nobel Prize in Literature in 2001, worked in the magazine as the chief of its French edition from 1975 to 1977. The actor, translator and politician Ying Ruocheng briefly worked for the English edition of the magazine in the 1960s. He went on to serve as China's vice minister of culture in the 1980s and played a supporting role in the 1987 Oscar-winning film The Last Emperor. 
This article relating to a magazine connected with culture is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See tips for writing articles about magazines. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
The book puts forward a large number of interface design suggestions, from fairly trivial ones to radical ones. The overriding theme is that current computer interfaces are often poor and set up users to fail, as a result of poor planning (or lack of planning) by programmers and a lack of understanding of how people actually use software. 
Raskin often refers to the computer he designed, the Canon Cat, as an example of a system that implemented the various measures he advocates; the Canon Cat is often considered the first information appliance. Many of the ideas presented in  the Canon Cat and The Humane Interface were later adopted by Raskin in his Archy project, and later by his son Aza. 
Raskin includes a chapter demonstrating four models of quantifying the efficiency of a software interface: the GOMS keystroke model, Raskin's own efficiency measure, Fitts' law and Hick's law. All are intended to minimize the amount of time required for the user to perform any specific task. 
Habituation is an important concept driving Raskin's guidelines, intended to free the user's mind from attention to low-level interaction details. A modeless interface, monotony of design and elimination of blocking warnings are all intended to favor habit-forming reactions to interface handling. 
Raskin also advocates a document-centered approach to computer interfaces that entails several radical changes to the current nature of operating systems and software: 
Raskin further asserts that interface design should be subject to regulation, analogous to building codes. This could be done by establishing legal safeguards to protect consumers from harm; and establishing professional guidelines and standards to evaluate good practice and interface quality. 
This article about a Member of the European Parliament for the Czech Republic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article on a Roman Catholic cathedral in France is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Storo is a neighborhood in the boroughs of Sagene and Nordre Aker in Oslo, Norway. It is located east of Nydalen, south-west of Grefsen and north of Sandaker. In addition to block housing, it hosts the Storo Storsenter shopping center. There are also many car dealerships in the area. The Ring 3 trunk road runs through Storo, and the area is served by Storo station on the Oslo T-bane and Oslo Tramway. 
The farm was divided into two parts around 1550 AD: Storo ("Store O") and Lillo ("Lille O" - lille means 'little'). 
Catskin is an English fairy tale collected by Joseph Jacobs, in More English Fairy Tales. Marian Roalfe Cox, in her pioneering study of Cinderella, identified as one of the basic types, the Unnatural Father, contrasting with Cinderella itself and Cap O' Rushes. 
There once was a lord who had many fine estates and who wished to leave them to a son. When a daughter is born to him instead, he is very unhappy and will not even look at her. 
When she is fifteen, her father is willing to marry her off to the first man who offers.  When she hates the first man who offers, she goes to a hen-wife, who advises her to demand a coat of silver cloth before the wedding.  When her father and suitor provide that, the hen-wife advises a coat of beaten gold, and then a coat made from feathers of all the birds, and then a little coat of catskin. 
The daughter puts on the Catskin coat and runs away, disguising herself as a peasant girl.  She finds a place as a scullion at a castle and works in the kitchens. 
When a ball is held at the castle, the daughter, called "Catskin" by the others in the kitchen, asks to be allowed to attend.  The cook is amused at her request and throws a basin of water in her face, but Catskin bathes and dresses herself in the coat of silver cloth, and goes to the ball.  The young lord falls in love with her, but when he asks where she came from, she only replies from the Sign of the Basin of Water. 
The young lord holds another ball, in hopes she will attend.  The cook breaks a ladle across Catskin's back when she says she would like to go, but Catskin goes in her coat of beaten gold, and when the lord again asks where she is from, Catskin replies that she came from the Sign of the Broken Ladle. 
The young lord holds a third ball.  The cook breaks a skimmer across Catskin's back when she asks permission to attend, but Catskin goes in her coat of feathers, and says she came from the Sign of the Broken Skimmer.  The young lord follows her, and sees her change into her catskin coat. 
The young lord goes to his mother and announces that he will marry Catskin.  His mother is opposed, and the young lord, so distraught, takes ill. His mother then agrees to the marriage.  When Catskin appears before her in the coat of gold, the mother says she is glad her daughter-in-law is so beautiful. 
Soon, Catskin gives birth to a son.  One day, a beggar woman appears with her child, and Catskin sends her son to give them money.  The cook says that beggars' brats will get along, and Catskin goes to her husband and begs him to discover what happened to her parents. 
Her husband finds her father, who never had another child and lost his wife, and asks him whether he had a daughter.  Catskin's father tells the lord that he had a daughter, and says that he would give all that he owns to see her again.  Catskin's husband takes her father to see his daughter and then brings him to stay with them at the castle. 
In some versions of the tale, Catskin asks to simply see the ball or serve the food, and not actually attend it. 
This is an unusual form of 510B, in which normally the threatened marriage is to the father as in Donkeyskin or Allerleirauh. The oldest documented version is in a Swedish MS c. 1600, Roalfe Cox no 98.  
Tattercoats is a similar variant, in which a grandfather neglects his granddaughter because her mother died in childbirth. 
Patrick Kennedy collected an Irish variant titled The Princess in the Cat-Skins and cited it as a variant of German tale Allerleirauh and Italian The She-Bear. 
A literary treatment of the tale exists in The True Annals of Fairy-Land in The Reign of King Cole, titled The Princess in Disguise, where the princess is also called Cat-skin. 
SN 2003H was a supernova that appeared halfway between the colliding NGC 2207 and IC 2163 galaxies. It was discovered on January 8, 2003, by the Lick Observatory and Tenagra Supernova Searches (LOTOSS). 
"No Worries" is a song by English production trio Disciples and French house music producer and disc jockey (DJ) David Guetta. The song was released as a digital download on 15 April 2016. The song has peaked at number 90 on the Australian Singles Chart. The song was written by David Guetta, Nathan Duvall, Gavin Koolman, Luke McDermott, Curtis Richardson, Daniel Amell, Frederic Riesterer, and Ralph Wegner, while vocals are by Curtis Richa. 
The GWA Mazda Tennis Classic was a men's tennis tournament played in Brisbane, Australia from 1983 to 1985.  The event was part of the Grand Prix tennis circuit and was held on indoor carpet courts. 
Several Christian churches have existed at the site over the centuries. Since the 16th century, the site of the tomb has been occupied by the al-Uzair Mosque. The adjacent Roman Catholic Church of Saint Lazarus, built between 1952 and 1955 under the auspices of the Franciscan Order, stands upon the site of several much older ones. In 1965, a Greek Orthodox church was built just west of the tomb. 
The Lazarium consisted of the church (to the east of the site), the tomb of Lazarus (to the west), and an open space between the two which probably served as an atrium. The church was in the form of a three-aisle basilica. The apse, in a solid rectangular block shape, was at the east end. A sacristy on each side opened into the aisles. 
After the fall of Jerusalem in 1187, the nuns of the convent went into exile. The new west church was most likely destroyed at this time, with only the tomb and barrel vaulting surviving. The 6th century church and tower were also heavily damaged at this time but remained standing. The village seems to have been abandoned thereafter, though a visitor in 1347 mentioned Greek monks attending the tomb chapel. 
The entrance to the tomb today is via a flight of uneven rock-cut steps from the street. As it was described in 1896, there were twenty-four steps from the then-modern street level, leading to a square chamber serving as a place of prayer, from which more steps led to a lower chamber believed to be the tomb of Lazarus. The same description applies today. 
Three steps connect the antechamber with the inner burial chamber (which measures a little more than two square metres in size). It contains three funerary niches (arcosolia), now mostly hidden by the Crusader masonry. One tradition places the tomb of Lazarus to the right of the entrance, which was formerly closed by a horizontal stone. Tradition also says that Jesus was standing in this antechamber when he called Lazarus from the grave. 
By 1384, a simple mosque had been built on the site of the existing structures. In the 16th century, the Ottomans built the larger al-Uzair Mosque to serve the town's (now Muslim) inhabitants and named it in honor of the town's patron saint, Lazarus of Bethany. The construction utilized the surviving barrel vaulting of the former west church. Its courtyard is in the Byzantine church atrium. 
In 1965, a modern Greek Orthodox church was built just west of the Tomb.  Its construction incorporates the north wall of the former medieval Benedictine chapel. Nearby the church are ruins that belong to the Orthodox Patriarchate and are traditionally identified either as the House of Simon the Leper or Lazarus. 
German submarine U-241 was a Type VIIC U-boat of Nazi Germany's Kriegsmarine during World War II. Four days into her first patrol, she shot down an attacking flying boat but was sunk with all hands the next day. 
An order was placed for U-241 on 10 April 1941 and construction began on 4 September 1942 at Germaniawerft, Kiel, as yard number 675. She was launched the following year on 25 June 1943 and commissioned under the command of Oberleutnant zur See Arno Werr a month later on 24 July. 
U-241 began training with the 5th U-boat Flotilla on 24 July 1943, the day that the U-boat was commissioned . U-241 remained with the 5th U-boat Flotilla until 31 March 1944, when her training was complete. 
U-241 began the first and only patrol of her career on 1 April 1944. She was assigned as a front (operational) boat to the 3rd U-boat Flotilla and left her original home port of Kiel on 23 April of that year. She arrived in Kristiansand in occupied Norway the next day, on 24 April. On 30 April, U-241 left Kristiansand for her new home port of Bergen, which she arrived at on 4 May 1944. On 13 May, U-241 left Norway for the North Sea. 
Although U-241 defended herself on that occasion, she was attacked with depth charges by another Catalina, this time from 210 Squadron, the following day. This resulted in the sinking of the submarine with the loss of all 51 crew members. 
According to a book Steuermann durch Krieg und Frieden ('Helmsman through War and Peace') by Hans Schmid, the author and two other men survived the sinking, were rescued and taken prisoner. All sources for 'uboat.net' state that there were no survivors. 
This biographical article relating to alpine skiing in Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Maria Psoinos holds a PhD and an MPhil in Social Psychology from Cambridge University, UK, and a BSc in Psychology from Aristotle University of Thessaloniki, Greece. 
  This is a list of international prime ministerial trips made by Jacinda Ardern, the 40th Prime Minister of New Zealand. As of November 2021[update], Jacinda Ardern has made seventeen international trips to nineteen sovereign countries, two associated states and one dependent territory of New Zealand, since her premiership began on 26 October 2017. 
The Fourth Federal Electoral District of Coahuila (IV Distrito Electoral Federal de Coahuila) is one of the 300 Electoral Districts. Mexico is divided for elections to the federal Chamber of Deputies and one of seven such districts in Coahuila. 
It elects one deputy to the lower house of Congress for each three-year legislative period using the first past the post system. 
The district's head town (cabecera distrital), where results from individual polling stations are gathered together and collated, is the city of Saltillo. 
"Goodnight Goodnight" is a song by American pop rock band Maroon 5 from their second studio album It Won't Be Soon Before Long (2007). The song was written by frontman Adam Levine and produced by the band with Mike Elizondo and Mark "Spike" Stent. It is the fifth and final single from the album and it received some airplay in Brazil and reached the top spot on the Hong Kong singles chart before its official release. 
It has been released as a promo CD single and as a digital download in the United Kingdom. The intro guitar for the song bears a resemblance to intro for 3 Doors Down's "Kryptonite" (2000). 
A remix version of this song by Deerhoof, was included on Call and Response: The Remix Album (2008). 
The song was scheduled to be the fourth single from the album, as the video had already been shot. The label however, decided to re-record the song "If I Never See Your Face Again", with additional vocals by Rihanna. 
The song was released in Brazil on November 2008 and in the United Kingdom, as a digital download, with a specially designed Maroon 5 wall clock with every pre-order. 
The music video is directed by Marc Webb and premiered on Yahoo! Music on August 21, 2008. Candace Bailey stars in the video along with Adam Levine. It was filmed in January 2008, at Santa Monica, California. In Brazil, the video premiered on October 18, on Top TVZ as the Bonus Track and received regular play. The video was made available to download digitally via iTunes. 
The video was represented in split screen and the storyline is based on a "before and after" story, which leads Levine and Bailey to a beautiful love story. 
The video begins where Levine walks into a store and sees Bailey at work. The pair meet for the first time, taking an interest in each other and Levine and Bailey then leave the shop together. The next scene shows Levine and Bailey beginning to date as they talk in his car one night. After which, the pair are shown lying in bed, sharing an intimate moment. Intercut with the scenes are Levine and the Maroon 5 band mates performing the song in various locations. 
A remorseful Levine is shown reminiscing over the moments that happened when he and Bailey were together. The next scenes show Levine running around the beach with his pet dog and thinking things over, as one of his band mates Jesse Carmichael who surf along the waves. The last scenes show Bailey in the workplace when she sees Levine standing outside and she smiles. Levine then goes into the store to talk to her and the pair reconcile as the song fades out. 
Maroon 5 performed "Goodnight Goodnight", at the 2008 The CW Upfront event in Lincoln Center, New York City on May 13, 2008. 
As a promotion, the song appeared on the network's fall 2008 advertisement. The band also performed "Goodnight Goodnight" in the television series CSI: NY, where they guest starred in the fifth season episode "Page Turner". 
Unless noted otherwise, all words listed here are assumed to be pluralized by adding -s or -es. References in the "Sources" column relate to the headword in column one; variant spellings are then separately referenced. The sources given are selective, and the absence of a reference to a particular dictionary does not necessarily mean that the word does not appear in that dictionary. 
In American and Canadian English, there are currently 4,422 words with Q and no U including the following words in the table below. 
In many word games, notably in Scrabble, a player must build a word using a certain set of letters.  If a player is obliged to use a q but does not have a u, it may be possible to play words from this list. Not all words in this list are acceptable in Scrabble tournament games. Scrabble tournaments around the world use their own sets of words from selected dictionaries that may not contain all the words listed here. 
Qi is the most commonly played word in Scrabble tournaments, and was added to the official North American word list in 2006. 
Other words listed in this article, such as suq, umiaq or qiviut, are also acceptable, but since these contain a u, they are less likely to be useful in the situation described. 
The 1961 census recorded Para Khurd as comprising 5 hamlets, with a total population of 790 people (402 male and 388 female), in 185 households and 166 physical houses. The area of the village was given as 697 acres. 
The 1981 census recorded Para Khurd as having a population of 1,138 people, in 231 households, and having an area of 289.35 hectares. 
Although accidental fire were regular occurrences, some blazes were so devastating that they were afterwards identified as "great;" and these larger fires were more specifically identified by reference to the Japanese era name in which the blaze occurred; as in what came to be known as "the Great Hoei Fire"  of 1708. 
Maracle's artwork has been included in numerous group exhibitions since the mid/late 1970s, including the group exhibition "Oh So Iroquois", curated by Ryan Rice for The Ottawa Art Gallery. 
The park also contains playgrounds, a mini-zoo and cafes, all containing relics of the Soviet era. On special occasions actors stage re-enactments of various Soviet-sponsored festivals. 
According to The Economist, "As countries grapple with their unsavoury pasts and consider the rightful place of their controversial monuments, the park offers an alternative model to museums or destruction." 
The tiger shrike or thick-billed shrike (Lanius tigrinus) is a small passerine bird which belongs to the genus Lanius in the shrike family, Laniidae. It is found in wooded habitats across eastern Asia. It is a shy, often solitary bird which is less conspicuous than most other shrikes. Like other shrikes it is predatory, feeding on small animals. Its nest is built in a tree and three to six eggs are laid. 
It derives its name from the tiger-like pattern of its upperparts which are reddish-brown with dark bars. Adult males have white underparts and a grey head with a black mask. Females and young birds are duller and browner and young birds lack the grey and black on the head. 
Its song is a musical warbling. It has a variety of harsh calls including a loud, repeated territorial call, a chattering alarm call and a softer trilling call. It often calls from within cover but territorial males call from a prominent perch. 
Vagrant birds have occurred in Hong Kong and the Philippines. In Australia, a dead bird which may have arrived on a ship was once found near Fremantle and a bird was seen on Christmas Island in April 2008. 
It has a wide distribution and a fairly large population and is not considered threatened with BirdLife International classing it as least concern. However it has declined recently in Japan and Russia. In Japan, it is now uncommon and local but was formerly common and occurred in the suburbs of Tokyo. 
It feeds mainly on insects, particularly grasshoppers, crickets, beetles, bugs, butterflies and moths. It also takes other arthropods and small birds and lizards. It typically hunts from a perch at the forest edge, perching less conspicuously than many other shrikes. It also forages among branches and leaves to find prey. 
The breeding season lasts from May to July. Pairs form during northward migration or soon after arrival on the breeding grounds and are monogamous. Courting males perch by the female, bowing the body up and down and moving the head from side to side while uttering a soft subsong, a more subdued version of the normal song. They also perform a fast display-flight while calling. 
 Ermington, an electoral district of the Legislative Assembly in the Australian state of New South Wales was created in 1991 and abolished in 1999. 
The women's' teams classification diving event at the 2019 Summer Universiade was contested between 2 and 8 July 2019 at the Mostra d'Oltremare in Naples, Italy. 
Joining Fulham from Ashfield in 1910, he spent 16 years at the club, making a total of 355 league appearances, scoring 35 goals. A utility forward, he played in four different attacking positions for the "Cottagers". For almost the entirety of his time at Craven Cottage, the club were in the Second Division and led by Phil Kelso. Andy Ducat was in charge from 1924 to 1926. 
Torrance worked as a ships' boilermaker in Scotland during the First World War. He later worked for a telephone company and died of cancer in July 1949. 
On July 18, 2008, Niyi Osundare paid tribute to Besong with a speech given during the 2008 EduArt Awards for Cameroonian Literature in English. 
In 1992, shortly after his play Beasts of No Nation was staged, Besong was kidnapped and tortured by state security agents who took him to an unknown location from where he was later released when news of his kidnapping became public. In 1992 he won the Association of Nigerian Authors' Prize for Requiem for the Last Kaiser. Besong later obtained a PhD in Literary Studies from Calabar (Nigeria). 
Xinjiang People's Broadcasting Station (XJBS) consists of radio broadcasting to the Xinjiang province area. It is operated by the Xinjiang Networking Transmission Limited in Mandarin, Uyghur, Kazakh, Kyrgyz and Mongolian languages. 
This article related to radio stations in the People's Republic of China is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David Stewart Rathie (born 29 May 1951) is a former Australian sportsperson who represented the Wallabies in rugby union and played first-class cricket with both Queensland in the Sheffield Shield and Canterbury in the Shell Trophy. 
An articled clerk by profession, Rathie moved to Sydney to work but was also capped three times for the New South Wales Waratahs in 1978. 
Radio A is a Bosnian local commercial radio station, broadcasting from Banja Luka, Bosnia and Herzegovina. 
This radio station broadcasts a variety of programs such as music, talk show and local news. The owner of the radio station is ATV. 
Alternativna TV bought Radio Igokea, which was owned by Gorica Dodik, the daughter of Milorad Dodik, and the Igokea Basketball Club. This radio, which was previously renamed "Agape", will operate as "A radio" in the future. 
Evans was born on June 29, 1866, in Ottawa, Illinois. His siblings included Lynden Evans. He graduated from the United States Military Academy in 1887 and was commissioned into the 22nd Infantry Regiment. 
After Evans's promotion to the rank of brigadier general on August 5, 1917, he became the commander of 152nd Infantry Brigade, 76th Division at Fort Devens. He traveled to France due to World War I and commanded 156th Infantry Brigade, 78th Division. In October he was assigned to command 55th Infantry Brigade, 28th Division. Evans reverted to his permanent rank of colonel on November 27, 1918, and he retired from the army in 1924. Congress restored his brigadier general rank in June 1930. 
Evans died at Walter Reed Army Medical Center on May 1, 1953. He is buried at Arlington National Cemetery. 
In 1893, Evans married Winona Anderson, who died in 1925. In 1927 he married Sarah Page. With his second wife, Evans was the father of a daughter, Eleanor. 
The Verhoeff algorithm is a checksum formula for error detection developed by the Dutch mathematician Jacobus Verhoeff and was first published in 1969.  It was the first decimal check digit algorithm which detects all single-digit errors, and all transposition errors involving two adjacent digits, which was at the time thought impossible with such a code. 
The phonetic errors in particular showed linguistic effects, because in Dutch, numbers are typically read in pairs; and also while 50 sounds similar to 15 in Dutch, 80 doesn't sound like 18. 
Taking six-digit numbers as an example, Verhoeff reported the following classification of the errors:. 
This is more properly considered a family of algorithms, as there are other permutations possible, and discussed in Verhoeff's treatment. He notes that this particular permutation, 
The strengths of the algorithm are that it detects all transliteration and transposition errors, and additionally most twin, twin jump, jump transposition and phonetic errors. 
The main weakness of the Verhoeff algorithm is its complexity. The calculations required cannot easily be expressed as a formula. Lookup tables are required for easy calculation. A similar code is the Damm algorithm, which has similar qualities. 
The Verhoeff algorithm can be implemented using three tables: a multiplication table d, an inverse table inv, and a permutation table p. 
The inverse table inv represents the multiplicative inverse of a digit, that is, the value that satisfies d(j, inv(j)) = 0. 
This article related to the moth subfamily Teleiodini is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Diane Archie, formerly Diane Thom, is a Canadian politician in the Northwest Territories. She is a member of the Legislative Assembly of the Northwest Territories and the current Deputy Premier of the Northwest Territories.  
Archie was first elected in the 2019 election. She represents the electoral district of Inuvik Boot Lake, and she was elected to territorial cabinet by her member colleagues on October 24, 2019. She was appointed Deputy Premier, as well as Minister of Health and Social Services, Minister Responsible for the Status of Women, and Minister Responsible for People with Disabilities. 
This article about a Northwest Territories politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It can be either a feminine or a masculine name. It is a variation of many other types of spellings of the name Lyndsay, including the more well-known spelling Lindsay, as well as "Lindsey", "Linsey", "Lynsey", "Lyndsy", "Lyndsey", "Lynzee", and "Linzi". 
The old Roman name for the city of Lincoln was Lindum Colonia, a name which harked back to the older Celtic name of "Lindon" which meant "the pool". Thus the etymology of the name is inextricably linked with the city of Lincoln in the UK. It is widely thought to originate from a twelfth-century family name in Lincolnshire, England, most notably Sir Walter de Lindeseya, a Norman knight who accompanied King David I upon his return to Scotland in 1124. 
The replacement of the "i" by a "y" is a matter of spelling preference, since in English both create the same pronunciation of the name. This may be chosen for either the aesthetic appeal of the overall word shape the usage of the "y" creates, or be connected with its increasing use as feminine name. 
The name is popular in Scotland, and has grown in popularity in the second half of the twentieth century.  
Alternatively, the spelling "Lyndsay" may be indicative of the Scottish popularisation of the name. In Scots English, for example, the old English word "Winden" (to twist") is thought to have evolved into the Scots English word "Wynd", meaning a "very narrow street". 
Further Scottish connections for this particular spelling come from fifteenth-century Scottish Renaissance poet Sir David Lyndsay, and the Scottish surname "Lynd", which can also be traced to the 15th century in Ayrshire. 
Until the mid twentieth century it was more popular as a name for a boy, and since the second half of the twentieth century has become much more popular as a name for a girl. The recent popularity of the name, and the relative reduction in its usage since the 1980s, might be linked to the popularity of the 1970s television series The Bionic Woman which starred the actress Lindsay Wagner. 
Kapri Lashaw Bibbs Jr. (born January 10, 1993) is a former American football running back. He played college football at Colorado State, and was signed by the Denver Broncos as an undrafted free agent in 2014. He has also played for the San Francisco 49ers, Washington Redskins, and Green Bay Packers. 
Bibbs attended Snow College in 2011 and Front Range Community College in 2012. Before the 2013 season, he transferred to Colorado State. In his only season with the school, he rushed for a school record 1,741 yards and joined Barry Sanders and Montee Ball as the only players in NCAA history to rush for 30 touchdowns in a season. His 2013 season garnered him among the leaders in various rushing categories in the Mountain West Conference. 
Bibbs was not selected in the 2014 NFL Draft, but was signed by the Denver Broncos as a free agent. He was signed to the team's practice squad for the 2014 season. He was released in November and tried out with the Arizona Cardinals, but he was ultimately re-signed to the Broncos' practice squad. 
Bibbs was once again placed on the practice squad by the Broncos prior to the 2015 season. He was promoted to the active roster in October following an injury to Juwan Thompson. He was active for the game against the Cleveland Browns, but did not receive any carries. The day after the game, he was once again released; however, he was re-signed to the practice squad two days later. 
On November 6, 2016, on Sunday Night Football, Bibbs made a 69-yard catch and ran for his first career touchdown against their AFC West rival Oakland Raiders. He suffered a high ankle sprain in Week 13 and was placed on injured reserve on December 5, 2016. Overall, he finished the 2016 season with 129 rushing yards to go along with two receptions for 75 yards and a touchdown. 
On April 29, 2017, the Broncos traded Bibbs and a 2017 fifth round draft pick to the San Francisco 49ers for a fourth round draft pick in 2018. He was waived on September 1, 2017. 
On November 24, 2017, Bibbs was signed to the Washington Redskins' practice squad. He was promoted on the active roster on December 12, 2017. In his first game as a Redskin, he caught a screen pass from Kirk Cousins then scrambled for a 36-yard touchdown against the Arizona Cardinals. He finished the 2017 season with 79 rushing yards to go along with 14 receptions for 128 yards and a receiving touchdown. 
On September 1, 2018, Bibbs was waived for final roster cuts before the start of the regular season, but signed to the team's practice squad the following day. He was promoted to the active roster on September 22, 2018. In Week 5, against the New Orleans Saints, he scored his first rushing touchdown as a Redskin. He was waived on December 15, 2018. 
On December 17, 2018, Bibbs was claimed off waivers by the Green Bay Packers following a knee injury suffered by Aaron Jones. He played in two games with the Packers to end the season. He finished the 2018 season with career totals of 103 rushing yards, three rushing touchdowns, 16 receptions, 115 receiving yards, and one receiving touchdown. 
On June 14, 2019, Bibbs was released by the Packers. He was suspended one week by the NFL on November 8, 2019. He was reinstated from suspension on November 12. 
Simrithi Haresh Bathija (born 9 April 1999) is an Indian model and beauty pageant titleholder. As Glamanand Miss India International 2019, she represented India at the 59th edition of the Miss International pageant in Tokyo, Japan. 
Simrithi was born on 9 April 1999 in a Sindhi family and was educated at Sacred Heart School in Thane, Maharashtra. She has a graduation degree in mass media from the Jai Hind College, Mumbai. She is a national level fencing athlete and has played roll ball in state level. She is also a trained dancer, and has worked as a radio jockey for 4 years. 
Evan Brown (born September 16, 1996) is an American football guard and center for the Detroit Lions of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football at Southern Methodist University. 
Brown signed with the New York Giants as an undrafted free agent in 2018. He made the Giants final roster, but was inactive for every game his rookie season. 
On August 31, 2019, Brown was waived by the Giants and was signed to the practice squad the next day. He was promoted to the active roster on November 9, 2019, but was waived two days later, before being re-signed to the practice squad. 
On December 4, 2019, Brown was signed by the Miami Dolphins off the Giants practice squad. He was released on March 18, 2020. 
On March 26, 2020, Brown was signed by the Cleveland Browns. He played in a total of five games with 17 special teams snaps played. Brown was waived on November 5, 2020. He was re-signed to the Browns' practice squad on November 7, 2020, and subsequently released once more on November 10, 2020. 
On December 4, 2020, Brown was signed to the Detroit Lions' practice squad. He was elevated to the active roster on December 25 and January 2, 2021, for the team's weeks 16 and 17 games against the Tampa Bay Buccaneers and Minnesota Vikings, and reverted to the practice squad after each game. He signed a reserve/future contract on January 5, 2021. 
This biographical article relating to an American football offensive lineman born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Both species in this genus are found in Southeast Asia, with D. philippina being found in the Philippines and D. rubescens being found in mainland Southeast Asia and Indonesia. 
On its website, the association details its different activities: the publication of studies, of a best-practice tool kit, acting as media watchdog, teaching and awareness-raising journalism schools, participating in conferences... The AJL engages and challenges the media when it feels that the LGBT people are misrepresented. In 2014, it questioned TV5 Monde about the terms it chose to present a debate on its Facebook. 
Sometimes, the way we do our work and our values are discriminatory because of our reflexes, our habits, our hurtful humour, and our discriminatory treatment of information. This is not a text that coerces but one that raises awareness.
Gays are hypersexualized characters on this show and it is precisely one of the cornerstone of homophobic jokes.
McNarney went to Europe as Deputy Supreme Allied Commander in the Mediterranean Theater and commanding general of the United States Army Forces, Mediterranean Theater, in October 1944. He was promoted to full general in March 1945 and in September became acting supreme allied commander of the Mediterranean Theater. 
McNarney was complicit in the repatriation of men of Soviet origin who had fought alongside the forces of the Western Allies in Italy against the Nazis to the Soviet Union to face Stalinist oppression, as part of Operation Keelhaul. 
However, McNarney rarely displayed interest in his job; instead delegating most of his responsibility to his deputy governor, Lucius D. Clay. On June 15, 1946, Clay, frustrated with the difficulty of the job given his position, wrote to Secretary of State James Byrnes requesting his retirement. Secretary Byrnes pleaded for Clay to stay on, and Clay agreed. Shortly thereafter, McNarney was posted to a position in Washington, and Clay replaced McNarney as governor. 
While serving as the military governor of the American zone from 1945 to 1947, McNarney refused to use any African-American service members as part of his staff and said that it would take 100 years before "the Negro will develop to the point where he will be on a parity with white Americans."  
This is a list of episodes for Season 5 of Late Night with Conan O'Brien, which aired from September 9, 1997, to August 28, 1998. 
This biographical article about a person related to Bangladeshi cricket born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bury Me Behind the Baseboard (Russian: Pokhoronite menya za plintusom) is a 2009 Russian drama film directed by Sergey Snezhkin. 
Trenton is a town in Edgefield County, South Carolina, United States. The population was 196 at the 2010 census, down from 226 in 2000. 
Bettis Academy and Junior College and Marshfield, a historic plantation house with outbuilding and cemetery, are listed on the National Register of Historic Places. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 226 people, 103 households, and 67 families residing in the town. The population density was 173.9 people per square mile (67.1/km2). There were 115 housing units at an average density of 88.5 per square mile (34.2/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 69.47% White and 30.53% African American. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 3.10% of the population. 
There were 103 households, out of which 19.4% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 42.7% were married couples living together, 19.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 34.0% were non-families. 32.0% of all households were made up of individuals, and 15.5% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.19 and the average family size was 2.69. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 18.6% under the age of 18, 7.1% from 18 to 24, 23.5% from 25 to 44, 31.4% from 45 to 64, and 19.5% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 45 years. For every 100 females, there were 93.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 93.7 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $26,250, and the median income for a family was $41,667. Males had a median income of $31,875 versus $29,583 for females. The per capita income for the town was $17,352. About 30.8% of families and 27.1% of the population were below the poverty line, including 41.7% of those under the age of eighteen and 20.0% of those 65 or over. 
According to the 2010 census, Trenton has a population of 196.  Of the population, 129 (65.8%) were White, 62 (31.6%) were Black or African American, 0 (0%) were American Indian or Alaska Native, 0 (0%) were Asian, 0 (0%) were Pacific Islanders, 5 (2.6%),some other race, 0 (0%) Two or more races.  8 (4.1%) were Hispanic or Latino (of any race)  
"Lazy Sunday" is a song by the English band Small Faces, which reached number two on the UK Singles Chart in 1968. It was written by the Small Faces songwriting duo Steve Marriott and Ronnie Lane, and appeared on the band's 1968 concept album Ogdens' Nut Gone Flake. Against the band's wishes, it preceded the album as a single release. 
According to Small Faces keyboardist Ian McLagan, Lane's "rooty dooty di" vocal lines were in imitation of a member of the Who's road crew; the two bands had recently toured Australia together. 
The vocal backing quotes "Colonel Bogey March" by F. J. Ricketts at 51 seconds[citation needed] and "(I Can't Get No) Satisfaction" by the Rolling Stones at 1 minute 45 seconds.[citation needed] At the end of the song the tune dissolves into birdsong and church bells. 
"Lazy Sunday" appears as track six on the album Ogdens' Nut Gone Flake, and is the last track on Side A of the vinyl release. 
The low-budget promotional video for "Lazy Sunday" was filmed at Kenney Jones's parents' home on Havering Street in Stepney, east London. 
Marionia levis is a species of dendronotid nudibranch. It is a marine gastropod mollusc in the family Tritoniidae and is found in shallow water in the Red Sea and Indian Ocean. 
Marionia levis is a long, slender nudibranch. It has about nine pairs of gills, the odd-numbered pairs standing out horizontally from the sides of the body and the even-numbered pairs standing vertically. The body colour is some shade of green or brown, with darker brown transverse lines, and sometimes white lines or spots. The stalks of the rhinophores and of the gills bear dark brown spots. The edge of the mantle is rimmed with a low ridge, and this is usually white. 
Marionia levis is found in shallow water in the Indian Ocean, its range extending from Tanzania, Kenya and the Red Sea to the Comoro Islands. 
The C510 is one of the mobile phones in Sony Ericsson's Cyber-shot series. Released on 7 January 2009, it was a successor to the K510i model. It is widely characterised as one of Sony Ericsson best non-smartphone devices released to the market. 
 The C510 is one of the first mobile phones to come integrated with Smile Shutter technology. Along with face detection this feature automatically takes a photo when a person smiles. This feature was later added to the C905 model. The phone can also play YouTube videos, upload pictures to the blogging site Blogger and comes with Facebook integrated. 
The phone also has a protector for the camera, scratch-resistant display and buttons with blue illumination while in shooting mode for features such as flash. The phone also offers a large selection of settings for exposure and a built in photo editor. 
The C510 has Sony Ericsson Java Platform 8 profile and so allows Flash Lite to run as a front-end to Java ME. 
Carceller Coll inherited two companies from his father, Demetrio Carceller Segura, the petrol station chain Disa Corp, and the Spanish brewery Damm. He is a part owner in the Spanish food company Ebro Foods and the property company Sacyr. 
Carceller Coll is married, with four children, and lives in London and Portugal. His businesses are now run by his son, Demetrio Carceller Arce. 
This Portuguese business-related biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bawbeese was a Potawatamie village in 1830 located in what is today Hillsdale County, Michigan, United States.  It was located on Baw Beese Lake 
This article relating to the history of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Authorized by the Ministry of the Interior, the CZ.NIC association coordinates the national security team CSIRT.CZ that has been participating in resolving incidents related to cyber security in networks operated in the Czech Republic since 2011. 
The association operates a specialized learning center called CZ.NIC Academy and founded its own research organization CZ.NIC Laboratories, the purpose of which is, among others, to solve problems related to Internet security and the development of original tools for the development of the Internet infrastructure. 
CZ.NIC is a member of EURid, the organization administering the European .eu domain as well as of other international companies with similar specialization (CENTR, ccNSO, etc.). 
Turris Omnia is a powerful and extensible open-source router. It features an open Linux based operating system with automatic updates and extra security measures. Besides being a router, Turris Omnia is powerful enough to serve as small home server. Turris Omnia was crowdfunded through a campaign on Indiegogo. 
In early 2008, CZ.NIC started trial operation of the DNSSEC security technology; it was definitely launched in the .cz domain area in the fall of 2008. Czech Republic was the fifth country to introduce this security technology. At present, the Czech national domain with 35% of its domains being secured is among the gTLDs with the highest use of DNSSEC. 
MojeID is a service that allows users of the Czech Internet to use single login data (username and password) for logging into different websites and web services. It eliminates the need for repetitive registration. MojeID can be used for all services that support specifically the mojeID service or at least the OpenID technology. MojeID also allows storing the user data in one secure place while keeping it up to date. 
Within the .cz domain zone, mojeID is used by a large number of e-shops, news sites and even some municipalities that use the authentication system, for example, during quick surveys or polls among residents. 
Knot DNS is a powerful authoritative DNS server supporting all major DNS protocol functions including zone transfers, dynamic updates and DNSSEC extension. Main advantages of this open source solution are performance, scalability, speed and the ability to add or remove zones on the fly without server downtime. Knot DNS was presented to the Czech and international public in November 2011. Four months later, CZ.NIC released its first final version. 
Based on the agreement between the Czech Ministry of the Interior and CZ.NIC, from January 2011 the .cz domain administrator coordinates the national security team CSIRT.CZ. It participates in resolving incidents related to cyber security in networks operating in the Czech Republic. 
Specialized Learning Centre offers professional training in the field of Internet and web technologies. The lecturers of the CZ.NIC Academy are employees of the association, university professors and practitioners. CZ.NIC Academy operates two training centers - in Prague and Brno. 
CZ.NIC Laboratories is a development and research institute of the CZ.NIC association that is engaged in research on the Internet, Internet protocols, network operation analysis, passive and active monitoring and design of prototypes for further development within CZ.NIC. The work of CZ.NIC Laboratories is focused on the benefit of the local Internet community; however, the scope of its work is international. 
Souls at Zero is the debut studio album by American heavy metal band Souls at Zero, released on July 20, 1993 by Energy Rekords. 
Drucker is highly regarded for his musicianship and his longevity of service with the New York Philharmonic, totaling 10,200 concerts, such as expressed by Gustavo Dudamel in November 2007: 
On Thursday, June 4, 2009, Drucker was awarded a Guinness World Record for longest career as a clarinetist after his performance of Aaron Copland's Clarinet Concerto with the orchestra.  Guinness thus logged his Philharmonic career at "62 years, 7 months and 1 day as of June 4, 2009". 
John L. Henderson, Ed.D. (born 1932) is an American university administrator. He was President of Wilberforce University from 1988 to 2002, and the first black president of the Council of Independent Colleges. 
From 2007 to 2010, Dr. Henderson served as President (Interim) of Cincinnati State Technical and Community College, during which enrollment surpassed 10,000 students for the first time. 
His papers are held at the Johnnie Mae Berry Library, Cincinnati State Technical and Community College. 
This biography of an American academic administrator is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Leela Corman is an American cartoonist and illustrator. Corman created the 2012 graphic novel Unterzakhn, which follows the lives of Jewish twin sisters growing up in the tenements of New York City's Lower East Side at the turn of the last century. Unterzakhn was published by Schocken Books and nominated for the Los Angeles Times Book Award, the Eisner Award, and Le Prix Artemisia. Portions of Unterzakhn were serialized in HEEB magazine and Lilith magazine. 
Corman has had works published in the US, as well as Portugal, Spain, and France. Corman has stated that she is interested in addressing the life of women through a feminine perspective, offering representation for women and by women. She describes her creative process as going between thumb-nailing and writing and relies a lot on the experiences of her Jewish family for inspiration. 
Corman's first award was a Xerix Award in 1999 for her first graphic novel, Queen's Day.  For her 2012 graphic novel, Unterzakhn, Corman earned a Le Prix Millepages award and best Anglo-American comic at Rome Festival.  She was also nominated for an LA Times Book Award, Eisner award, and Le Prix Artemisia in France. 
The Hop-Garden by Christopher Smart was first published in Poems on Several Occasions, 1752. The poem is rooted the Virgilian georgic and Augustan literature; it is one of the first long poems published by Smart. The poem is literally about a hop garden, and, in the Virgilian tradition, attempts to instruct the audience in how to farm hops properly. 
While the poem deals with natural and scientific principles, there is a strong autobiographical tendency. While the poem marks Smart's classical and Latin influences, it also reveals Smart's close association and influence with Miltonic poetic form, especially with the reliance on Miltonic blank verse. 
The Medway river that runs through the area was of particular interest to Smart as a young boy, and it is remembered in The Hop-Garden along with mention few of Smart's other poems. The first edition of The Hop-Garden, in Poems on Several Occasions, 1752, included plates from Smart's friends Francis Hayman and Thomas Worlidge. The original edition of Poems on Several Occasions, 1752, had 751 subscribers and sold 851 of 1,000 printed copies, even though it sold for ten shillings each. 
The Hop-Garden is split into two books totaling 733 lines (429 lines and 304 lines respectively) and written in Miltonic blank verse. It may have been expected that Smart would rely on Augustan rhyming couplets for his poem, even though Pope stated that Miltonic language might be inappropriate for a pastoral theme. However, Smart does not hide this fact; instead, he emphasizes it when he says: 
With these words Smart also introduces the georgic basis of the poem and that he would "teach" how to farm hops in order to use them to flavor alcoholic drinks. However, Smart does more than "teach in verse Miltonian" as he relies on various forms and styles to "express a variety of viewpoints." 
While the poem discusses farming methods, it also expresses a "'Patriot' hostility" to Walpole and the later Carteret/Compton administration of the British Parliament. The poem, in essence, is anti-Hanoverian, although he would later change this view. 
One of such as his mention of his deceased friend, Theophilus Wheeler, who died at Christ's College, Cambridge, a year after starting. In particular, Smart was working on the poem when Theophilus died, and he dedicated a portion of the second book to his memory: 
Part of the motivation to dedicating such a large portion of the poem to a discussion about Wheeler comes from his relationship with the writing of the poem; Smart showed an early version of the first book to Wheeler in 1743 before Wheeler's death. 
Samuel Johnson, friend of Smart, joked about the poem as proof that "one could say a great deal about cabbage." However, not everyone was as playful, and one of Smart's later literary opponents, John Hill, was one of the first to review The Hop-Garden; Hill used his piece in the Monthly Review to attack the poem. It was this review, even after Smart's reply in The Hilliad, that guided the future negative reception of the poem that Chris Mounsey describes as a "litany of abuse". 
The 8th Annual MTV Millennial Awards took place on July 13, 2021 at the Quarry Studios in Mexico City. It was broadcast live by MTV Latin America. The awards celebrated the best of Latin music and the digital world of the millennial generation. The list of nominees were revealed on June 7, 2021. Leading the list of nominees was Karol G with six nominations, followed by Bad Bunny y Danna Paola with five each. 
The Alan Villiers Memorial Lecture (AVML) was established by the Society for Nautical Research, the  Naval Review, and the Britannia Naval Research Association in 2010 to honour the memory of the author, adventurer, naval officer, photographer and Master Mariner, Captain Alan Villiers. The lecture takes place at a college of the University of Oxford early in Michaelmas Term each year. 
The 2015 AVML will be given by Professor Andrew Lambert of King's College London, at Pembroke College, Oxford, on Wednesday 14 October, followed by a Trafalgar Dinner.[needs update] 
What we did as part of the war was soon forgotten by the nation in general and the war earned the title: The Forgotten War.  To those of us who went through the hail of enemy AAA fire, it was never forgotten.  Eight of us started out on this adventure; six of us came home alive after flying an average of 150 missions. 
The Panther played a prominent role in the 1954 movie Men of the Fighting Lady (also known as Panther Squadron). The F9F was featured in the flying sequences in the 1955 movie The Bridges at Toko-Ri, although in the 1953 James A. Michener novel upon which the movie was based, the main character flew an F2H Banshee. 
After failing to strengthen their cause in the free elections held in South Korea during May 1950 and the refusal of South Korea to hold new elections per North Korean demands, the communist North Korean Army assaulted the South on June 25, 1950. The conflict was then expanded by the United States and the Soviet Union's involvement as part of the larger Cold War. 
The Korean War was the first armed confrontation of the Cold War and set the standard for many later conflicts. It created the idea of a limited war, where the two superpowers would fight in another country, forcing the people in that nation to suffer the bulk of the destruction and death involved in a war between such large nations. 
5BWM, 1A2B, 1CC0, 1CXZ, 1DPF, 1FTN, 1KMQ, 1LB1, 1OW3, 1S1C, 1TX4, 1X86, 1XCG, 2RGN, 3KZ1, 3LW8, 3LWN, 3LXR, 3MSX, 3T06, 4D0N, 4XH9, 4XSG, 4XSH, 4XOI, 5A0F, 5FR2, 5FR1, 5JCP, 5C2K, 5C4M, 5HPY
The specific gene that encodes RhoA, RHOA, is located on chromosome 3 and consists of four exons, which has also been linked as a possible risk factor for atherothrombolic stroke. 
The primary protein sequences of members of the Rho family are mostly identical, with the N-terminal containing most of the protein coding for GTP binding and hydrolysis. The C-terminal of RhoA is modified via prenylation, anchoring the GTPase into membranes, which is essential for its role in cell growth and cytoskeleton organization. Key amino acids that are involved in the stabilization and regulation of GTP hydrolysis are conserved in RhoA as Gly14, Thr19, Phe30 and Gln63. 
Correct localization of the RhoA proteins is heavily dependent on the C-terminus; during prenylation, the anchoring of the prenyl group is essential for the stability, inhibition of and the synthesis of enzymes and proliferation. RhoA is sequestered by dissociation inhibitors (RhoGDIs) which remove the protein from the membrane while preventing its further interaction with other downstream effectors. 
RhoA is primarily involved in these activities: actin organization, myosin contractility, cell cycle maintenance, cellular morphological polarization, cellular development and transcriptional control. 
1cxz: CRYSTAL STRUCTURE OF HUMAN RHOA COMPLEXED WITH THE EFFECTOR DOMAIN OF THE PROTEIN KINASE PKN/PRK1 
"Things Left to Do" is the ninth episode of the sixth season of the post-apocalyptic horror television series Fear the Walking Dead, the 78th episode overall,  "Things Left to Do" was released on the streaming platform AMC+ on April 15, 2021, in the United States and aired on television on AMC three days later, on April 18, 2021. 
A stand-off occurs between Virginia (Colby Minifie), her rangers and Morgan's group. Ginny has made a lot of enemies and it's finally catching up to her. The episode marks the final appearance John Dorie (Garret Dillahunt) and Virginia portrayed by Colby Minifie, who is killed by June Dorie (Jenna Elfman). 
Morgan takes Virginia to his community and tells Alicia (Alycia Debnam-Carey), Dwight (Austin Amelio), Althea (Maggie Grace) and Charlie (Alexa Nisenson) that if Virginia dies, she would endanger the lives of Grace and Daniel and that they need to keep her safe. However, Strand, the rebel Pioneers, and Sherry's group arrive and demand justice from Morgan; Virginia accepts her fate. Morgan is about to execute Virginia in front of everyone, but can't bring himself to do it. 
The episode marks the final appearance of John Dorie (Garret Dillahunt), who was killed in the previous episode despite his death, the character's corpse and flashbacks appears in the episode. In turn, the episode marks the final appearance of Colby Minifie who portrays Virginia from the previous season in the episode "Leave What You Don't". Virginia is murdered by June Dorie (Jenna Elfman) who blamed her for the death of her husband. 
The episode was seen by 1.12 million viewers in the United States on its original air date, below the previous episodes. 
Interconnect User Part (IUP) is a national specific Signaling System 7 protocol for interconnect between public telephone networks in the United Kingdom. This protocol was formerly known as BTNUP. 
Elena Radu (born March 24, 1975) is a Romanian sprint canoer who competed in the late 1990s and early 2000s. She won a bronze medal in the K-4 500 m event at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney. 
Creator is the second album by American alternative rock band The Lemonheads.  It was issued twice, as an LP in 1988, and as a CD in 1992, which included three bonus live tracks, recorded at the radio station VPRO in The Netherlands.  It is one of only three albums to feature the full original lineup of Evan Dando, Ben Deily, and Jesse Peretz. 
The cover is a photo of Ivan Kreilkamp, a school friend of Evan and Ben.  Ivan is attributed with coming up with the band's name. 
Note: Tracks marked with a * are live bonus tracks, recorded in 1989 at VPRO in the Netherlands and issued on the 1992 CD release. 
Note: Generally, Dando and Deily would sing lead vocals on songs each wrote. In addition, Dando sings lead on two cover songs on the album: the Kiss song "Plaster Caster" and "Your Home Is Where You're Happy," originally released on the 1970 Charles Manson album Lie: The Love & Terror Cult. 
Nowadays, Tifa maintains a relatively successful solo career. He lives in his hometown of Sarajevo, but occasionally goes to Belgrade for new projects and work. 
He also appeared as a waiter in a sketch of popular Yugoslav and Bosnian TV series Top lista nadrealista (1989), and as himself twice in the popular Bosnian sitcom Lud, zbunjen, normalan (2007, 2011). 
After making one album with Divlje Jagode, he left the group in 1988 and recorded new material under Tifa & Vlado moniker with keyboards player Vlado Podany (who earlier also played in Divlje Jagode and Armija B). However, no record company showed sufficient interest in releasing the album. 
Two Running Girls is a 1959 painting by Australian artist John Brack. The painting depicts two girls, wearing dresses and with their hair tied, running from the viewer. 
The painting was first exhibited in August 1959 at the Antipodeans Exhibition at the Victorian Artists Society galleries in Melbourne. 
In May 2016, the painting sold at auction for AUD1.65 million. At a previous sale in 1991, the painting was purchased for AUD52,000. 
Also featured is a special appearance by Alice Ghostley, new interviews with crew members and series creators/producers Linda Bloodworth-Thomason and Harry Thomason; recurring cast members Hal Holbrook, Richard Gilliland, Gerald McRaney and writer/executive producer Pam Norris share their memories of the show in pre-recorded separate interviews. 
The special was taped on June 4, 2003 in front of a live audience at CBS Studio Center in Studio City, California. 
The Designing Women Reunion was the second highest-rated special in Lifetime network's 19-year history, averaging a 3.1 household rating (3.3 million viewers) during its premiere on July 28, 2003, the first being The Golden Girls: Their Greatest Moments which scored a 3.7 rating with 4.2 million viewers the previous month. 
Soon the fame reached the Russian Army Theatre. Enrolling to the service in 1951, Vladimir has not parted with the theater until his death. 
The actor has been married five times. His wives were actresses Olga Aroseva, Alina Pokrovskaya, Nonna Mordyukova, Nelly Podgornaya, Nina Olkhina. 
Vladimir Borisovich Soshalsky died on 10 October 2007. He was buried at the Troyekurovskoye Cemetery in Moscow, next to his mother (section No.3). 
This article related to a river in Mato Grosso, Brazil is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Marouane Bokri (born 28 December 1974) is a Tunisian footballer. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1996 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Tunisian football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ivan Diaconu is a ten-time national champion from Moldova who competed at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney. 
This biographical article relating to a Moldovan sport wrestler or wrestling coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Floy Joy" is a song written by Smokey Robinson and released as a single in December 1971 by popular Motown female singing group The Supremes. 
The song, built on a retro sixties vibe reminiscent of past Supremes songs, was recorded by the group's former mentor Robinson, marking his first production of a Supremes song since 1969's "The Composer". 
The song featured original Supreme Mary Wilson and early-seventies Supremes lead singer Jean Terrell on lead vocals, featuring the third lead vocals by Wilson on a Supremes hit single. 
The song peaked at number five on the Billboard Hot R&B/Hip-Hop Songs charts, number sixteen on the American pop singles chart and number nine on the UK Singles Chart. 
Softstar Shoes is an American shoe manufacturer and retailer based in Philomath, Oregon. It is known for its minimalist or barefoot-style shoes and has been recognized as an early participant in the movement to encourage minimalist footwear. 
Figure was a small bay stallion owned by Justin Morgan; he became the foundation sire of the Morgan horse breed. 
In 1792, Figure was advertised for stud before he was given as payment for a debt to Justin Morgan (1747-1798), a singing teacher and one-time Randolph, Vermont, Town Clerk. Morgan owned Figure from 1792-1795, advertising him for stud in Randolph and Lebanon, New Hampshire (1793), and Royalton, Vermont (1794), and Williston and Hinesburg, Vermont (1795). He leased Figure to Robert Evans in the fall of 1795 to clear land for a Mr. Fisk at a rate of $15.00 a year. 
Morgan later traded the horse to Samuel Allen for land in Moretown, Vermont.  Allen sold the stallion later that year to William Rice of Woodstock, Vermont. 
In 1796, Figure raced in a sweepstakes in Brookfield, Vermont, beating New York horses to win $50. That year, he was advertised at stud by Johnathan Shepard of Montpelier, who also raced him in several match races in which he did well. Figure became known as the "Justin Morgan horse." 
Figure was traded again in 1797, along with a blacksmith shop, to James Hawkins. In 1801 he was recorded as owned by Robert Evans of Randolph. Evans owned the horse until 1804, using the stallion for logging, racing, and breeding, until he fell into debt to Colonel John Goss. Goss collected the horse as part of the debt, and used him to review troops.  He entered the horse in a pulling bee, which the little horse won. In 1805, Goss traded Figure for a mare owned by his brother David. 
David Goss owned Figure from 1805-1811, where he worked on the farm for 10 months, and was used for breeding for two months each year. He was sold in 1811 to Philip Goss for the breeding season. Philip Goss sold Figure to Jacob Sanderson, who sold him to Jacob Langmeade. Langmeade used the horse to haul freight, and is thought to have abused the aging stallion. 
Langmeade sold Figure to Joel Goss and Joseph Rogers at the end of 1811. Figure stood at stud for several years, before he was sold to Samuel Stone in 1817. Stone exhibited the stallion in the Randolph fair. Figure was used as a parade mount by President James Monroe later that year. 
In 1819, Figure was sold to his final owner, Levi Bean of Chelsea, Vermont. Toward the end of his life, Figure was put out to pasture. He died in 1821 from an injury to the flank, caused by a kick, at the age of 32. Figure is now buried in Chelsea, Vermont. 
Many myths developed surrounding Figure and Justin Morgan.  The popular children's book, Justin Morgan Had a Horse by Marguerite Henry, is a fictionalized account of Figure (called "Little Bub" in the book) and his early life.  Walt Disney Studios adapted the book into a film in 1972. 
Born in Racconigi into a wealthy family of Jacobin ideas, Castelli studied law at the University of Turin, graduating in July 1835. In October of the same year he was elected, just 27 years old, Mayor of Racconigi, a position he held until 1837. From 1847 collaborated with the Turin-based newspaper Il Risorgimento, working in the political section alongside Camillo Benso, Count of Cavour, the director of the newspaper. 
Friend and confidant of Cavour, Castelli was elected for the first time Member of Parliament of the Kingdom of Sardinia in its first legislature, in 1848. Deputy for five legislatures (1849-1859) in 1852 he was appointed Secretary of the Ministry of Interior, a position he held until March 1854.  In July 1854, he was appointed General Director of the General Archives of Turin. On 29 June 1860, he was appointed Senator of the Kingdom of Sardinia. 
This biographical article about an Italian writer or poet is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Stephen William Warriner (born 18 December 1958) is an English former professional footballer. An attacking midfielder, Warriner joined Newport County in 1978 from Liverpool. Between 1978 and 1981 Warriner made 36 appearances for Newport, scoring 2 goals during the most successful period in the club's long history. Warriner was part of the team that won promotion and the Welsh Cup and in the subsequent season reached the quarter-final of the 1981 European Cup Winners Cup. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a midfielder born in the 1950s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Clara Littledale attended Smith College in Northampton, Massachusetts, where her interest in journalism continued. While a Smith student, she was a member of the college's Press Board, and wrote articles for major newspapers, including the New York Times, before graduating in 1913. Shortly after graduating, Clara tried her hand at a career in teaching, but was encouraged by a school principal who insisted that she wanted to be a writer and facilitated her career change. 
She was shortly hired by the New York Evening Post as their first ever woman reporter, and worked to report on suffrage conventions and parades. Not long after being hired, she was promoted to the position of editor of the woman's page. She stayed at the New York Evening Post for only one year. 
In 1914, Littledale accepted the position of press chairman for the National American Woman Suffrage Association (NAWSA). While in that position, Littledale frequently attended and observed suffrage meetings and marched in parades; later in life she would express regret for carrying a banner that read: "If Idiots and Morons Can Vote, Why Can't I?" 
During World War II, Littledale raised funds for refugee children from Europe, and held memberships in the Child Study Association of America, the American Association for Adult Education, the National Commission for Mental Hygiene and the National Council of Parent Education. 
The territories of Gaza and the West Bank are separated from each other by Israeli territory. Both fell under the jurisdiction of the Palestinian Authority, but the Strip has, since the Battle of Gaza in June 2007, been governed by Hamas, a militant, Palestinian, fundamentalist Islamic organization, which came to power in the last-held elections in 2006. It has been placed under an Israeli and US-led international economic and political boycott from that time onwards. 
Israel captured the Gaza Strip from Egypt in the Six-Day War in 1967. Pursuant to the Oslo Accords signed in 1993, the Palestinian Authority became the administrative body that governed Palestinian population centers while Israel maintained control of the airspace, territorial waters and border crossings with the exception of the land border with Egypt which is controlled by Egypt. In 2005, Israel withdrew from the Gaza Strip under their unilateral disengagement plan. 
In July 2007, after winning the 2006 Palestinian legislative election, Hamas became the elected government. In 2007, Hamas expelled the rival party Fatah from Gaza. This broke the Unity Government between Gaza Strip and the West Bank, creating two separate governments for the Occupied Palestinian Territories. 
In September 1992, Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhak Rabin told a delegation from the Washington Institute for Near East Policy "I would like Gaza to sink into the sea, but that won't happen, and a solution must be found." 
Between 1994 and 1996, Israel built the Israeli Gaza Strip barrier to improve security in Israel. The barrier was largely torn down by Palestinians at the beginning of the Al-Aqsa Intifada in September 2000. 
The Second Intifada broke out in September 2000 with waves of protest, civil unrest and bombings against Israeli military and civilians, many of them perpetrated by suicide bombers. The Second Intifada also marked the beginning of rocket attacks and bombings of Israeli border localities by Palestinian guerrillas from the Gaza Strip, especially by the Hamas and Palestinian Islamic Jihad movements. 
 In February 2005, the Knesset approved a unilateral disengagement plan and began removing Israeli settlers from the Gaza Strip in 2005. All Israeli settlements in the Gaza Strip and the joint Israeli-Palestinian Erez Industrial Zone were dismantled, and 9,000 Israelis, most living in Gush Katif, were forcibly evicted.
On 12 September 2005, the Israeli cabinet formally declared an end to Israeli military occupation of the Gaza Strip. 
After the Israeli withdrawal in 2005 the Oslo Accords give the Palestinian Authority administrative authority in the Gaza Strip. The Rafah Border Crossing has been supervised by EU Border Assistance Mission Rafah under an agreement finalized in November 2005. The Oslo Accord permits Israel to control the airspace and sea space. 
In January 2007, fighting erupted between Hamas and Fatah. The deadliest clashes occurred in the northern Gaza Strip, where General Muhammed Gharib, a senior commander of the Fatah-dominated Preventive Security Force, died when a rocket hit his home. 
In May 2007, new fighting broke out between the factions. Interior Minister Hani Qawasmi, who had been considered a moderate civil servant acceptable to both factions, resigned due to what he termed harmful behavior by both sides. 
Fighting spread in the Gaza Strip, with both factions attacking vehicles and facilities of the other side. Following a breakdown in an Egyptian-brokered truce, Israel launched an air strike which destroyed a building used by Hamas. Ongoing violence prompted fear that it could bring the end of the Fatah-Hamas coalition government, and possibly the end of the Palestinian authority. 
In late June 2008, Egypt, Saudi Arabia and Jordan declared the West Bank-based cabinet formed by Abbas as "the sole legitimate Palestinian government". Egypt moved its embassy from Gaza to the West Bank. 
Saudi Arabia and Egypt supported reconciliation and a new unity government and pressed Abbas to start talks with Hamas. Abbas had always conditioned this on Hamas returning control of the Gaza Strip to the Palestinian Authority. Hamas visited a number of countries, including Russia, and the EU member states. Opposition parties and politicians called for a dialogue with Hamas as well as an end to the economic sanctions. 
Meanwhile, Israeli and Egyptian security reports said that Hamas continued smuggling in large quantities of explosives and arms from Egypt through tunnels. Egyptian security forces uncovered 60 tunnels in 2007. 
The EU Border Monitors initially monitored the border because Hamas guaranteed their safety, but they later fled. The Palestinian Authority demanded that Egypt deal only with the Authority in negotiations relating to borders. Israel eased restrictions on the delivery of goods and medical supplies but curtailed electricity by 5% in one of its ten lines. The Rafah crossing remained closed into mid-February. 
In February 2008, 2008 Israel-Gaza conflict intensified, with rockets launched at Israeli cities. Aggression by Hamas led to Israeli military action on 1 March 2008, resulting in over 110 Palestinians being killed according to BBC News, as well as 2 Israeli soldiers. Israeli human rights group B'Tselem estimated that 45 of those killed were not involved in hostilities, and 15 were minors. 
On 25 November 2008, Israel closed its cargo crossing with Gaza after Qassam rockets were fired into its territory. On 28 November, after a 24-hour period of quiet, the IDF facilitated the transfer of over thirty truckloads of food, basic supplies and medicine into Gaza and transferred fuel to the area's main power plant. 
On 27 December 2008, Israeli F-16 fighters launched a series of air strikes against targets in Gaza following the breakdown of a temporary truce between Israel and Hamas. Israeli defense sources said that Defense Minister Ehud Barak instructed the IDF to prepare for the operation six months before it began, using long-term planning and intelligence-gathering. 
By February 2009, food availability returned to pre-war levels but a shortage of fresh produce was forecast due to damage sustained by the agricultural sector. 
Egypt's Sinai Peninsula borders the Gaza Strip and Israel. Its vast and desolate terrain has transformed it into a hotbed of illicit and militant activity. Although most of the area's inhabitants are tribal Bedouins, there has been a recent increase in al-Qaeda inspired global jihadi militant groups operating in the region. Out of the approximately 15 main militant groups operating in the Sinai desert, the most dominant and active militant groups have close relations with the Gaza Strip. 
According to Egyptian authorities, the Army of Islam, a U.S. designated "terrorist organization" based in the Gaza Strip, is responsible for training and supplying many militant organizations and jihadist members in Sinai. Mohammed Dormosh, the Army of Islam's leader, is known for his close relationships to the Hamas leadership. Army of Islam smuggles members into the Gaza Strip for training, then returns them to the Sinai Peninsula to engage in militant and jihadist activities. 
The legal code Hamas applies in Gaza is based on Ottoman laws, the British Mandate's 1936 legal code, Palestinian Authority law, Sharia law, and Israeli military orders. Hamas maintains a judicial system with civilian and military courts and a public prosecution service. 
Other factions include the Army of Islam (an Islamist faction of the Doghmush clan), the Nidal Al-Amoudi Battalion (an offshoot of the West Bank-based Fatah-linked al-Aqsa Martyrs' Brigades), the Abu Ali Mustapha Brigades (armed wing of the Popular Front for the Liberation of Palestine), the Sheikh Omar Hadid Brigade (ISIL offshoot), Humat al-Aqsa, Jaysh al-Ummah, Katibat al-Sheikh al-Emireen, the Mujahideen Brigades, and the Abdul al-Qadir al-Husseini Brigades. 
The Israeli government uses economic means to pressure Hamas. Among other things, it caused Israeli commercial enterprises like banks and fuel companies to stop doing business with the Gaza Strip. The role of private corporations in the relationship between Israel and the Gaza Strip is an issue that has not been extensively studied. 
Due to continued rocket attacks including 50 in one day, in March 2008, air strikes and ground incursions by the IDF led to the deaths of over 110 Palestinians and extensive damage to Jabalia. 
The international community regards all of the Palestinian territories including Gaza as occupied. Human Rights Watch has declared at the UN Human Rights Council that it views Israel as a de facto occupying power in the Gaza Strip, even though Israel has no military or other presence, because the Oslo Accords authorize Israel to control the airspace and the territorial sea. 
As agreed between Israel and the Palestinian Authority in the Oslo Accords, Israel has exclusive control over the airspace. It can interfere with radio and TV transmissions, and the Palestinian Authority cannot engage in independent initiatives for operating a seaport or airport. The Accords also permitted Palestinians to construct an airport, which was duly built and opened in 1998. Israel destroyed Gaza's only airport in 2001 and 2002, during the Second Intifada. 
The Israeli army makes use of drones, which can launch precise missiles. They are equipped with high-resolution cameras and other sensors. In addition, the missile fired from a drone has its own cameras that allow the operator to observe the target from the moment of firing. After a missile has been launched, the drone operator can remotely divert it elsewhere. Drone operators can view objects on the ground in detail during both day and night. Israeli drones routinely patrol over Gaza. 
Part of the territory is depopulated because of the imposition of buffer zones on both the Israeli and Egyptian borders. 
Initially, Israel imposed a 50-meter buffer zone in Gaza. In 2000, it was expanded to 150 meters. Following the 2005 Israeli disengagement from Gaza, an undefined buffer zone was maintained, including a no-fishing zone along the coast. 
In 2009/2010, Israel expanded the buffer zone to 300 meters. In 2010, the UN estimated that 30 percent of the arable land in Gaza had been lost to the buffer zone. 
Israel and Egypt maintain a blockade of the Gaza Strip, although Israel allows in limited quantities of medical humanitarian aid. The Red Cross claimed that the blockade harms the economy and causes a shortage of basic medicines and equipment such as painkillers and x-ray film. 
Israel claims the blockade is necessary to prevent the smuggling of weapons into Gaza. For example, in 2014, a Panamanian-flagged ship claiming to be carrying construction materials was boarded by the IDF and was found to contain Syrian produced rockets. Israel maintains that the blockade is legal and necessary to limit Palestinian rocket attacks from the Gaza Strip on its cities and to prevent Hamas from obtaining other weapons. 
Israeli spokesman Mark Regev described Israel's actions as "sanctions," not a blockade, but a Gazan legal consultant for UNRWA called the blockade "an action outside of international law." 
In July 2010, British Prime Minister David Cameron said, "humanitarian goods and people must flow in both directions. Gaza cannot and must not be allowed to remain a prison camp." In response, the spokesman for the Israeli embassy in London said, "The people of Gaza are the prisoners of the terrorist organization Hamas. The situation in Gaza is the direct result of Hamas' rule and priorities." 
The Arab League accused Israel of waging a financial war. The IDF strictly controlled travel within the area of the crossing points between Israel and the Gaza Strip, and sealed its border with Gaza. U.S. government travel guides warned tourists that the region was dangerous. 
An anonymous Israeli analyst has called it "Israel's Alcatraz". While Lauren Booth, Philip Slater, Giorgio Agamben compare it to a "concentration camp". For Robert S. Wistrich, and Philip Mendes, such analogies are designed to offend Jews, while Philip Seib dismisses the comparison as absurd, and claims that it arises from sources like Al Jazeera and statements by Arab leaders. 
The main agricultural products are olives, citrus, vegetables, Halal beef, and dairy products. Primary exports are citrus and cut flowers, while primary imports are food, consumer goods, and construction materials. The main trade partners of the Gaza Strip are Israel and Egypt. 
According to Sara Roy, one senior IDF officer told an UNWRA official in 2015 that Israel's policy towards the Gaza Strip consisted of: "No development, no prosperity, no humanitarian crisis." 
For its energy, Gaza is largely dependent on Israel either for import of electricity or fuel for its sole power plant. The Oslo Accords set limits for the Palestinian production and importation of energy. Pursuant to the Accords, the Israel Electric Corporation exclusively supplies the electricity (63% of the total consumption in 2013). The amount of electricity has consistently been limited to 120 megawatts, which is the amount Israel undertook to sell to Gaza pursuant to the Oslo Accords. 
Usually, diesel for Gaza came from Israel, but in 2011, Hamas started to buy cheaper fuel from Egypt, bringing it via a network of tunnels, and refused to allow it from Israel. 
In early March 2012, the head of Gaza's energy authority stated that Egypt wanted to transfer energy via the Kerem Shalom Crossing, but he personally refused it to go through the "Zionist entity" (Israel) and insisted that Egypt transfer the fuel through the Rafah Crossing, although this crossing is not equipped to handle the half-million liters needed each day. 
In late March 2012, Hamas began offering carpools for people to use Hamas state vehicles to get to work. Many Gazans began to wonder how these vehicles have fuel themselves, as diesel was completely unavailable in Gaza, ambulances could no longer be used, but Hamas government officials still had fuel for their own cars. Many Gazans said that Hamas confiscated the fuel it needed from petrol stations and used it exclusively for their own purposes. 
Egypt agreed to provide 600,000 liters of fuel to Gaza daily, but it had no way of delivering it that Hamas would agree to. 
In addition, Israel introduced a number of goods and vehicles into the Gaza Strip via the Kerem Shalom Crossing, as well as the normal diesel for hospitals. Israel also shipped 150,000 liters of diesel through the crossing, which was paid for by the Red Cross. 
In April 2012, the issue was resolved as certain amounts of fuel were supplied with the involvement of the Red Cross, after the Palestinian Authority and Hamas reached a deal. Fuel was finally transferred via the Israeli Kerem Shalom Crossing, which Hamas previously refused to transfer fuel from. 
The topography of the Gaza Strip is dominated by three ridges parallel to the coastline, which consist of Pleistocene-Holocene aged calcareous aeolian (wind deposited) sandstones, locally referred to as "kurkar", intercalated with red-coloured fine grained paleosols, referred to as "hamra". The three ridges are separated by wadis, which are filled with alluvial deposits. 
Gaza's marine gas reserves extend 32 kilometres from the Gaza Strip's coastline and were calculated at 35 BCM. 
From 1987 to 1991, during the First Intifada, Hamas campaigned for the wearing of the hijab head-cover and for other measures (such as the promotion of polygamy, segregating women from men and insisting they stay at home).[citation needed] In the course of this campaign, women who chose not to wear the hijab were verbally and physically harassed by Hamas activists, leading to hijabs being worn "just to avoid problems on the streets". 
In October 2000, Islamic extremists burned down the Windmill Hotel, owned by Basil Eleiwa, when they learned it had served alcohol. 
According to Human Rights Watch, the Hamas-controlled government stepped up its efforts to "Islamize" Gaza in 2010, efforts it says included the "repression of civil society" and "severe violations of personal freedom." 
Iran was the largest state supporter of Hamas, and the Muslim Brotherhood also gave support, but these political relationships have recently been disrupted following the Arab Spring by Iranian support for[clarification needed] and the position of Hamas has declined as support diminishes. 
The movement has clashed with Hamas on a number of occasions. In 2009, a Salafist leader, Abdul Latif Moussa, declared an Islamic emirate in the town of Rafah, on Gaza's southern border. Moussa and 19 other people were killed when Hamas forces stormed his mosque and house. In 2011, Salafists abducted and murdered a pro-Palestinian Italian activist, Vittorio Arrigoni. Following this Hamas again took action to crush the Salafist groups. 
Violence against Christians was recorded. The owner of a Christian bookshop was abducted and murdered and, on 15 February 2008, the Young Men's Christian Association (YMCA) library in Gaza City was bombed. 
In 2010, illiteracy among Gazan youth was less than 1%.  According to UNRWA figures, there are 640 schools in Gaza: 383 government schools, 221 UNRWA schools and 36 private schools, serving a total of 441,452 students. 
In 2010, Al Zahara, a private school in central Gaza introduced a special program for mental development based on math computations. The program was created in Malaysia in 1993, according to the school principal, Majed al-Bari. 
In June 2011, some Gazans, upset that UNRWA did not rebuild their homes that were lost in the Second Intifada, blocked UNRWA from performing its services and shut down UNRWA's summer camps. Gaza residents also closed UNRWA's emergency department, social services office and ration stores. 
In 2012, there were five universities in the Gaza Strip and eight new schools were under construction. By 2018, nine universities were open. 
The Community College of Applied Science and Technology (CCAST) was established in 1998 in Gaza City. In 2003, the college moved into its new campus and established the Gaza Polytechnic Institute (GPI) in 2006 in southern Gaza. In 2007, the college received accreditation to award BA degrees as the University College of Applied Sciences (UCAS). In 2010, the college had a student population of 6,000 in eight departments offering over 40 majors. 
In Gaza, there are hospitals and additional healthcare facilities. Because of the high number of young people the mortality rate is one of the lowest in the world, at 0.315% per year. The infant mortality rate is ranked 105th highest out of 224 countries and territories, at 16.55 deaths per 1,000 births. The Gaza Strip places 24th out of 135 countries according to Human Poverty Index. 
According to Palestinian leaders in the Gaza Strip, the majority of medical aid delivered are "past their expiration date." Mounir el-Barash, the director of donations in Gaza's health department, claims 30% of aid sent to Gaza is used.[failed verification] 
Gazans who desire medical care in Israeli hospitals must apply for a medical visa permit. In 2007, State of Israel granted 7,176 permits and denied 1,627. 
In 2010, Gaza inaugurated its first Olympic-size swimming pool at the As-Sadaka club. The opening ceremony was held by the Islamic Society. The swimming team of as-Sadaka holds several gold and silver medals from Palestinian swimming competitions. 
The Oslo Accords ceded control of the airspace and territorial waters to Israel. Any external travel from Gaza requires cooperation from either Egypt or Israel. 
From 1920 to 1948, the Gaza Strip hosted sections of the Palestine Railways, connecting the region with Egypt. 
The Gaza Strip has rudimentary land line telephone service provided by an open-wire system, as well as extensive mobile telephone services provided by PalTel (Jawwal) and Israeli providers such as Cellcom. Gaza is serviced by four internet service providers that now compete for ADSL and dial-up customers. 
In 2004, most Gaza households had a radio and a TV (70%+), and approximately 20% had a personal computer. People living in Gaza have access to FTA satellite programs, broadcast TV from the Palestinian Broadcasting Corporation, the Israel Broadcasting Authority, and the Second Israeli Broadcasting Authority. 
The shooting of Kuanchung Kao occurred on April 29, 1997 in Rohnert Park, California. Kao was waving a wooden stick in the street in front of his driveway, prompting multiple 911 calls placed by Kao's neighbors. He was then fatally shot by public safety officer Jack Shields. 
On the night of April 28, 1997, Kao was drinking at the Cotati Yacht Club in celebration of a new job. While at the bar, he was involved in two scuffles with at least one other bar patron. In the first, he corrected a patron by stating he was Chinese, not Japanese, to which the other patron responded by saying "You all look alike to me." The bartender, who was familiar with Kao, separated them by seating them at opposite ends of the bar. 
The same patron later approached Kao and whispered some inflammatory words, instigating an altercation to which police were called. Kao was sent home in a taxicab by the bartender, who said the bar fight was inconsistent with Kao's usual behavior. 
Four minutes later police officer Lynch arrived and stopped his patrol vehicle close to Kao in what witnesses felt was an attempt to scare him, but Kao hit the patrol car with the stick. Lynch backed the car away and remained in the car waiting for backup. Almost simultaneously, officer Shields arrived, training a spotlight on Kao and exiting his vehicle, despite Lynch radioing Shields to remain in his car. Shields later testified that he left the car to find Kao's wife Ayling Wu. 
Shields later testified that he feared for his life as Kao was waving the stick in "a threatening martial arts fashion." Kao never studied martial arts. A warrant executed the next day had police comb through Kao's house for evidence of martial arts training or paraphernalia. None was found.  
On August 5, 1997, the Rohnert Park Department of Public Safety ruled Officer Shields acted in accordance with departmental policies and procedures for the use of deadly force. 
The shooting of Kuanchung Kao mobilized Asian-American activists to protest the perceived racial factors in his killing. Days after the August 1997 Rohnert Park investigation cleared Shields, on the 100-day anniversary of Kao's death, a vigil was held in San Francisco in part demanding a new investigation. 
Activist pressure along with a growing trend of fatal police shootings in Sonoma County culminated in a United States Commission on Civil Rights investigation, which held a public hearing on February 20, 1998. Police and police supporters packed the meeting, forcing those with different viewpoints to stand outside the meeting room. 
Jack Shields retired from the Rohnert Park Department of Public Safety in 2000 with over 30 years of service and moved to Hamlin, Texas, later becoming the mayor of Hamlin. 
Mike Lynch left the Department of Public Safety within one year of the shooting, and was last known to be working in a local pet shop. 
In a recent poll Cevallos was elected the most promising Ecuadorian footballer to emerge from L.D.U. Quito. 
In January 2013, Cevallos signed a loan deal with Juventus, for two seasons with an option to buy. In July 2014, however, having not played a single professional game for Juventus, Cevallos left the club to return to Ecuador. Cevallos did play in around 14 unofficial matches for Juventus at youth levels or in unofficial friendlies. 
On 30 January 2018, Cevallos Jr. signed a contract for 4,5 years at Belgian side KSC Lokeren. The transfer fee is estimated around 1.2 million dollars (1 million euro's). Cevallos Jr. turned down several local offers. Even an offer from Club Atletico Independiente. (C.A.I.). Cevallos Jr. preferred to develop his skills in Europe. 
Cevallos made his international debut on 22 February 2017 against Honduras. Cevallos came on as a substitute with 21 minutes to go and also scored the last goal of the match in the 82 minute. 
This biographical article related to a football midfielder from Ecuador is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Melsungen, Richert became a miner when he was sixteen, and joined the Union of Mining and Energy.  He became increasingly involved in the union, until in 1960, he began working full-time for the German Trade Union Confederation (DGB), as its youth secretary for Fulda and Bad Hersfeld.  In 1964, he was promoted to become youth secretary for the whole of Hesse, then in 1971, he became chair of the DGB in Hesse.  He also became chair of the DGB's education wing. 
In 1986, Richert was elected to the national board of the DGB, and in 1990, he additionally became president of the DGB's education wing.  In 1991, he also became president of the International Federation of Commercial, Clerical, Professional and Technical Employees.  He retired in 1995, due to poor health, and died in 1997. 
Bobby "Bobcat" Ervin (born December 13, 1967), professionally known as Bobcat or DJ Bobcat, is an American Grammy Award winner and multi-platinum producer, songwriter, DJ, artist and music executive. 
He has worked with musicians such as Clive Davis, Russell Simmons, Rick Rubin, Lyor Cohen, Steve Rifkind, Madonna, Guy Oseary, Jermaine Dupri, and has written and produced songs for artists such as LL Cool J, Ice Cube, Mack 10, Tupac, Mc Ren, Sir Mix A Lot, K9 Posse, Breeze, Nas, King T, Kam, Candyman, and Yo-Yo. 
At the time, Bobcat was only 15 years old and wasn't even tall enough to reach the turntables so they would have him stand on top of a milk crate to DJ. Back then Bobcat didn't own any professional equipment, so when he began working with Big Daddy Productions and Uncle Jamm's Army, Ice T's DJ Chris "The Glove" Taylor had to show him how to use the huge Cerwin Vega Mixer. 
Roger Clayton, founder of Uncle Jamm's Army, would fly to the East Coast and pick up the hottest new underground records from various record stores in the city and bring them back to LA. Bobcat and The Egyptian Lover would take those records, play them first and break them at the big Uncle Jamm's Dances that drew over 15,000 people in the early 1980s. 
At this time Bobcat recorded 12-inch single with Tracy Kendrick and Courtney Branch of Total Track Productions that included the Bobcat Song & California Catt Crew. 
Uncle Jamm's Army and the Wrecking Crew are the forefathers of West Coast hip hop. The Mix Masters were the next generation. 
After dominating the West Coast hip hop scene, Bobcat with his crew L.A. Posse flew to New York City and began working with rap mogul Russell Simmons, Lyor Cohen and Def Jam Records, writing and producing tracks for LL Cool J including "I Need Love", "I'm Bad", "Jack the Ripper", "Kanday", "Get Down", "Go Cut Creator Go" and "The Do Wop". The album Bigger and Deffer sold over 3 million copies, and is considered some of LL Cool J's best work. 
Bobcat wrote the melody to "I Need Love" when he was 16 years old. It was originally a song titled "Friends By Day, Lovers By Night", Bobcat's version of "Secret Lovers" by Atlantic Starr. 
"I Need Love" has been sampled and remade more than any other rap song in history.[citation needed] It has been sampled or replayed by Jermaine Dupri, Usher, Master P, Kris Kross and countless others. 
LL Cool J asked Bobcat to go on the now world-famous Def Jam Tour. Bobcat signed on as DJ/music supervisor, and also designed and choreographed LL's stage shows. He toured all over the world, DJing and overseeing the sound and lighting. 
Bobcat became an Arista recording artist and toured around the country performing his album, Cat Got Ya Tongue, on the same stage with New Edition and Jodi Watley. 
That same year[when?] Bobcat was presented with a proclamation by the Atlanta City Council for making a positive album and being a positive influence and role model for the community. 
Bobcat and his wife Chanel Ervin started a global entertainment agency and strategic marketing firm titled The Foundation. This global network primarily focuses on DJs and producers, and also markets and promotes new and established recording artists. 
The Digital Record Pool is an online music marketing service and online community for recording artists that has thousands of DJs, MDs, PDs, tastemakers, music lovers, music producers, journalists and bloggers from around the world. Bobcat is the founder/CEO, and says this site and service were created to help new artists and indie labels around the world get maximum exposure. 
Bobcat and the Foundation Entertainment Agency launched an international DJ team for the purpose of promoting new music, media, brands, goods and technologies Globally. Bobcat is founder and general manager, His wife, Chanel Ervin, is the President of Marketing. 
Sandford was born at Torrington in Devon and became an accountant, eventually becoming manager of Ashton Gate Iron Rolling Mills. 
In 1883 he moved to Sydney, employed to organise a wire-netting plant, at what was then part of Five Dock now Chiswick, NSW 
After visiting Lithgow, he became enthusiastic about the local iron industry and tried to persuade his English employers to buy the Eskbank Ironworks. 
The rolling mill at Mittagong proved unsuitable and Sandford relocated his operations, in 1887, to the rolling mills of the Eskbank Ironworks at Lithgow, which he leased for the purpose from James Rutherford. 
He bought a 2000 acre property at Bowenfels, to the west of Lithgow, and added a second story to the existing house, creating an 11-room home, which he later named 'Eskroy Park' 
In 1892, Sandford purchased the Eskbank Ironworks, using money loaned by the Commercial Banking Company of Sydney, and was given a government contract in railway parts. It was a brave move, at a time when Australia was enduring a serious economic downturn.[citation needed] Moreover, he began expanding the plant, in the expectation that protection against imports would be forthcoming. 
In 1899, Sandford attempted to interest his friend Charles Hoskins in buying the Eskbank works but the offer was declined. 
With Federation, in 1901, tariffs and duties between the colonies were abolished and the matter of import protection came one for the new Commonwealth of Australia to decide at a national level. With the election of a Protectionist minority government in the new Australian House of Representative, Sandford became optimistic that protection for the iron and steel industry would be forthcoming. 
Although Sandford was feted upon his return to Lithgow, his plan for a new and well-capitalised company to expand the Lithgow works was stymied.  In 1903, Sandford had to close the sheet mills at Lithgow altogether but continued to make galvanized iron using imported sheets. 
In 1904, William Sandford Limited  settled two disputes with its employees in the N.S.W. Arbitration Court. 
As steamships came to replace sailing ships, cheap pig iron, in the form of ballast, was being imported less. On a steamship, pig iron would be carried as paid cargo. With a sizable local market, making iron in Australia was becoming more viable. 
 Premier Joseph Carruthers (a Free Trader) persuaded him to agree to William Sandford Limited contracting to supply all of the New South Wales Government's needs for iron and steel, for a seven year period, in 1905. Most of this steel would be in the form of heavy steel rails for railways. A condition of that contract was that local iron ore, coal and limestone were to be used to produce iron, necessitating the erection of a blast furnace.
The final form of the legislation alarmed the bank, which then withdrew its tentative agreement to support Sandford, demanded full repayment of the overdraft amount, and took over the assets on 9 December 1907. Only the new blast furnace was kept in operation, to prevent its destruction if it were to cool. 700 workers became idle. 
Sandford's shares became essentially worthless and he faced financial ruin, at the age of 66. After years of great mental stress, he was a broken man. 
Left with little choice,  on 19 December 1907, Sandford reluctantly accepted the offer from G & C Hoskins to take over his enterprise. Summing up his position he stated, " I have only the satisfaction of knowing that the object of my life has been attained, and I have demonstrated that good merchantable pig iron can be made from the Australian raw materials". 
Even after he had left the industry and Lithgow, Sandford continued to be an advocate for the iron and steel industry at Lithgow and to defend his role in it, of which he was proud. 
Sandford had been popular and widely respected in Lithgow as a relatively benevolent employer, who had the interests of his workers at heart. In 1893, when orders at Lithgow were slack, he obtained work for some of his employees at the Onehunga Ironworks in New Zealand. He provided cheap land for his workers and assistance to build their houses, including providing house designs and guaranteeing their bank loans. 
He had engaged his workers by contract with an element of profit sharing; an arrangement which he advocated and in which he took some personal pride. When the subsequent owners, G & C Hoskins attempted to change these employment arrangements to day labour, it began a series of bitter and sometimes violent strikes and lock outs lasting almost four years. 
Many of Sandford's managers and workforce stayed on at the works under the new management and were part of the growth of the iron and steel industry in the following decades. His General Manager, William Thornley, left Lithgow and set up an iron and steel foundry, W. Thornley and Sons, at Sydenham, in Sydney, to make railway equipment. It later also made commercial woodworking machine tools. 
When Sandford visited Lithgow in 1922, it was as an honoured guest and he received an official civic reception. He attended the service for his old friend and later foe, Charles Hoskins, who died in February 1926. Some of his old associates continued to visit him, including for his 90th birthday in 1931. 
He lived long enough to see protection of the iron and steel industries introduced by the Labor government of Andrew Fisher, the first steel rails made at Lithgow in 1911,  the establishment of a rival steelworks at Newcastle in 1915, the establishment of a new listed company Australian Iron & Steel in 1928, and the gradual closure and relocation to Port Kembla of the Hoskins' works at Lithgow, between  November 1928 and January 1932. 
Sandford had somewhat complicated family arrangements. He had left two children by a previous marriage in England, but he married Caroline Newey on 3 May 1884 at Goulburn. Caroline was 15 years his junior and herself had a previous marriage. Sandford's first wife was alive in England for at least twenty years after he emigrated. 
 He had three children with Caroline. The children had a privileged upbringing at Eskroy Park, before being sent away to boarding school. In 1895, the two elder children and their mother each had their own horse.
The middle names, Fitzroy and Esk, that Sandford gave to his two sons are  the after the names of the ironworks that Sandford was running, at the time that each of his sons was born, the Fitzroy Iron Works and the Eskbank Ironworks respectively.  
William Sandford died on 29 May 1932, aged 90, at his home, 'Iona', 16 Ethel Street, Eastwood, only months after the last of the Lithgow steelworks operations finally closed.  He was survived by his second wife, Caroline, a daughter and one of his two sons by Caroline, and a daughter and a son from his earlier English marriage. His will only recognised his Australian-born children by Caroline. Caroline died in 1934. 
Sandford's modest grave lies in the Anglican section of the Macquarie Park (formerly Northern Suburbs General) Cemetery . His epitaph reads, "Pioneer of Iron & Steel Industry." He lies with his wife, Caroline, and nearby lie the graves of two of his children, Frederick (Esk) and Clarice. His other son, Roy, was cremated. 
Lithophane viridipallens, the pale green pinion moth, is a moth of the family Noctuidae that is native to North America. It is listed as a species of special concern in the US state of Connecticut. It was described by Augustus Radcliffe Grote in 1877. 
For any pointed spaces X, Y, and Z in an appropriate "convenient" category (e.g., that of compactly generated spaces), there are natural (basepoint preserving) homeomorphisms 
However, for the naive category of pointed spaces, this fails, as shown by the counterexample     X = Y =  Q    {\displaystyle X=Y=\mathbb {Q} }   and     Z =  N    {\displaystyle Z=\mathbb {N} }   found by Dieter Puppe. A proof due to Kathleen Lewis that Puppe's counterexample is indeed a counterexample can be found in the book of Johann Sigurdsson and J. Peter May. 
These isomorphisms make the appropriate category of pointed spaces into a symmetric monoidal category with the smash product as the monoidal product and the pointed 0-sphere (a two-point discrete space) as the unit object. One can therefore think of the smash product as a kind of tensor product in an appropriate category of pointed spaces. 
In the category of pointed spaces, the smash product plays the role of the tensor product in this formula: if     A , X   {\displaystyle A,X}   are compact Hausdorff then we have an adjunction 
NASDAQ Canada commenced functioning with the inaugural opening of its office from Montreal, Quebec, Canada, on 21 November 2000. In the first phase of the development of Nasdaq Canada, trading operations were initially started with Nasdaq workstations and terminals installed at 10 participating Canadian securities firms in Montreal.  The 10 initial Canadian brokerages participating in Nasdaq Canada are: 
This enabled these firms to trade the 5,000 Nasdaq-listed companies directly through their local broker, including the 42 Canadian companies previously listed solely on Nasdaq U.S.  In December 2000, there were 146 Canadian companies listed on NASDAQ. 
Helen Kearns was the first President of Nasdaq Canada. In July 2004, Nasdaq announced the closing of Nasdaq Canada's only office in Montreal.  Nasdaq Canada's operations are now run out of New York City. 
The Nasdaq Canada Index was created at the same time as Nasdaq Canada.  The Nasdaq Canada Index is composed of 61 companies.  The ticker symbol of this index is CND. 
Adpar, formerly Trefhedyn, is a village in Ceredigion, Wales, in the community of Llandyfriog, now considered as a part of Newcastle Emlyn to which it is joined by a bridge across the River Teifi. In ancient times Adpar was a borough in its own right. 
The Royal Commission on the Ancient and Historical Monuments of Wales records a "possible medieval castle motte" within the village. The mound is low, about 3.5 metres in height and damaged in subsequent periods. 
At one time Adpar was relatively more important than it is now. It was an ancient borough, returned its own member of parliament, and had a Portreeve and two bailiffs. It had a market and several seasonal animal fairs. Several industrial enterprises used the fast-flowing waters of the River Teifi for power, including a woollen mill that produced flannel, blankets and knitting yarn. There was also a fishing weir above the bridge to catch migratory salmon. 
The last duel that took place in Cardiganshire occurred in Adpar in 1814. The last recorded use of stocks in the United Kingdom was in Adpar in 1872. 
The 1998 Prague municipal election was held as part of 1998 Czech municipal elections. Civic Democratic Party has received highest number of votes and formed coalition with Czech Social Democratic Party. Jan Kasl became mayor of Prague. 
Wong wins three rounds in the match but collapses after the third round as he has been poisoned. Wong's students take his place in the next rounds and marginally win the match. Wong is on the verge of death from poisoning, but, surprisingly, Monk Geng-fa sends him the antidote. 
Just before the final fight takes place, Wong rings the temple's bells and reminds Monk Geng-fa of his past. Actually, Monk Geng-fa used to be a Shaolin monk but was expelled from the monastery for bad conduct. He decides to repent and gives up fighting. Prince Cheng also feels ashamed of himself and lets Wong off. Wong returns the ancestral tablets to Po-chi-lam while 13th Aunt returns from her trip to Europe. 
Hung-chi, the Shaolin abbot, has contracted a serious illness. Wong Fei-hung is invited to help to heal the abbot. He brings his students Porky Wing and Clubfoot with him to Shaolin and discovers that Hung-chi has been poisoned. Just as he is about to heal the abbot, a masked assailant attempts to assassinate the abbot but fails and escapes. Wong pursues the assassin to the Shaolin library, where the latter mysteriously disappears. 
Clubfoot escapes and rescues an old monk, Hung-wun, with Mo-gan and Kwai-so's help. Wong discovers that Hung-wun's limbs were injured by someone who uses the "Great Strength Vajra Finger", and decides to do a blood transfusion between Hung-chi and Hung-wun. The operation is successful and the two monks recover. Hung-wun is still crippled but can now use his "Iron Head Skill" again. 
A legend in Canton says of a haunted plum orchid in the western part of the city. General Cheung visits Canton and insists on visiting the haunted orchid. Canton's Governor Hong is afraid that something might happen to the general, so he asks Wong Fei-hung's students to help to protect the general. 
To uncover the truth, Wong ventures into the orchid and finds some clues. With assistance from Nip Siu-sin, a mysterious lady, Wong tricks Lau into revealing himself to be the murderer, and that the mastermind is actually General Hon. After his lies are exposed, the furious General Hon attacks the city but his plan is foiled and Wong saves the day. 
The Qing dynasty has been overthrown by the 1911 Xinhai Revolution. Wong Fei-hung and his students return from their trip to Japan. Along the way, Wong meets a reporter, Ng Mung-ching, who was a fellow student of 13th Aunt, and starts a romance with her. 
Ng introduces Wong to help Chai Kei, a close associate of Yuan Shikai, with printing banknotes. Wong also breaks up a banknote agency controlled by Westerners with Ng's help. Po-chi-lam is recognised by the government as a legitimate banknote printing and distribution organisation. 
13th Aunt is jealous of Wong and Ng. At the same time, Chai Kei also displays affections for her. 13th Aunt unexpectedly discovers that Ng is a descendant of the Qing imperial family and she is planning to make use of Yuan Shikai to help her restore the Qing dynasty. In the meantime, Wong learns that Ng has been lying to them: she is using the banknotes from Po-chi-lam to purchase firearms instead of food and medical supplies. 
Along with the formation of Odisha, the "Orissa Police" got its establishment on April 1, 1936. The department was a force comprising 4000 trained men of all ranks. The Orissa Police Manual Rules (OPMR) was unveiled in 1940 which boasted rules and regulations of the powers, functions and duties of the police department at various levels. 
The Odisha Police is organized into ten Police Ranges, most of which are further divided into districts. The Ranges are: 
The Special Operation Group (SOG) is an elite paramilitary unit specializing in neutralizing terrorists, insurgents and extremists. The force currently, is primarily being used to counter left-wing extremism. 
The Special Tactical Unit (STU) is a dedicated urban warfare counter-terrorist force consisting of Special Operations Group (SOG) personnel who are trained alongside the National Security Guard (NSG). The force made Odisha, third state in the country, after Maharashtra and Andhra Pradesh, to have a dedicated force to counter terrorism in urban areas. 
The District Voluntary Force (DVF) is a special constabulary unit specializing in anti-Maoist operations. 
The Odisha Industrial Police Force (OIPF) is a security force which was constituted to protect public and private sector industrial undertakings in Odisha. The force was formed under the Odisha Industrial Security Force Act of the Government of Odisha in 2012. 
Government of Odisha sanctioned altogether 5600 posts of Special Police Officers (SPOs) keeping in mind of SC and ST's employment in 2008. Currently, the force has a sanctioned strength of 1521 personnel. 
This biographical article relating to an American football wide receiver born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Demant A/S is a leading international hearing health care company within hearing aids, audiometric equipment, and personal communication. 
The Demant Group was founded in 1904 by Hans Demant, under the name Oticon. After his death in 1910, his son William Demant took over. 
Already before World War I, Oticon increased its sales volume to cover Scandinavia and Saint Petersburg. In the twenties and thirties, a network of agents was established in Europe. 
During World War II, Oticon started its own production due to the scarcity of goods from other countries. 
In 1957, William and his wife Ida Emilie donated the Demant family's shares in the company to the Oticon Foundation which is today called The William Demant Foundation. The Foundation's general aim is charity with particular emphasis on helping people with a hearing impairment and today the Oticon Foundation is the main shareholder in William Demant Holding A/S with a holding of app. 61%. 
During the 1990s the company expanded further, buying the Swiss hearing aid manufacturer Bernafon, Phonic Ear, the headset manufacturer DanaCom and Interacoustics. 
In 1997 it was decided to change the name of the parent company from Oticon Holding A/S to William Demant Holding A/S because it was considered disadvantageous to use the same name, both for the Group, and for one of its businesses. Further in 2019 William Demant Holding A/S changed its name to Demant A/S 
In February 2017 it was announced that former President & CEO Niels Jacobsen would step down after 25 years in charge of the company. Instead he would become CEO of William Demant Invest A/S 
Wick Town and County Hospital is a health facility in Seaforth Avenue, Wick, Scotland. It is managed by NHS Highland. 
The facility, which was designed by Sinclair Macdonald as an infectious diseases hospital, opened in 1910. The hospital joined the National Health Service in 1948 and a modern extension has since been built on the site. Protesters concerned about the potential closure of the hospital held candlelight meetings in October 2017. 
Aphaenops alberti is a species of beetle in the subfamily Trechinae. It was described by Jeannel in 1939. 
As a family thiosilanes refers to compounds of the form RSSiR'H2 with a S-Si bond between organic groups. 
Butler is a town in Custer County, Oklahoma, United States. The population was 287 at the 2010 census. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 345 people, 138 households, and 104 families residing in the town. The population density was 815.0 people per square mile (317.2/km2). There were 160 housing units at an average density of 378.0 per square mile (147.1/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 89.28% White, 0.87% Native American, 0.29% Asian, 4.93% from other races, and 4.64% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 11.88% of the population. 
There were 138 households, out of which 28.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 59.4% were married couples living together, 13.0% had a female householder with no husband present, and 24.6% were non-families. 21.7% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.50 and the average family size was 2.88. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 24.1% under the age of 18, 7.2% from 18 to 24, 25.2% from 25 to 44, 27.0% from 45 to 64, and 16.5% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 40 years. For every 100 females, there were 84.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 94.1 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $29,375, and the median income for a family was $32,083. Males had a median income of $25,500 versus $24,583 for females. The per capita income for the town was $13,917. About 18.4% of families and 29.8% of the population were below the poverty line, including 51.5% of those under age 18 and 7.0% of those age 65 or over. 
Murray was elected as a Democrat to the Sixty-second and Sixty-third Congresses. He served as a Member of Congress from March 4, 1911, until September 28, 1914, when he resigned, having been appointed postmaster of Boston. 
On June 19, 1914 President Wilson nominated Murray for the position of Postmaster of Boston., the Senate Confirmed the nomination on July 16, 1914. Murray served as postmaster from October 1, 1914, until his death on September 21, 1918. 
In the Autumn of 1918 Murray contracted the Spanish flu and died from pneumonia at Boston City Hospital at 11:40 on the night of September 21, 1918. 
Thompson was born in London to Yoruba parents. His family left the United Kingdom for Nigeria around 1976, when Thompson was about seven.  He grew up in Nigeria, where he studied medicine and social anthropology. He went on to specialise in psychiatry. He returned to the UK in 1998, where he has remained except for a year spent working in Samoa. He now lives on the south coast of England. 
His novels and short stories have been critically received. Thompson was a Nommo Award and a Kitschies Golden Tentacle Award winner. He was a John W. Campbell Award finalist as well as nominated for the Shirley Jackson Award, the British Science Fiction Award, and the Nommo Award. Thompson is also a capable illustrator and artist. His novella The Murders of Molly Southbourne has been optioned for screen adaptation. 
His novel Rosewater, the first book in the Wormwoood trilogy set in Nigeria won the prestigious Arthur C. Clarke award in 2019. 
Owen largely retired from acting in the 1970s and worked as a radio dispatcher for a cab company. After a long public absence, he was interviewed in 2011 about his experiences making Zulu. 
WTVY-FM (95.5 FM) is an American radio station licensed to serve the community of Dothan, Alabama, United States.  The station is owned by Gulf South Communications.  The station began broadcasting on September 20, 1968; the station was originally owned by Woods Communications Corporation as a sister to WTVY television. 
Caleana alcockii, commonly known as Alcock's duck orchid is a rare species of orchid endemic to the south-west of Western Australia. It has a single smooth leaf and is distinguished by its humped labellum and relatively late flowering period. It only occurs north of Geraldton. 
Alcock's duck orchid was first formally described in 2006 by Stephen Hopper and Andrew Brown who gave it the name Paracaleana alcockii. The description was published in Australian Systematic Botany. In 2014, based on molecular studies, Joseph Miller and Mark Clements transferred all the species previously in Paracaleana to Caleana so that the present species became Caleana alcockii. The specific epithet (alcockii) honours John Alcock who recognised the species as distinct. 
Caleana alcockii grows with grasses or sedges in sandy soil in a small area north of the Murchison River in the Geraldton Sandplains biogeographic region. 
Caleana alcockii (as Paracaleana alcockii) is classified as "Priority Two" by the Western Australian Government Department of Parks and Wildlife meaning that it is poorly known and from only one or a few locations. 
Joymoti was born in the middle of the 17th-century in Maduri to Laithepena Borgohain and Chandradaru.  She was married to Langi Gadapani Konwar, later an Ahom king, Supatphaa, who established the Tungkhunia line of kings.  During the Purge of the Princes from 1679 to 1681 under King Sulikphaa (Loraa Roja), instigated by Laluksola Borphukan, Gadapani took flight.  Over the next few years, he sought shelter in the Naga hills. 
Failing to trace Prince Gadapani, Sulikphaa's soldiers brought his wife Joymoti to Jerenga Pathar where, despite torture, the princess refused to reveal the whereabouts of her husband. After continuous physical torture over 14 days, Joymoti died on 13 Choit of 1601 Saka, or 27 March 1680.[dead link] 
The State Government of Assam has instituted an annual award in the name of Joymoti, presented to women in recognition of excellence in their chosen fields of work. 
Joymoti (1935 film) was the first Assamese language film, directed and produced by Jyoti Prasad Agarwala. In 2006, Manju Borah released another film by the same name. The 19th-century Assamese writer Lakshminath Bezbaruah depicted her life in the drama Joymoti Kuwori. 
Kirsten Hillman is a Canadian lawyer and diplomat who was appointed as Canadian ambassador to the United States on March 26, 2020. She is the first woman to serve in this role. In 2019, she had been appointed as acting ambassador, taking over from David MacNaughton. Prior to this, she served as deputy ambassador at the Embassy of Canada in Washington, D.C. 
Hillman grew up in Calgary and Winnipeg. She has a Bachelor of Arts degree from the University of Manitoba, as well as civil law and common law degrees from McGill University. 
Hillman worked as a lawyer in private practice in Montreal, and for the Department of Justice in Ottawa. She was assistant deputy minister of the trade agreements and negotiations branch at Global Affairs Canada, serving as Canada's senior legal adviser to the World Trade Organization and chief negotiator for the Comprehensive and Progressive Agreement for Trans-Pacific Partnership. 
Prime Minister Justin Trudeau announced Hillman's appointment as ambassador to the U.S. on March 26, 2020, making her the first woman to hold the post. As a career public servant, she is not seen as a political appointee. Her appointment was viewed as a choice that would find favour among both Conservatives and Liberals. 
Katie Arnoldi (February 24, 1959) is an American mainstream fiction writer and former bodybuilder. She has published three novels, Chemical Pink (Bloomsbury, 2001), The Wentworths (Overlook, 2008), and Point Dume (Overlook, 2010). Arnoldi lives in Southern California with her husband, the painter Charles Arnoldi, and their two children. 
Set in Mexico and Malibu, Point Dume explores the death of surf culture, the destruction of public land by cartel marijuana growers using pesticides and rodenticides, native and invasive species, and obsessive love. 
Seven years after publishing Chemical Pink, Arnoldi paints a searing portrait of wealthy Westside Los Angeles life, dramatizing the dysfunctionality of the modern American family while examining how it actually is that people get so screwed up. 
Set in the world of female bodybuilding, Chemical Pink is a story of obsession and the consequences of going too far to achieve your goals. 
As with preceding Nike fire control systems, the Improved Hercules van trailers (e.g., by Fruehauf Trailer Co.) allowed the RCDC to be transported after the military installation was disemplaced from the station.  Van trailers included: 
The RCDC was an improved fire control system for the Hercules missile based on a 1952 Ordance Corps study for an advanced attack system (Hercules design studies began in February 1953, and personnel training began in 1956).  The "Improved Hercules system" was first deployed in 1961 and had "tracking, guidance, and interception" improvements by "modifying or replacing radar and electronics equipment". 
Ellen J. Kennedy is the founder and Executive Director of World Without Genocide, a human rights organization headquartered at Mitchell Hamline School of Law, St. Paul, MN. 
Dr. Kennedy earned a Bachelor of Arts in English and Psychology from the University of Michigan. She has masters degrees in Communications and English from Northern Michigan University and a masters in Sociology from the University of Minnesota. She also has two doctorates from the University of Minnesota. 
Kennedy has published many articles on human rights and genocide in academic and mass publications.  Kennedy was also a regular contributor for Minnesota Public Radio from 2010 to 2012. 
A mark of his convincing style all'antica is the fact that a bronze bust of a bearded man wearing a toga in the collection of the Rijksmuseum was long considered to be a Roman bronze. And a mark of the difficulty of attributions is the fact that it is attributed to Severo or to Tullio Lombardo 
The species was described as new to science in the journal Mycotaxon in 2011. The type collection was made by a farmer in Panzhihua City, China (Sichuan Province) in 2007. Molecular phylogenetic analysis of ribosomal DNA sequences shows that the species groups in a clade with Tuber huidongense. The specific epithet sinoalbidum combines the Latin words for China (sino) and white (albidum). 
The authors note that Tuber huidongense (endemic to Sichuan and Yunnan Provinces) resembles Tuber sinoalbidum in spore ornamentation, but the former species can be distinguished from the latter by the brown surface color and blackish gleba of mature fruit bodies. 
Each lifter performed in both the snatch and clean and jerk lifts, with the final score being the sum of the lifter's best result in each. The athlete received three attempts in each of the two lifts; the score for the lift was the heaviest weight successfully lifted. This weightlifting event was the fifth lightest men's event at the weightlifting competition, limiting competitors to a maximum of 85 kilograms of body mass. 
Disposable email addressing, also known as DEA or dark mail, refers to an approach which involves a unique email address being used for every contact, entity, or for a limited number of times or uses. The benefit is that if anyone compromises the address or utilizes it in connection with email abuse, the address owner can easily cancel (or "dispose" of) it without affecting any of their other contacts. 
Further, because DEAs serve as a layer of indirection between the sender and recipient, if the DEA user's actual email address changes, for instance because of moving from a university address to a local ISP, then the user need only update the DEA service provider about the change, and all outstanding DEAs will continue to function without updating. 
Another approach is to register one main email address and many auxiliary email addresses, which will forward all mail to the main address, i.e., the auxiliaries are used as aliases of the main address. The advantage of this approach is that the user can easily detect which auxiliary email is 'leaking' with spam and block or dispose it. 
Some services require additional time to set up forwarding, but others allow to create new addresses "on the fly" without registering them with the service in advance. However, this method allows storage and access of all emails from a single main account, although to manage forwarding for some services the user has to remember the password for each alias. 
Banning DEAs might not be as effective at deterring undesirable users. More effective techniques for controlling undesirables without inconveniences to legitimate DEA users might include: recognizing legitimate DEAs for what they are (they usually have a proper domain and a fixed prefix or suffix), distinguishing them from short-lived, random throwaway address patterns or domains used by undesirables, wildcard banning. 
Petri Tapio Mattson is the founder of the Early music ensemble Opus X, and has worked as its artistic director from 1995 to 2006 and again from 2009 onwards. From 1999 to 2005 he worked as leader (concert master) for the Sixth Floor Orchestra (now the Finnish Baroque Orchestra). He has also appeared as leader and solo violinist with the Helsinki Baroque Orchestra, the Finnish-Estonian Baroque Orchestra, the Tallinn Baroque Orchestra, Lappeenranta Orchestra and Haapavesi Chamber Orchestra. 
In addition to the violin and the viol, Petri Tapio Mattson has also performed on the viola. He has recorded for the labels Alba, BIS, Ondine, Fuga, Naxos, Aeolus and La Bottega Discantica. He has studied violin making under the guidance of luthier Pekka Suihkonen from Haapavesi. 
Born in Bamberg County, South Carolina, Rhoad served in the United States Navy during World War II.  
Rhoad was a farmer and worked with the United States Post Office. He also served as a member of the Bamberg County Council. He served in the South Carolina House of Representatives as a Democrat from 1983 to 2007. 
During his 24-year-long tenure in the South Carolina House of Representatives, Rhode worked to pass laws on turkey hunting, drug abuse and tax incentives for job creation. Rhoad was also involved in oversight of House personnel and facilities. He was a longtime chairman of the Agricultural, Natural Resources and Environmental Affairs Committees. 
This article on a moth of the subfamily Dichomeridinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Green Lizard is a band from Tilburg, Netherlands that plays rock and roll, with influences from grunge, punk rock, hard rock and metal. 
Green Lizard was founded in 1994 and the first big success happened in 1996 when they won the Big Prize of the Netherlands (annual competition for unknown bands to win money and gigs). Late 1997 they brought out The Nine EP  which was re-released a year later by record label Double T Music which would release their next album as well. This EP was produced by Jack Endino, famous for his work with Nirvana and Soundgarden (to name a few) and was recorded in just 9 days. 
In March 2007, drummer Roeland Uijtdewilligen left the band. The physical strain of years of drumming took its toll. He'll continue to play in his folkband We Nun Henk. On April first he played his last show with Green Lizard, where Willy turned up to play a song with them. Jasper Dankaart, formerly of the metalband Agresion took over from Bram van den Berg (Krezip), who took over temporarily. 
The band was on its way to write the next record when in November 2007 bassist Jay left the band. As a result, the band has suspended all current activities and it is unclear at this moment if the band will return. 
Green Lizard is well known for their energetic live performances. The band has toured extensively, with bands like The Gathering, Krezip, Brainpower, Agresion, Soda P, The League Of XO Gentlemen, The Riplets, San Andreas and Cooper, and has performed with international acts like Alien Ant Farm, Dredg, Deftones, The Rasmus and Living Colour.  They have also played various festivals like Pinkpop, Lowlands, Roskilde, and the Vans Warped Tour. 
On 20 July 2015 the Chilean Olympic Committee announced that Oyarzun had been sent home from the 2015 Pan American Games in Toronto after he had tested positive for the HIF prolyl-hydroxylase inhibitor FG-4592 in a pre-competition test. Oyarzun was at the Games to ride the time trial, but was sent home prior to the event. 
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Owstonia is a genus of marine ray-finned fish belonging to the family Cepolidae, the bandfishes. It is the only genus in the monotypic subfamily Owstoninae. They are found in deep-waters of the Indian and Pacific Ocean. 
Musicians who appeared on the series included Billie Holiday, Coleman Hawkins, Henry "Red" Allen, Pee Wee Russell, Marty Napoleon, Georgie Auld, Buster Bailey, Vinnie Burke, Roy Eldridge, J. C. Higginbotham, Les Paul, Dick Hyman, Anita O'Day, Connee Boswell, Mae Barnes, Chris Connor, Sylvia Syms, Mary Osborne, Teddy Charles, Harry Sheppard, Maxine Sullivan, Alec Templeton, Abbey Lincoln and many others. 
The Defining Issues Test is a component model of moral development devised by James Rest in 1974. The University of Minnesota formally established the Center for the Study of Ethical Development as a vehicle for research around this test in 1982. 
The personal interests schema are regarded as the least developmentally advanced level of moral reasoning.  In operating primarily at the Personal Interests level, the respondent takes into consideration what the protagonist of the story, or those close to the protagonist, has to gain or lose.  The Maintaining Norms Schema is considered more advanced than the Personal Interests Schema, as it emphasizes more than the individual.   
At the maintaining norms reasoning level, law and authority are important, as each of these helps to uphold social order, which is paramount to this schema.  So, a respondent who is predominantly using this schema will take into consideration what needs to be done in order to be compliant with the social order of society.  Finally, the Postconventional Schema is regarded as the most developmentally advanced.   
At the postconventional reasoning level, laws are not simply blindly accepted (as with the maintaining norms schema), but are scrutinized in order to ensure society-wide benefit.  So, a respondent who is primarily using this schema will focus on what is best for society as a whole.  For example, the civil rights movement was a product of postconventional reasoning, as followers were most concerned with the society-wide effects of inequality.   
Though an individual may rely more heavily on one of the aforementioned schemas, moral reasoning is typically informed, to varying degrees, by each of the schemas. 
One of the Defining Issues Test's original purposes was to assess the transition of moral development from adolescence to adulthood. In 1999 the test was revised in the DIT-2 for brevity, clarity and more powerful validity criteria. 
The Defining Issues Test has been dubbed "Neo-Kohlbergian" by its constituents as it emphasizes cognition, personal construction, development and postconventional moral thinking - reflective of the work by Lawrence Kohlberg and his stages of moral development. 
Roxanne Donnery is a member of the Orange County legislature in Orange County, New York. She represents the 14th District as a member of the Democratic Party, which includes the town of Highlands and most of the town of Woodbury, both located in Orange County. She decided to run against Nancy Calhoun, who has represented the 96th District in the New York State Assembly for 20 years. 
After County Executive Eddie Diana dropped the second lawsuit against the pipeline in March 2010, Donnery voiced her opposition to the move, citing unresolved issues with sewer treatment. She is currently supporting the efforts of three municipalities - Town and Village of Woodbury and Village of Harriman - in their lawsuit against the pipeline that seeks to pick up where the county left off.[citation needed] 
As Chairwoman, Donnery made the creation of an independent watchdog agency - an inspector general to root out waste, fraud, and abuse in county government - a priority. After almost a full year of studying the concept, Donnery pushed for a vote at the end of the 2009 session and successfully persuaded the legislature to pass the measure. County Executive Eddie Diana, however, vetoed the bill shortly thereafter. 
The Legislature voted in May 2010 to move forward on studying future options for the ownership and operation of the county-owned Valley View Center for Nursing Care and Rehabilitation. Donnery opposes some legislators' attempts to sell the facility as she claims that privatizing Valley View would endanger quality of care, price many patients out of the facility, and potentially lead to job cuts. She voted against the study both in committee as well as in the full legislature. 
The 8th Kansas Infantry Regiment was an infantry regiment that served in the Union Army during the American Civil War. 
Companies A, D, G, and H of the 8th Kansas Infantry were organized at Lawrence, Kansas; the remaining companies were recruited from across the state. Company A was the first to muster in on August 28, 1861. The regiment mustered in under the command of Colonel Henry W. Wessells. 
The regiment lost a total of 244 men during service; 3 officers and 94 enlisted men killed or mortally wounded, 3 officers and 144 enlisted men died of disease. 
Blond Barbarians and Noble Savages is a 1975 collection of essays on the fantasy writers Robert E. Howard and H. P. Lovecraft by science-fiction writer L. Sprague de Camp, first published by T-K Graphics. It was reissued in 1986 by Borgo Press as number 2 in its Essays on Fantastic Literature series. 
The work consists of an introduction and three essays, "Lovecraft and the Aryans," "Howard and the Celts," and "The Heroic Barbarian" (a revision of the author's earlier "Barbarians I Have Known"), together with bibliographies and an index. The second and third essays also appeared in de Camp's anthology of pieces on Howard, The Spell of Conan (1980). All three were reprinted in the later de Camp collection Rubber Dinosaurs and Wooden Elephants (1996). 
The book was reviewed by Darrell Schweitzer in Fantasiae v. 3, no. 6, June 1975, J. Rosenbaum in Science Fiction Review Monthly 5, July 1975, Brian Stableford in Vector 81, May 1977, and Don D'Ammassa in Science Fiction Chronicle v. 10, no. 5, February 1989. 
This article about a literary essay or essay collection is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a biographical book on writers or poets is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ryan was identified as possibly having been involved in Virginia's Jim Crow-era segregation laws during the naming process for an elementary school in Loudoun County; the school in question was ultimately named Waxpool Elementary School instead. 
This article about a member of the Virginia House of Delegates is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A fanfare drew attention to the Presidential Box and welcomed President of Azerbaijan Ilham Aliyev, First Lady, Chair of Baku 2015 European Games Organizing Committee Mehriban Aliyeva and President of the European Olympic Committees Patrick Hickey. The flag of Azerbaijan was carried by eight and raised by three servicemen of the National Guard of the Special State Protection Service of Azerbaijan. 
American Singer Lady Gaga performed "Imagine", a cover from John Lennon at the event. The shapeshifting scene featured the representations of Yanar Dag and the Gobustan rock carvings, in particular. The woman on the stage (Nargiz Nasirzade) and the man (Aydemir Aydemirov) embodied the arrival of spring. Two thousand artists gathered at the scene to perform the yalli dance at the end. The opening ceremony was broadcast live on the official YouTube channel of the Games. 
On 17 August, Slavia announced that the entire 61-member squad was tested negative for the COVID-19. On this day, the league FA also released updates in the COVID manual and the team has been released from the quarantine. In line with the manual, the team may resume its training and get ready for a match-week 1. 
On 8 October, the Fortuna liga was postponed, initially until 25 October, but then extended until 3 November. 
On 19 December, Slavia announced that Peter Olayinka had extended his contract with the club until June 2023. 
On 5 January, Slavia announced the signing of Alexander Bah on a four-and-a-half year contract, with Taras Kacharaba signing on loan from Slovan Liberec the next day with an option to make the move permanent. 
On 1 February, Petar Musa joined Union Berlin on loan for the remainder of the season, whilst Simon Deli returned to Slavia on a similar deal from Club Brugge. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
The 2019 Holy Cross Crusaders football team represents the College of the Holy Cross in the 2019 NCAA Division I FCS football season. The Crusaders, led by second-year head coach Bob Chesney, play their home games at Fitton Field as a member of the Patriot League. 
The Patriot League released their preseason coaches' poll on July 30, 2019 (voting was by conference head coaches and sports information directors). The Crusaders were picked to finish in second place, receiving 2 of 14 first-place votes. 
The Crusaders received an automatic bid (due to winning their conference) for the postseason tournament, with a first-round pairing against Monmouth. 
Zip was a Canadian discount airline headquartered in Hangar 101 at Calgary International Airport, Calgary, Alberta. It was launched by Air Canada as a no-frills subsidiary in September 2002. It operated a fleet of 12 Boeing 737 aircraft, each painted in a bright, neon colour (blue, fuchsia, green, and orange) with a single class of service.  The subsidiary was headed by former WestJet CEO, Steve Smith. 
As a direct competition to Canada's leading low-cost carrier Westjet, Zip flew mostly between the western cities of Abbotsford, Calgary, Edmonton, Vancouver, Saskatoon, Regina and Winnipeg. 
Zip ceased operations in September 2004 when Air Canada resumed a full schedule on its western routes. 
Zip was known for branding its advertising with 3 character words. Among them, "yuk" was printed on the air sickness bags, "bag" was printed on the personal baggage tags, and "yum" was printed on the napkins distributed with beverages on board. Large print advertisements were erected in many cities, which simply said "fly" and the company's website below, 4321zip.com. Today, the website redirects to the official Air Canada website, along with other subsidiaries' websites. 
Zip operated a fleet consisting entirely of Boeing 737-200 aircraft, all obtained from the existing Air Canada fleet. 
Zip's aircraft were painted in bright, neon colours on the fuselage, tail, and engines. Specifically, the colours blue, fuchsia, green, and orange were painted. 
The fuselage was painted in the aircraft's colour, except for a white silhouette of a bee, with white dots trailing it. These dots extended to the back to the fuselage, leading to the tail of the aircraft, where Zip's logo was painted. On the engines, Zip's website, 4321zip.com was printed in white. 
Towards the end of the airline, some aircraft were painted in a different livery. The main fuselage was white, with a small bee on the side of the nose. The 4321zip.com website was printed on the fuselage as well. The tail sectioned retained the same logo but with striping on the back. These were also in the original colors of blue, fuchsia, orange and green. 
One aircraft was painted in a special Christmas livery with a red nose, a smile under the nose, and a large red & white striped scarf stretching down the fuselage. 
Bram de Groot (born 18 December 1974 in Alkmaar) is a Dutch former professional road bicycle racer who last rode for UCI ProTour team Rabobank. 
This biographical article related to a Dutch cycling person born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Samoa Party was a small party of Samoa. The party was founded in September 2005 by former auditor-general Su'a Rimoni Ah Chong on a platform of restoring the independence of watchdog institutions such as the Auditor-General. The party also aimed to provide free education, and impose a term limit on future Prime Ministers of two terms. During the 2006 Samoan general election, it did not secure any seats. 
The party was disbanded in September 2010 and merged with the Tautua Samoa Party. Samoa Party leader Feo Nemaia Esau explained that the merger would form a more "united opposition" to the ruling Human Rights Protection Party. 
It is a Quasi-Hilda comet. Due to perturbations by Jupiter, the 2005, 2013 and 2021 perihelion passages will be closer to the Sun. The comet is observable all through its orbit. 
He represented his native country in two consecutive Summer Olympics (1996 and 2000). He won the men's discus throw event at the 2001 Mediterranean Games, and set his personal best (64.69 m) on 24 June 2000 at a meet in Ravenna. 
Legionella santicrucis is a Gram-negative bacterium from the genus Legionella, which was isolated from tap water in  St. Croix on the Virgin Islands. 
Horacio Alejandro Macedo Esquivel (born April 15, 1963) is a Mexican football manager and former player. He was born in Mexico City. 
This biographical article related to a Mexican association football defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alexis Bittar is the designer and CEO of the eponymous jewelry & lifestyle brand. Bittar was credited for reviving the art costume jewelry movement in the 1990s.  
In 2004 Bittar was named "Rising Star of the Year" at the ACE Awards, in 2010 he won the CFDA Accessory Designer of the Year award, in  November 2014 he received the Brand of the year from ACE. 
Bittar was born in 1968 in Brooklyn, NY to Bob and Helen Bittar, both university professors and antique collectors. 
In 1988 Alexis Bittar began to design his own line of jewelry. He bought his first block of Lucite in 1990 and holed up in his apartment figuring out how to hand carve it into the jewelry vision he had. 
Using Lucite and semi-precious stones and metals, Bittar began selling handmade pieces on the streets of Soho. Dawn Mello, the fashion director of Bergdorf Goodman, discovered his work in 1992 and agreed to carry his designs, followed by Saks Fifth Avenue, the Museum of Modern Art, Harrods, and Isetan in Japan. 
In 1996 he designed a limited edition set of home wares for Barneys New York and Takashimaya, and a collection of Lucite and steel furniture for The Cooper Hewitt Museum. 
In 1998, Bittar launched the first of what would become many designer collaborations, working with Burberry, the British luxury fashion house.  Bittar designed Burberry's first Ready-to-wear jewelry collection, interpreting their trademark plaid onto Lucite.  Subsequent collaborations include legendary stylist and costume designer Patricia Field for Sex and the City, the Cooper-Hewitt Museum, Estee Lauder, Michael Kors, Jason Wu, Jeremy Scott, Michael Angel, and Phillip Lim. 
In 2004, Alexis opened his first boutique on Broome St. and went on to open a total of 15 stores in the US. 
In 2010, Alexis Bittar featured Joan Collins as the face of his Spring campaign. Bittar wanted to mimic 80's fashion and believed Joan was perfect for this role considering she was the 1980s soap opera Queen. 
In spring 2015, Alexis Bittar cast two of the industry's most well known names in his ads, 93-year-old fashion eccentric Iris Apfel, and Tavi Gevinson, the teen blogger turned rookie editor turn Broadway star- 19. The ads were meant to highlight the essence of strong women. 
In 2010, Alexis Bittar entered into partnership with Private Equity company TSG Consumer Partners and in 2015, they sold to Carolee LLC, the jewelry arm of Brooks Brothers. 
One source discussing this oral tradition says that "almoravid Abu Bakar Ben Umar wad killed by the arrow of serer warrior Amar Godomat, in the month of shaa'ban 480 (november 1087). this regicide potentially signals his exodus after taking the name "Amar god o maat", "Amar (which) killed (the) king"." 
Another source for Abu Bakr's death says "In the region of Tagant on his way to Djabal al-Dbahab, the Mountain of Gold, he was wounded, according to the chronicles, by a poisoned arrow, shot by an old black bowman who could not see unless his eye- lids were raised up to uncover his eyeballs. The black bowman asked his daughter to hold open his eyes so that he could aim his arrow. It struck the Amir in the knee. Abu Bakr turned his horse around and rode off..." dying when he arrived in Tagant. 
He was a native of England, born in 1843 to Alice and James Irwin, a veteran of the British army. The family's original destination was California at the onset of the California Gold Rush, eventually making their way to Hawaii. He was enrolled at Punahou School 1856-57, at that time known as Oahu College. The school was established for children of missionaries, but later included children of Hawaii's royalty, and one future United States President, Barack Obama. 
After working for other businessmen for several years, and shortly after the passage of the Reciprocity Treaty of 1875, Irwin partnered with John Smith Walker and Zephaniah Swift Spalding to form William G. Irwin & Co. That partnership was terminated in 1880. Irwin was president of the Paauhau and the Kilauea Sugar companies, held stock in other sugar companies, and was one of the March 1882 founders of the Planters Labor and Supply Company. 
Irwin died in San Francisco on January 28, 1914, having retained his British citizenship throughout his life. His estate had an estimated worth in excess of $10,000,000 (equivalent to $258,372,093 in 2020), the bulk of which went to his widow. Other cash bequests were made to family members and household servants. Two charities in San Francisco each received $25,000. 
Austintown Township is one of the fourteen townships of Mahoning County, Ohio, United States.  The 2010 census found 36,722 people in the township. 
No municipalities are located in Austintown Township, although two census-designated places are located there: Austintown in the east (with 44% of the township's area and 81% of its population), and part of Mineral Ridge in the north. 
The Meander Creek Reservoir occupies the western portion of the township.  Ax Factory Run creek flows west to east through central portion of the township with Woodside Lake forming a section of the creek. 
Interstates 80 and 680 and State Route 11 are major traffic systems crossing Austintown. One exit on I-80 and one exit on State Route 11 serve the township. 
Abdul Majeed was born on 15 November 1933. He was educated at Sivananda Vidyalayam, Batticaloa and Trincomalee Hindu College. He later studied at Wadia College, Bombay and Presidency College, Madras. 
Abdul Majeed stood as a candidate in Mutur at the March 1960 parliamentary election but failed to get elected. He stood as the Sri Lanka Freedom Party (SLFP) candidate in Mutur at the July 1960 parliamentary election. He won the election and entered Parliament. He was appointed Parliamentary Secretary to the Minister of Public Works  in 1964. 
Abdul Majeed was re-elected at the 1965 and 1970 parliamentary elections. He served as Deputy Minister of Information and Broadcasting from 1970 to 1977. 
The 1976 Delimitation Commission created Seruvila Electoral District from parts of Mutur Electoral District. Mutur was demoted from a two-member district to a single-member district. Abdul Majeed lost his seat at the 1977 parliamentary election. 
Abdul Majeed was assassinated on 13 November 1987. The militant Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam was widely blamed for the assassination. 
This article about an Eastern Anatolia Region of Turkey location is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Corythucha arcuata, the oak lace bug is a species of lace bug Tingidae that is a pest of oaks in the Old World. It is native to the New world, and was first observed in Europe in 2000. 
Mehran Shahintab (born March 21, 1966 Kermanshah) is an Iranian professional basketball coach. Currently, he is head coach of the Iranian national team and Shahrdari Gorgan.[citation needed] 
Shahintab began his career at the age of 16 and soon became a member of the Iran National Junior Team in 1985. From 1991 to 1998 he played for Rah-Ahan Basketball Club for 8 consecutive seasons. Shahintab joined Peykan Basketball Club in 1998 and with them, he reached the I.R. Iran Super League final.[citation needed] 
In total, he played 16 seasons in Iran's top-tier level super league, playing with Pas, Persepolis, Rah-Ahan, Peykan, and Azad University Basketball Club.[citation needed] 
Shahintab's first competition with the senior Iran National basketball team was the 1989 ABC Championship in Beijing, China. He helped Iran National basketball team to achieved the 4th place in 1993 ABC Championship in Jakarta. In 1995 after playing for Iran National basketball team in Asian Basketball Confederation (ABC) Championship in Seoul[citation needed] Shahintab announced his retirement from international competition. 
In 2000, Shahinatb was named the head coach of the Iran national men's junior basketball team. With Iran's U18, he took the silver medal at the WABA Championship U18 in Yemen 2000. With U16 he took the gold medal at the WABA Championship U16 in Tehran 2001, gold medal at the WABA Championship U16 in Jordan 2002, and finally the first gold medal in Iran's basketball history in Asia continent at the 2004 FIBA Asia Under-18 Championship at Bangalore, India.[citation needed] 
This biographical article relating to a Japanese softball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Because of public outcry during construction of The Central Artery, elevated for most of its length and reviled because it cut off views of and access to Boston's historic waterfront, it was decided by then-Governor John A. Volpe that the final section of the artery was to be put underground from just south of Congress Street to Kneeland Street near Boston's Chinatown section.  At the time of its construction, it was the widest vehicular tunnel in the world. 
At one time, a bus terminal serving Peter Pan, Bonanza, and other regional bus lines sat atop the tunnel near its northern portal.  That bus station has since been relocated to the major intermodal transportation hub at South Station. 
Dennis Geiger (born 30 June 1984) is a German footballer who plays as a defender, most recently for SSV Jeddeloh. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a defender born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rockridge is a residential neighborhood and commercial district in Oakland, California.  Rockridge is generally defined as the area east of Telegraph Avenue, south of the Berkeley city limits, west of the Oakland hills and north of the intersection of Pleasant Valley Avenue/51st Street and Broadway. Rockridge was listed by Money Magazine in 2002 as one of the "best places to live". 
The Oakland firestorm of 1991 came within 1/2 mile of College Avenue, destroying a large part of the Upper Rockridge area east of Broadway.  A memorial wall was created under the Rockridge BART station, located on College Avenue, following the fire. 
The main thoroughfare in Rockridge is College Avenue. The district is bounded by 51st Street on the southern end and Berkeley's Elmwood district on the northern end. The College Avenue strip running through Rockridge is home to more than 80 restaurants, cafes and upscale retail stores, including several bookstores specializing in used and rare books. Rockridge Market Hall, a collection of gourmet food establishments, is located there. 
Dreyer's Ice Cream maintains its international corporate headquarters in Rockridge on College Avenue, and operates its only retail ice cream parlor on the premises, where it offers visitors the opportunity to test new flavors and products. 
The Rockridge Branch of the Oakland Public Library is one of the most visited establishments in the neighborhood and is home to an extensive collection of children's books and audio/visual materials. 
BART travel times from Rockridge to Montgomery Station near San Francisco's downtown financial district averages 22 minutes. Travel times to Downtown Oakland averages 8 minutes. 
Many Rockridge residents are involved in their neighborhood's political, educational and cultural life. Rockridge has several community organizations including the Rockridge District Association and the Rockridge Community Planning Council. The Rockridge News is published monthly and hand delivered to every resident's home. 
Chabot Elementary School in Rockridge, founded in 1927, serves grades kindergarten through 5th grade. Chabot consistently scores high in statewide assessments, and the Chabot PTA offers extensive after-school programs including language immersion classes and arts and music classes. 
Mentoring Academy is a private independent high school that offers individualized, self-paced, mentored instruction[citation needed]. Mentoring Academy, located at 5951 College Avenue, was founded by John Muster in 2012. 
Post-secondary education is offered by the California College of the Arts, formerly the California College of Arts and Crafts. The school was founded in 1907 and has been located at its present site, at the intersection of College and Broadway, since 1922. 
Professional education for Roman Catholic priests and friars is offered at St. Albert's College, a Dominican institution located on Birch Court near Claremont Middle School. 
Legislative elections were held in Austria on 1 October 2006 to elect the 23rd National Council, the lower house of Austria's bicameral parliament. 
In addition to the parties already represented in the National Council, eight parties collected enough signatures to be placed on the ballot. Three of these were cleared to be on the ballot in all states, five of them only in some. 
The Freedom Party of Austria campaigned with party leader Heinz-Christian Strache as their leading candidate. 
They stated abolishment of tuition fees for universities and cancelling the order for Eurofighter as conditions for entering a government. 
The party presented an election programme with the title "10 points against a shift to the left in Austria". Policies included: lowering of number of foreigners by 30%, limits for the share of non-native German speakers in classes and termination of the European Union's accession talks with Turkey. 
Leading candidate for the Communist Party of Austria was Mirko Messner. Hoping for a basic mandate in the constituency Graz, the Communist Party made heavy use of the Styrian politician Ernest Kaltenegger, who managed to secure one of the best election results in the history of the party when gaining 20% of the votes in the municipal elections in Graz. Points of their election campaign included a tax for the rich as well as higher minimal pensions and wages. 
Ergazakis was born in Polithea, Heraklion. He studied law in Athens and worked as a lawyer in Heraklion. He was a candidate for Heraklion with the Liberal Party in the 1926 Greek legislative election, getting 1,584 votes, and in the 1946 election with the Independent Liberals, getting 606 votes. He was elected member of parliament for Heraklion with the Democratic Union in 1956. 
Ergazakis died in 1979 and in his will he created a scholarship for poor students, founding the Ergazakeio Foundation. 
This article about a Greek lawyer, judge or jurist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Caspar Getman Farmstead is a historic home and related farm outbuildings located near Stone Arabia in Montgomery County, New York.  It includes the main house and ell, two lateral-entry English barns, a New World Dutch barn (c. 1790), limestone smokehouse (c. 1850), and former chicken coop (c. 1920).  The house has a two-story main block, five by five bay, with a center entrance, with an attached 1 1/2 story ell.  It has a moderately pitched gable roof and is clad in clapboards. 
This article about a historic property or district in Montgomery County, New York, that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In August 1992 Norrie's son Duncan was killed in a plane crash over Nepal. Duncan was honored by having a street in Winnipeg named after him. 
A vascular malformation, is a blood vessel or lymph vessel abnormality. Vascular malformations are one of the classifications of vascular anomalies, the other grouping is vascular tumors. They may cause aesthetic problems as they have a growth cycle, and can continue to grow throughout life. 
Vascular malformations of the brain (VMBs) include those involving capillaries, and those involving the veins and arteries. Capillary malformations in the brain are known as cerebral cavernous malformations or capillary cavernous malformations (CCMs). Those involving the mix of vessels are known as cerebral arteriovenous malformations (AVMs or cAVMs). The arteriovenous type is the most common in the brain. 
A simple division of the vascular malformations is made into low-flow and high-flow types. Low-flow malformations involve a single type of blood or lymph vessel, and are known as simple vascular malformations; high-flow malformations involve an artery. There are also malformations that are of mixed-flow involving more than one type of vessel, such as an arteriovenous malformation. 
Low-flow vascular malformations include capillary malformations, venous malformations, and lymphatic malformations. 
Venous malformations are typically ill-defined masses, coloured from pale to dark blue. They can affect any tissue in the body. The mass is soft, and easily compressed, and their blue colouring is due to the dilated anomalous involved veins. They are most commonly found in the head and neck. Venous malformations can often extend deeper from their surface appearance, reaching underlying muscle or bone. In the neck they may extend into the lining of the mouth cavity or into the salivary glands. 
Lymphatic malformations are congenital, developing from badly-formed lymphatic vessels in early embryonic development. Abnormal development of the lymph vessels results in their failure to connect and drain into the venous system. 
A severe venous malformation is known as a lymphaticovenous malformation that also involves the lymph vessels. 
In the brain a cerebral arteriovenous malformation causes arterial blood to be directly shunted into the veins as there is an absence of a capillary bed. This carries a high risk of an intracranial hemorrhage. 
Xerocrassa diensis is a species of air-breathing land snail, a pulmonate gastropod mollusk in the family Hygromiidae, the hairy snails and their allies. This species is endemic to the island of Dia in Greece. 
Overseas Adventure Travel (O.A.T.) is part of the family of travel companies owned by Boston-based Grand Circle Corporation, offering group Adventure travel to Africa, the Arctic Asia, Central and South America, Europe, Australia and New Zealand. O.A.T. has small groups with a maximum of 16 travelers on land trips and 25 travelers on trips with a ship portion. O.A.T. has also been recognized for leadership in tourism and in philanthropy. 
In 1978, former high school teacher Judi Wineland established O.A.T. After she went to Africa, she became the first woman to launch and operate an adventure travel company. In 1993, O.A.T. was acquired by the Grand Circle Corporation, owned by Alan and Harriet Lewis. Grand Circle Corporation also includes Grand Circle Cruise Line and Grand Circle Travel. 
Through the company's Grand Circle Foundation, which consists of the Lewis Family Foundation, millions of dollars have been pledged toward education and preservation since 1992. In 2007, Harriet Lewis founded a program called Next Generation Leaders, that gives internships to students from Boston at the Grand Circle office. In 2012, O.A.T. pledged $600,000 to benefit WBUR, which was the largest donation in the station's history. 
It is similar to the related species Phyla nodiflora, but differs in having much longer and more pointed leaves. Both species are common as weeds and in the ornamental environment. 
An older scientific name for this species is Lippia lanceolata, and in some older references 'frogfruit' is provided as a common name. 
The Acadian French name for the plant is "caille eau," stemming from the superstition that it can curdle water. 
The Clonmel Oil Chase is a Grade 2 National Hunt steeplechase in Ireland which is open to horses aged four years or older. It is run at Clonmel over a distance of about 2 miles and 4 furlongs (2 miles 4 furlongs and 51 yards, or 4,070 metres), and it is scheduled to take place each year in November. 
The event is named after its sponsor, the Clonmel Oil Company. It was first run in 1992 over 3 miles in December and was initially known as the Morris Oil Chase.  It was cut by half a mile in 1994, and at the same time it was moved to November. The race was given Grade 3 status in 1995, and it was promoted to Grade 2 level the following year. It was first run under its present title in 2003. 
Esther Luella Sherman(18 August 1893- 23 January 1982) known as Ragini Devi was an Indian classical dancer of Bharata Natyam, Kuchipudi, Kathakali and Odissi, which she popularised in the west. 
Vector is a 2012 platform game for Windows and Mobile developed and published by Russian studio Nekki. It is an arcade-styled parkour game with the objective being to break free from the cycle as a free runner. 
The game received a 2016 sequel titled Vector 2 that continues the storyline of the original. The protagonist from the first installment was eventually captured by security forces, but, instead of killing him, the antagonists decide to use his skills to test some new equipment in a secret research facility. When the protagonist dies, a new body is created for them.  
Gameplay similar to the previous game and several tricks return such as"Swallow, Screwdriver,Dash Vault, Obstacle Jump, Rocket Vault, Ralflip Vault , Reverse Vault and many more  
With the success of Vector, Nekki decided to create another game like it that used a silhouette as the main protagonist.  That game became a fighting game titled Shadow Fight, released exclusively on Facebook in 2011.  This spiritual successor to Vector eventually became a trilogy, spawning two sequels that became available on iOS and Android in 2014 and 2017. 
HMAS Echuca (J252/M252), named for the town of Echuca, Victoria, was one of 60  Bathurst-class corvettes constructed during World War II, and one of 36 initially manned and commissioned by the Royal Australian Navy (RAN). 
Echuca was laid down by HMA Naval Dockyard at Williamstown, Victoria on 22 February 1941. She was launched on 17 January 1942 by Lady Royle, wife of First Naval Member Sir Guy Royle, and commissioned into the RAN on 7 September 1942. 
On 5 March 1952, Echuca and three other Bathurst-class corvettes (HMA Ships Inverell, Kiama, and Stawell) were transferred to the Royal New Zealand Navy (RNZN). She was commissioned into the RNZN in May 1952, and received the prefix HMNZS. 
The corvette remained in service with the RNZN until 1967, although from 1953 she was classified as being in reserve. She was sold to Pacific Scrap Limited of Auckland for scrapping on 11 April 1967. 
Le Chauchet is a commune in the Creuse department in the Nouvelle-Aquitaine region in central France. 
Sterling District No. 5 Schoolhouse is a historic school building located at Sterling in Cayuga County, New York.  It was built about 1853 and is a two-story hewn timber frame building with a front-facing gable roof, built above a mortared rubble stone foundation.  It is rectangular in shape and measures 28 feet by 38 feet.  It was used as a school into the 1950s.  It has since been used by the Sterling Historical Society for museum display space and as the Town Hall. 
This article about a historic property or district in Cayuga County, New York, that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Originally from Chipman, New